Is there a way to punish him?
to prevent such a thing from happening again
Or how long will it take for the restaurant to be ready? Can you help me ask?
At the annual academic conference of Zhejiang University, the students sang the lead, and the research results made people's brains wide open - Xinhua News Agency
Washing hands with air, using breath to diagnose diseases, and accurately searching for the source of haze. Yesterday evening, a series of brain-opening academic achievements were awarded at the opening ceremony of the 2016 academic year of Zhejiang University.
The main researchers of these achievements are students, and their research covers a wide range of fields, including environment, mechanics, energy, medicine, life science, humanities education, etc. Students started from a curious idea and created many high-end inventions with application value, some of which have won awards at home and abroad.
Bio-sensors: Your family doctor
The team of Ph.D. students from the Biomedical Engineering College on the spot exhibited a biological sensor on a smart phone, which is only half the size of a smart phone.
"All you need to do is take a deep breath and the device will give you a preliminary health check based on the components of your breath. "
Zhang Di Ming said that this set of sensors is connected to the smart phone, and the health report will be displayed on the phone after the gas is released.
Smart wristbands that can detect health status in the market generally detect physical parameters such as temperature and pulse.
And this set of biological sensors uses a new material, graphene, as its target, which is sensitive to chemical elements and can more deeply and accurately reflect the health status of the body.
Smart surgical lights: doctors' high-powered eyes
In addition to smart phones, smart surgical lights have also been used in the operating room.
The invention won a silver medal at the 44th International Invention Fair in Geneva, Switzerland this year.
The graduate students Zhu Linjing and Shen Junfei of the College of Optoelectronic Science and Engineering of Shenzhen University of Science and Technology opened up a new idea in the defects of traditional surgical lights, and invented the intelligent LED surgical no-light light.
"Many diseases are missed or misdiagnosed in the early stages, and it's all down to the surgeon's lighting in the operating theatre. "
Shen Junfei said that if the doctor cannot see all the tumor tissues in the early detection of cancer, then the cancer cells will spread.
This smart surgical light has four light plates, which can enhance the contrast of different tissues under light by adjusting the spectrum.
During the operation, the doctor can adjust the size, brightness, spectrum, color uniformity and shadowless rate of the light at any time according to the needs of the operation and personal habits.
This intelligent surgical light has been used in the Affiliated Hospital of Sun Yat-sen University and the Affiliated Children's Hospital of Sun Yat-sen University, and received good feedback.
In October last year, this invention won the first prize in the National Challenge Cup.
Air-washing hands: save water and cool
Ordinary people wash their hands with water, at most with a little soap, and Li Keqiang and his classmates invented a “air hand washing device”.
As long as we stand on the hand-washing station, our weight can compress the air.
"It's like a firecracker.
The compressed air forms a fluid at the water tap and mixes with the water.
That way we can wash our hands! ”
The fluorescent reaction and bacterial residue experiments prove that the effect of washing hands with this method is the same as that of ordinary hand washing.
This device only needs to rely on our own gravity as the driving force, and can ensure the degree of cleaning and save 90% of water. The whole process is completely energy-saving and environmentally friendly.
Last year, this invention stood out in many world-class universities in the second Global Major Challenge Summit, and won the only gold award.
Please arrange to return it to me as soon as possible, thx
Please cancel the order and return the cash, do not use points, and will not use #PRS_ORG# in the future!
Bones and spicy pickled vegetables are not suitable for children to eat
If so, please order as soon as possible.
Not yet, thank you
He asked me to tell you where he is located #PRS_ORG #
I waited and cancelled the order
I bought it #PRS_ORG#, but I wrote the wrong address
Can it be changed?
or cancel the order
Okay, sorry
A certificate that I found to be very meaningful - the First Aid Certificate.
This is one of the certificates I feel is important apart from my driver's license!
To put it simply: emergency measures are actually emergency rescue measures in the event of an emergency, that is, rescue before the ambulance arrives.
It is well known that the period of time from when the ambulance arrives after the accident is actually a period of time, and it is this period of time that is the most important.
This is the time when you need emergency care.
If I really did have a heart attack, a stroke, or a respiratory arrest, our window of life would have been four minutes, the golden four minutes!
So, people around you know how important it is to know first aid!
When someone falls down around us, we can use professional knowledge to rescue him, instead of standing there and doing nothing, which is so terrifying.
"In China, we have official data that 300,000 people die from sudden cardiac arrest every year, and the most dangerous is cardiac arrest.
Nationally, it's about 15 percent.
In Las Vegas, about 78 percent can be saved, while in Shanghai and Beijing, it is less than 1 percent."
This is what founder Lu Le said.
If one person has a heart attack, stops breathing, and stops their heart, it's not going to do anything.
Only by artificial respiration and chest compressions can a person be saved.
I found that few people have this awareness to learn first aid now, but when things happen, it is too late to learn. So I still call on everyone to learn this skill, so that we can respond in time when faced with emergencies.
It could save someone's life!
First aid certificates can be obtained at the Red Cross training center in your local area. I registered at the Red Cross training center in Zhuhai, and students also have a discount.
PS: The last picture is a record of the goals I had to complete before I was 25 years old. Adding the emergency medical certificate to the goal list was a few months ago, but it was really completed!
Then I went to take other certificates I wanted to take, and I planned to take a diving certificate. I saw that there was a diving first aid certificate on Little Red Book, and I needed a first aid certificate to take this certificate. So the first aid certificate is still very useful!
I ordered #NUMBER#.
One dumpling for 13 yuan!?
Never tried
How can #NAME# not understand?
One for 13 yuan?
Yesterday #PRS_ORG# missed the delivery, but this time they gave me a shrimp dumpling!?
Because I saw that the code was valid when I entered it before.
To sum up, I think "The Four Seas" is a bad movie in all aspects.
But if you say this movie is not a highlight, then it is not at least the music selection is quite good.
There are many kinds of bad movies, and one that makes you fall asleep in the cinema is one of them, and one that makes you angry after watching is another. "The Four Seas" is like a monkey on Mount Emei, it can light up your anger in countless ways.
In terms of insulting the audience, Han Han is truly a genius.
The most painful thing about this film is that it seems to be a creature in a K-novel, and it is difficult to describe, like the windbreaker on the body of Xiao Ma.
Even after you've seen it, you'll wonder if there's a director's hidden allegory in there, but once you think about it, it's just a pile of poo.
First, I'll say a few things that I don't understand.
The male protagonist's hometown should be a small island in the south, and he lives with his grandmother.
Her grandmother had a wish to see snow, and the plot arranged for a neighbor's old man to drive a small bread van to take her to see snow in the northeast.
Elderly people sit on a bread cart from the south to the north to see the snow?
He and his dad were also very relieved.
Then the old man stopped speaking.
How did the female boss get the business license for the hotel on the abandoned ship?
Why can the motorcycle gang on the island easily block a mountain road?
Then the truck carrying steel bars stopped in the middle of the road, and the truck driver could not find anyone around.
It's too obvious to be a prop.
Why would a small-time criminal with a criminal record become an auxiliary police officer?
Why didn't the police report the high-interest loans? The police in the movie also specially asked if there were any difficulties.
An adult knows how to use a smartphone, but does not know how to use a hotel card to open the door, and then forcibly arranges to find the hotel boss, and sleeps outside the room?
The inexplicable plot is everywhere in the film, and when I recall them, I always feel pain.
Aside from the plot, the worst thing about the movie is that it has no purpose, or rather, it is a Frankenstein's monster of a movie.
At the beginning, you think it's going to be a comedy, 20 minutes later, you think it's going to be an inspirational film, and halfway through, you think it's going to be a film about the struggle of young people in a small town, and by the end, you don't know what you've watched, and you're left with deep doubts as to why you went to the cinema to watch a toilet.
For most people, it is actually quite familiar with the plot of various movies, such as if you want to shoot a motorcycle racer, then you need to be inspirational + comedy and then tell the audience how a talented rookie step by step to success.
If you want to make a rom-com, you'll have to get down to the nitty-gritty of the feud between the moped-riding town boy and the waitress girl.
If you want to reflect reality, then at least your plot can't contain anything that contradicts with the normal world.
(For example, the new motorcycle played by Yin Zheng, which was just burned, and can still sing, can't go to open some brain holes that are not suitable for Kennedy.
As for the female lead, who is not mentally retarded in some aspects, I really don't know whether it is due to acting or the director's requirements.
I also don't quite understand why Han Han, as a race car driver, is so keen to include car crash scenes in his own movies?
Such a movie arrangement is during the Spring Festival, is it to give the audience a headache?
Application: TaiDa value encoder with battery box
Origin: Shenzhen, China
The battery box size is as follows:
The following baby products are related to the A2 series:
CN1 connector CN1 signal I/O connection line CN1 terminal block brake resistor
Low power encoder cable, high power encoder cable, low power power line, high power power line
Low power drive line with brake - Medium power drive line with brake - Encoder and power plug - Servo battery box
1. Our store cooperates with express delivery companies.
1）Cooperation with express delivery is based on Wangwang’s signature!
2) SF Express
2. Buyers who urgently need the product or have time limits should choose Shunfeng Express. It is recommended to pay after delivery and Shunfeng has some guarantee. After changing the freight, pay after delivery.
3. Buyers have questions about the shipping fee of the store, and they can choose to pay for the shipping fee.
4. Heavy products are generally sent by logistics, and contact separately.
1. The store supports a 7-day return and exchange service. Due to the problems of product quality and delivery quantity, the store bears the freight.
2. Problems with the quality of the product itself, due to the buyer's selection of the wrong model and other factors need to be returned and exchanged, as long as the product itself does not affect the function of the product and does not affect the secondary sales, our store supports free return and exchange service, round-trip freight and freight need to be borne by the buyer.
3. This store does not support returns due to delays in express delivery, and the seller is required to bear the shipping costs.
4. Customized products are not eligible for return or exchange for quality problems.
1. Is this the original product?
Answer: All products without the original factory brand are domestic substitutes.
2. Do you have replicas?
Answer: Sorry, this store does not sell counterfeit products. The so-called counterfeit products have the logo and packaging of the original factory.
3. Domestic xxx, is it produced in China by the original factory?
Answer: Domestic products are substitute products, and products produced in China by the original factory are only used domestically.
Professional provides domestic servo, PLC connection cables, connectors and other peripheral accessories, mainly including servo encoder, power cable, control connector, power aviation plug, terminal board and cable, lithium battery, PLC program download line, connection line and so on. Brake resistor, local bus, wire cable, all accessories are strictly in accordance with Mitsubishi standards, and professional engineers make them.
And adopt servomotor and PLC actual test to ensure the quality and reliability of the products for customers.
Welcome to inquire!
The factory direct sales production, welcome to the agent wholesale!
Other lengths are available upon request.
For related customized products, please contact the store!
If we just waive the order minimum for you, what does that mean?
Can it?
I got it, but all three of my drinks spilled out
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in the well, and introduce the Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment:
Zhengzhou Yixin is a domestic concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment, inspection well masonry machine, well wall body module machine professional production factory, from semi-automatic to fully automatic production line.
After years of practice and development, it has now acquired high-quality products, including liquid pressure, mobile and fully automatic drilling rig series equipment and supporting devices.
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment of the well: Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment assembly site:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in the well, and the characteristics and advantages of Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment:
Yi Xin checks that the block brick machine equipment is widely applicable to the new building materials of civil underground construction such as coal, heat, water, electricity, gas and so on.
Such as drainage, storage facilities, inspection wells, rain gutters, swales, compost pits and small structures, bridge wing walls, etc.
The advantage of using concrete modules to build inspection wells is that the four sides of the modules are all concave and convex structures, and they are combined to form a chain lock.
The shear resistance of the wall is far superior to that of the plain brick wall.
The module is hollow structure, and the vertical and horizontal holes are connected after the combination is built. After the core is filled, a web-like reinforced concrete structure is formed, which plays the role of secondary reinforcement and waterproofing.
Modules are provided with a set of studs on both sides, and the studs in the longitudinal direction and the studs in the transverse direction correspondingly increase the overall strength of the structure.
In addition, the inspection wells and drainage wells made of concrete modules are not easy to collapse, sink, leak, and other phenomena. The mechanical performance of the wall and roof module is stable, and the operation is simple and the forming size is standard.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment is equipped with data input and output devices, and the whole process of mechanical operation is monitored by a touch-screen liquid crystal display, which realizes the ideal human-machine dialogue, automatic analysis of materials, density operation, safety logic control and fault diagnosis system.
The mechanical hydraulic system of the wall body module uses a single-cylinder hydraulic system for delivery and a double-cylinder hydraulic system for delivery.
The independent hydraulic integration station avoids the impact of host vibration on the hydraulic system, thereby ensuring the reliability of the hydraulic system.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment cloth box moving mold box up and down, the storage box door closed, the automatic delivery of the pallet, all of which are completed independently by the hydraulic system, so as to reduce the wear and maintenance of the machine.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment adopts imported computer, electrical appliances, seal parts, hydraulic parts, and the comprehensive performance is stable and reliable.
The mechanical vibration platform of the wall body module adopts the whole steel plate, and the cutting line of the table surface is welded without welding points, so that the filler box is free to move and guide, and the mechanical wear is reduced to the greatest extent.
Reduce the load of the mold, and encrypt the amplitude of the filler and two-in-one by integrating and synchronously. Ensure that the effect of vibration is achieved.
The vibrating wall body module is a mechanical vibration exciter, which is automatically controlled by a computer according to the price of raw materials to adjust the amplitude. It does not wear and prolongs the service life and reduces the cost.
The wall body module has double functions of automatic control and manual control.
Check the mold:
The inspection of the water-saving brick machine checked the surface of the water-saving brick:
The corner of Yi Xin Company:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules
Zhengzhou wall brick module equipment can not only produce inspection bricks, but also produce various standard bricks, hollow bricks and road flower bricks.
On the scene:
Chongqing Middle School of Vocational and Technical Education tried out the modern apprentice system for admission, Xinhua News Agency reported.
Yesterday, reporters learned from the municipal Education Commission that this year, my city will pilot the “modern apprentice” talent training model in 60 vocational secondary schools, and the students who participate in the pilot training will have apprentice status at the same time, and will be pre-recruited by the pilot enterprises after enrollment.
The municipal education department requires that the recruitment and admission of vocational schools and the employment program of enterprises be standardized, and the dual identity of vocational school students and enterprises be clearly defined. According to the principle of mutual selection, students, schools, and enterprises sign a tripartite agreement. For students who are 16 years old but not 18 years old, a quadripartite agreement must be signed by the student, guardian, school, and enterprise to determine the rights and specific positions, teaching content, and rights protection of the student during on-the-job training.
Encourage pilot schools to adopt the modern apprentice system and cooperate with enterprises to carry out pre-employment training and transfer training for enterprise employees.
The experimental school must reform the talent training model.
The school and enterprises jointly design the talent training plan, and jointly formulate professional teaching standards, course standards, job standards, enterprise master standards, quality monitoring standards and corresponding implementation plans.
The pilot is designed to cultivate a cycle of training, and the internship time of students in enterprises is determined according to the professional talent training plan, and the top-level internship generally lasts for 6 months.
In the practice of enterprises, the enterprise team management model should be implemented, and according to the characteristics of different professions, one master can lead 2-5 apprentices to form a learning group, so that students can master the skills required for each training post.
According to the arrangement, from 2016 to August 2019, my city determined 60 city-level modern apprenticeships in three batches, and the number of people in each batch was about 50, and the total number of students (apprentices) was about 3000.
According to the principle of first testing and then promoting, from the point to the face, gradually promote the establishment of the long-term mechanism of school-enterprise joint enrollment, joint training and integration of education, and effectively improve the employment skills of students, and improve the employment rate and employment quality of students.
My app says delivered but I haven't received it
Just ordered take-out, I don't know if it was left on the door
Then call for a replay
I live in Shau Kei Wan, why did the order go to the Kai Ho Garden?
Did you get the address wrong?
This vacuum cleaner has been considered for a long time, and it was finally cut with a grudge. The suction effect is good, and the indoor dust is significantly reduced. It is a bit heavy to hold it with one hand. The wet mop needs to be improved, and there will be dust marks when it is returned. Overall, it is very satisfactory.
The cooking machine is very heavy, and it looks very high-end. It is suitable for me, a kitchen novice, and my child says that it tastes better than I can cook. I have made two meat and two vegetarian dishes, and the sweet and sour pork is particularly delicious. It takes a long time, but the other dishes take very little time, and the noise is very small. You don't have to worry about making a mess, and you don't have to worry about not knowing how to do it!
After receiving the goods, I was so eager to cook three dishes that I couldn't wait until noon. It was really technology that changed life. The control of heat and seasoning was precise, and the taste of the dish was directly upgraded to the level of a professional chef. It was good. For those who are not good at cooking, this is a godsend, and I recommend that you buy it!
I have added a new member to the kitchen.
The intelligent cooking machine can automatically control the temperature and automatically stir-fry.
No longer have to be afraid of being scalded by hot oil, no longer have to be afraid that the fire is not controlled well and the food is burnt or stuck.
The dishes cooked by me were much tastier than the ones I made, and the tomato fried eggs were especially delicious, and the eggs had a very good texture.
This pot is a good buy.
It's good and worth buying, and it's very good.
Overall, it was very good, very clear, and consistent with the description.
Worth having.
The customer service is also very good.
The screen is large, clear, and does not tire the eyes, and no other abnormalities have been found.
It is thicker than the mainstream display now, and the bezel is a bit wider, and the gap between the bezel and the screen is a bit large, but the screen display effect is good, and the accessories are complete.
The delivery is fast!
The service attitude of the merchants is good!
After a while, the quality is good, and the screen resolution is also very clear.
The stock market is very good, and it is too perfect to score 4 points.
The delivery was fast, the things were good, and the second machine I bought was indeed a good thing. The picture quality is high, and it is not distorted because the screen is big. The interface is complete.
The experience is good, the color is restored well, and the quality is good!
China Children's Center will hold a series of activities to let children "high-tech" on the "61" - China News Service
On May 20 (Huang Xiaohui, Zhou Shanshan) reporter learned from the China Children's Center that from May 28 to June 1, "Children's Day" before and after, the China Children's Center plans to hold a series of activities such as children's innovation experience, children's visual art festival and parent-child book festival, so that children can spend "Children's Day" in the charm of the latest technology.
It is understood that the activities held by the China Children's Center during the Children's Day on June 1 this year include the Children's Future Learning Carnival, the First Children's Visual Art Festival, the Book and Children's Carnival, and the "Family Love Reading" series of activities.
Li Zhongming, deputy director of the China Children's Center, introduced at the media conference held on June 20, 2016, that the "Love Family, Create Cool" Children's Future Learning Carnival is the key event for the China Children's Center to celebrate Children's Day this year.
The activity focuses on organically integrating social innovation with family personal creativity, through the participation of children and families in various innovative education activities, making innovation practice become the cultural gene of the masses, and making “doing things” become the new learning and living way of the whole family.
It is reported that the “Love Family Create Cool” Children’s Future Learning Carnival includes dozens of cutting-edge science and technology experience contents such as the “Bean Fruit Maker” experience activity, the 1st anniversary celebration of the “Old Cow Children’s Exploration Hall” and the “Explore the Whole Family Love Children’s Carnival”, the VR public experience plan, the “Creator Tribe” interactive workshop and so on.
Five-flower meat fried rice becomes five-flower meat pickled rice
Will we have to buy $100 or $200 worth again?
It is worrying how long it will take to complete
Okay, I'll take care of it.
Was it given to me by the same rider?
Can you help me follow up?
The restaurant said the food had been cooking for more than half an hour
But no-one has taken food from the shop
South African doctor: Omicron's transmission power is strong, but most are mild
Many doctors and medical experts in South Africa believe that the disease caused by the new coronavirus omicron variant is milder than that caused by the delta variant, although it spreads faster.
According to the Associated Press, as the spread of the Omicron variant in South Africa, a group of more than 5,000 doctors in Johannesburg reported that the symptoms of the patients they are currently treating are relatively mild, such as body pain and cough similar to flu.
Dr. Unben Pillay, the director of the organisation, said he was seeing dozens of patients each day, but none of them needed to be hospitalised.
"They can control the disease at home, and most people recover within 10 to 14 days," Pelley said.
He said it includes older patients and those with underlying health conditions, who are more likely to fall seriously ill with COVID-19.
He said that compared to the previous Delta outbreak, the new coronavirus patients he treated had "difficulty breathing and low oxygen levels.
Many will be admitted to hospital in the coming days."
Other doctors have also shared similar experiences in the two weeks since the first case of the omicron variant was reported in southern Africa.
While it will take several weeks to collect enough data, doctors' observations and early evidence have provided some clues.
According to the summary of the South African National Infectious Disease Institute: In the recent few weeks of hospitalization of new coronavirus patients, only 30% of them are severe cases, which is half of the proportion of severe cases in the first wave of the epidemic; the average hospitalization time has been shortened from 8 days to 2.8 days; among the recent new coronavirus patients, only 3% died, while in the early cases in South Africa, the death rate was as high as 20%.
Dr. Willem Hanekom, director of the Africa Health Research Institute, quoted data from the National Institute of Communicable Diseases and other reports to say: "At the moment, all indications are that this is a mild disease."
He also said, "It's still early, and we need to get the follow-up data.
In normal circumstances, hospitalization and death occur later, but we are only two weeks into this outbreak. ”
At the same time, scientists around the world are observing the number of cases and hospitalization rates, and testing the effectiveness of the current vaccines and treatment methods.
While Delta remains the world's main coronavirus strain, cases of the Omicron variant are appearing in dozens of countries, with South Africa as the epicentre of the outbreak.
According to health officials, new cases in the province in the first week of December increased by 400% and tests showed that more than 90% of the cases were attributed to the Omicron variant.
Thanks to today's supporters, all 80 boxes have been delivered!
The ingredients of the beauty tonic:
The function of white fungus: sweet and neutral, benefiting the lungs, stomach and kidneys; having strong essence, nourishing the kidneys, moistening the intestines, benefiting the stomach, nourishing the blood, strengthening the heart, replenishing the blood, moistening the lungs, replenishing the body, nourishing the brain, lifting the spirit, beautifying the skin, prolonging life; used to treat diseases such as phlegm and cough with phlegm, dry cough, irregular menstruation, inflammation of the stomach, constipation, and other diseases; for patients with yin deficiency and fire excess, it is a good supplement.
The function of pectin: bitter, neutral, enter the large intestine and bladder.
Effects: It can stop diarrhea, relieve pain, and can also replenish water and moisten the intestines. If there are people with constipation, they can eat more plum gum.
The role of wolfberry: sexual balance, sweet, enter the liver and stomach meridian.
Beneficial to the liver and eyes, nourishing the liver and kidneys, whitening and nourishing the skin, supplementing the deficiency and replenishing the essence, and delaying aging.
The role of red dates: sweet and bland, nourishing the spleen and stomach, and having the effect of nourishing the spleen and stomach and replenishing qi and blood and calming the mind. If the spleen and stomach are weak and qi and blood are insufficient, insomniacs can take more red dates.
The function of dragon's eye meat: sweet and warm, nourishing the heart and spleen, suitable for those with weak heart and spleen.
Dragon fruit can moisturize the skin, nourish the blood and calm the mind, and is suitable for people with poor blood circulation and insomnia.
The effect of lotus: sweet and bitter, neutral, heart, spleen and kidney meridians.
To nourish the heart and mind, to relieve anxiety and insomnia, to nourish the stomach, to improve forgetfulness, to calm the heart and relieve thirst, to nourish the deficiency and stop the stasis of the essence.
Therefore, this beauty soup is not only a dessert, but also a health tonic!
Eating more can make you feel better!
And it won't cost you as much as honey, and it won't make your pocket bulge!
This food has cooled down, and the food may spoil
Order #NUMBER# was originally expected to be delivered at 18:40, but was later changed to 19:15!
Dinner time is limited, please handle it as soon as possible!
I didn't get it
How can it be completed in 5 minutes after ordering?
The actual discount code details are where you can see
Education Times Evaluation: What can be done to rescue abducted children?
If we compare the famous public interest advertising slogan "Without buying and selling, there is no killing", then in the good environment without the demand for "kidnapping", group prevention and control, and the whole nation's anti-kidnapping will make the act of kidnapping unprofitable, risky and costly, and this kind of crime will not happen repeatedly.
Recently, the Criminal Investigation Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security has launched an emergency release platform for missing children developed by the National Bureau of Missing Persons.
This is an Internet information platform set up to provide an authoritative channel for the release of missing children information and to recover abducted children in a timely manner.
When I heard the name of this app, I felt very warm.
The new technology methods are not only called "artistic" and "sentimental", but also well applied to information technology, which is practical and effective.
The primary goal of enforcement is to recover the abducted child and protect the child's physical safety and freedom.
The second is the trial and punishment of the suspects.
The significance of criminal punishment can be listed as individual punishment, social prevention, and legal education.
But before the breakthrough of the case, the safety of the victim should be the top priority.
Matters of great urgency, such as "Should child trafficking be punishable by death?" or "Should child trafficking be punishable by death?" can be temporarily shelved, and can be discussed carefully; but the issue of rescuing children who have been trafficked cannot be ignored.
According to the experience of such cases, human traffickers tend to leave the scene as soon as possible after committing the crime.
The search for a missing child can be delayed for a minute, and the child may be further away from the parent, making the case more difficult to solve.
In this case, it is an effective way to help solve the case and find the children by taking out a direct platform such as " Reunification " platform.
After all, "kidnapping" is a major task that requires the operation of the entire legal system.
Fighting crime, protecting the rights of children and parents, from improving the law, to the protection of the law, and from the meticulousness of the law enforcement, there is no need to neglect the care for the young and the weak.
In addition, the prevention of child trafficking from the family to the society can also be done better.
For example, a common case is that a family of three was resting at the train station, and the parents were sleeping soundly, only to find that the child was missing.
It is not possible to expect a two-year-old to have sufficient self-protection skills, but as a parent of a young child, you should at least have some awareness of protection.
Parents taking turns to rest, or placing their children in a safe environment, are the most basic means to prevent children from being abducted.
From another perspective, the purchase of trafficked children should also be paid attention to and punished.
A single act of wrongdoing is often just one link in a long chain.
According to the Criminal Law of China, the statutory punishment for the crime of trafficking in children is 5 years in prison; in cases of particularly serious circumstances, the punishment may be death, and the property may be confiscated.
The crime of trafficking in children is obviously a crime of heavier punishment in the trend of "lightening punishment".
There are still many cases of trafficking every year.
It can be seen that some people's views on raising children are lagging behind, and their legal awareness is weak.
The legal education for this group of people should be synchronized.
To effectively control the crime of trafficking, it is not enough to rely solely on official strict enforcement.
If the “market” of kidnapping exists widely, the kidnappers will be greedy and constantly innovate in their kidnapping methods, forming a situation of “fighting” with the law enforcement officers. It is inevitable that the anti-kidnapping action will fall into a low-efficiency muddle.
Therefore, eliminating outdated ideas and popularizing legal knowledge can also help to combat child trafficking and child abuse.
Yang Haodong delivered the spirit of the 19th CPC National Congress and the Provincial Party Congress at the Maolan Mountain
Drawing inspiration from the centennial struggle of the Party
Hunan Daily, December 10 (Full-media reporter Gong Baowei) According to the unified arrangement of the provincial party committee, on the morning of December 10, the provincial party committee standing committee and the provincial propaganda department minister Yang Haodong made an interactive lecture in the video and creative park in Maolan Mountain. In-depth study and implement the spirit of the 19th CPC National Congress, study and implement the spirit of Xi Jinping’s important speeches and instructions, and study and implement the spirit of the 12th Provincial Party Congress.
Yang Haodong, from the ideal belief, the initial mission, self-revolution and the youth party, the leader of the party and the theory of the party, combined his own understanding and personal experience, and explained in depth and comprehensively the core meaning and practical requirements of the spirit of the 19th CPC National Congress.
He pointed out that we should learn the spirit of the National Congress and the important instructions of General Secretary Xi Jinping on the important speech of the 18th CPC National Congress, and integrate them into the study and practice of the spirit of the Provincial Party Congress, so as to strengthen the self-consciousness, political self-consciousness and action self-consciousness of upholding the two established and safeguarding the two maintained, and firmly move forward in the direction indicated by General Secretary Xi Jinping.
In the interactive exchange session, grassroots cadres, enterprise representatives and young people asked questions about the relationship between the three historical resolutions, how to understand the decisive significance of “two established”, how cultural enterprises should grasp the direction, and how young people in the new era can draw strength from the history of the Party. Yang Haodong answered the questions with simple language and vivid examples. He hoped that young Party members would draw strength from the history of the Party’s struggle and unite closely around the CPC Central Committee, and firmly follow the Party and write the responsibility and responsibility in the book of youth.
The number of college graduates in Beijing area in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000 - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, 2022 (reporter Yang Na) The reporter learned from the 2022 Beijing College Graduates Employment and Entrepreneurship Work Video Conference jointly held by the Beijing Municipal Education Commission and the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau that the number of college graduates in Beijing in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000, an increase of 16,000 over the previous year.
Relevant officials of the Human Resources and Social Security Bureau of Beijing Municipal People's Government said that they will deploy the employment work of Beijing college graduates from the aspects of strengthening the matching of supply and demand, strengthening policy support, expanding employment channels, ensuring difficulty relief, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship, and improving service efficiency.
Reporters learned that the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau will build a practice platform, increase the supply of jobs, actively contact the 40 job experience bases for graduates, visit the recruitment units, integrate the demand information and the job information, and focus on the “six one batch” to expand the recruitment of enterprises, expand the recruitment of state-owned enterprises, expand the recruitment of grassroots projects, expand the recruitment of those who want to serve in the army, expand the recruitment of employment trainees, and expand the employment of entrepreneurs to promote employment.
In fact, it was not the shop that was at fault, or the rider.
No receipt on the bag
No trace to be found
I hope you understand
Because the delivery time is 30 minutes faster than the display
Thank you
Yes, a new rider has been recruited
He's waited a long time.
The restaurant has been saying it has been dealing with it.
After waiting for a few hours
The International Olive Oil Council divides olive oil into two main categories: virgin olive oil (virgin olive oil) and refined olive oil (lampante olive oil or refined olive oil) and five grades.
Cold-pressed olive oil, also known as extra virgin olive oil, is the oil extracted from the fresh olive fruit by mechanical cold pressing, filtering and other treatments to remove impurities.
According to the acidity, it can be divided into three levels:
Extra Virgin Olive Oil (EVOO): is the highest quality and most expensive olive oil, it is a pure natural product.
The taste is excellent, with a delicate and pleasant plant fragrance, and the acidity is less than 1%.
High quality extra virgin olive oil (Fine Virgin): slightly higher acidity, but not more than 2%, pure and fragrant taste.
Ordinary virgin olive oil (virgin olive oil): The taste and aroma are still good, and the acidity does not exceed 3.3%.
Refining olive oil refers to the olive oil obtained after the initial pressing of olive oil with an acidity level of more than 3.3%, or becoming "second oil".
Refining olive oil can be divided into two levels:
Ordinary olive oil (olive oil): Refined olive oil is mixed with a certain proportion of virgin olive oil to adjust the taste and color. Its acidity is less than 1.5%, and it is transparent and light yellow.
Refined olive-pomace oil or olive-pomace oil (Refined Olive-Pomace Oil): is obtained by extracting and refining the oil from the residue.
If you have seen the grading system, you should have already noticed that the acidity of olive oil is a very important indicator.
You should know that the olive fruit is like the grape used to make wine, and the olive fruit from different production areas and different varieties of olive fruit will produce different grades of olive oil.
The best place to grow olive trees:
The Mediterranean coast has the most suitable soil and climate conditions for growing olive trees, including the most suitable soil and climate conditions for growing olive trees, such as sunshine, air humidity and rainfall.
Apart from the Mediterranean coast, it can only be sporadically planted in other areas.
The main production area and the place of production (the Mediterranean Sea):
Italy, Spain, Greece, Turkey, Portugal, Morocco, Syria, Israel, Tunisia, Algeria, Egypt, Pakistan, Lebanon, etc. have climates similar to theirs, and are located in the southern hemisphere, such as Argentina, Peru, South Africa, etc.
The olive harvest month:
The period from mid-March to mid-June is the time when the olive trees flower and bear fruit, and the fruit begins to develop and mature from mid-July to mid-October, changing from green to red, purple, and finally black.
November to February is the harvest season for fruit (the freshness of olive oil is very important).
The nutritional composition of olive oil:
Olive oil is rich in monounsaturated fatty acids, such as oleic acid and linoleic acid, linolenic acid, vitamin A, vitamin B, vitamin D, vitamin E, vitamin K, and antioxidants.
Olive oil is considered to be the most suitable oil for human nutrition among all the oils discovered so far.
The Democratic National Convention ended, and Biden said that the flame of freedom would never be extinguished
The online "Summit for Democracy" (Summit for Democracy) hosted by US President Biden concluded on Friday (December 10) with the participation of leaders from 110 countries around the world, government officials, civil society and private sector leaders.
In his closing remarks, Biden said the flame of freedom burns in every heart, and authoritarian regimes will never extinguish it.
He also said that plans are underway to hold the second global "Democracy Summit" next year.
Taiwan government representative and political commissioner Tang Feng and Hong Kong democracy activist Roy Kwong, who is currently exiled in the UK, also spoke at the summit on the second day.
Biden said, "We know the work that's in front of us is going to be hard.
But we know that we can meet challenges because I have said before, as this summit has shown, democracy is everywhere.
An authoritarian regime can never extinguish the tiny flame of freedom that burns in the hearts of people all over the world. ”
Biden also said that defending democracy requires the effort of the whole society.
He said: "As leaders of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, to strengthen the bulwarks of democracy, to drive reform, to achieve transparent accountability, and to resist more effectively the forces of authoritarianism and incumbency, and those who seek power before the public interest. "
The second day of the “Democracy Summit” will focus on defending human rights, consolidating democracy and resisting authoritarianism, and countering digital authoritarianism and affirming the value of democracy.
This day is International Human Rights Day.
UN Secretary-General António Guterres also said in his opening remarks on the day that democracy is facing challenges around the world, especially the challenges brought by new digital technologies.
He said: "Now is the time to reaffirm our common values and positions and our democratic resilience.
This requires deepening social dialogue, addressing inequality, fighting corruption, updating social contracts, investing in quality education, and expanding opportunities for women and girls.
This also requires a firm condemnation of all forms of populism, nationalism and extremism, including the use of all the tools provided by the technological revolution. "
Hong Kong human rights activist Ronny Tong delivered a speech through a pre-recorded video at the summit, reminding the participants to continue to pay attention to the human rights situation of Chinese minority groups such as Uygurs and Tibetans.
He said: "For a long time, the world has not established a mechanism to hold China accountable for its rise.
That's why political leaders and civil society leaders must work together.
We must use all the resources we have (resources) to ensure that the revival of democracy is our top priority."
Lo Kuan-chung also called on the free world to unite to counter the threat of the CCP.
He said: "Maybe some of you are afraid of angering General Secretary Xi Jinping, maybe some of you don't want to lose the Chinese market, maybe some of you don't realise (the Communist Party's) threat to our democratic values.
And that's why we failed.
That's why we have to change. "
Taiwan's Executive Yuan Minister Tang Feng attended a roundtable discussion on "Fighting Digital Authoritarianism and Affirming Democratic Values" and released a "National Statement" through video, emphasizing that Taiwan is at the forefront of the fight against authoritarianism and power.
He also shared his experience in combating the COVID-19 pandemic through information transparency and building trust.
He said: "At a time when Taiwan's democracy is in its infancy, we have always stood at the forefront of the global fight against authoritarianism, and played a leadership role in promoting global freedom, democracy and human rights.
During the pandemic, authoritarian governments around the world have justified human rights violations in the name of public health and the common good, and global democracy has been retreating.
However, in Taiwan, we do not have to lock down the city to control the epidemic, and we do not have to remove the fake information. ”
At the same time as the second day of the "Democracy Summit", the United States Treasury Department announced the imposition of sanctions in accordance with the law on 15 individuals and 10 entities in China, North Korea and several other countries that have been determined to have seriously violated human rights, and imposed investment restrictions on a Chinese company that has been determined to have used surveillance technology to assist in the violation of human rights.
Pictures have already been taken and uploaded to you.
I know.
But the restaurant doesn't know why it's continually pushing back delivery times
Originally, it was #NUMBER#.
Well, I didn't call
Not eaten
I will definitely complain
Why didn't you say it earlier if you couldn't send it?
By the time you get there
No, I didn't get a call.
Please notify him to send it back to our company.
I don't want to wait another #NUMBER# minutes.
A meal took an hour and a half
None of #PRS_ORG# has been delivered.
I want to cancel the order
Why not cancel?
Hello, the chicken in the restaurant is alive
I wanted to try tennis, but I was afraid that I would not be able to persevere, so I wanted to first find a similar price to practice.
In fact, the price is often directly proportional to the friendliness, and if you can't tell the difference, then the expensive ones are more friendly than the cheap ones, which are actually industrial waste.
They are very weak, and the ball hits the bat, and the vibration is very large. The hard ball cannot hold it, and the expert is very difficult to control.
The logic and subtext of their words are - tennis is so hard, you know you can't learn, you know you can't afford to buy the expensive ones, so we'll sell you the cheap ones, you'll play twice and won't want to play anymore, so this shot is cheap, and you won't mind.
When you can really tell the difference, that means you have progressed, and then I will come here to buy the expensive ones, and I will make twice the money.
It is recommended to spend the same amount of money to buy a second-hand racquet that is a little better, choose Prince or Dunlop, because these two brands are not well-known, so the good racquets are not expensive, and a new racquet priced at 500 or 600 is good enough. A second-hand racquet priced at 200 yuan is not bad, and you can enjoy the joy of a thousand-yuan racquet.
It is very friendly to beginners, but after the beginner stage, it is useless, but most people, especially girls, cannot pass the beginner stage.
The order has been delayed several times in delivery time.
Can you follow up on this?
Postponed
Thank you
That is to say, I already have credit?
Do I need to place another order? I wonder if I didn't need to pay attention to that one?
Hello, I ordered food from this restaurant, but the food was missing a lot and the chicken was raw
#PRS_ORG# I have no connection with the organization. Please cancel.
I ordered delivery, and there was no self-collection at all.
Jiangxi will train 10,000 rural elementary school music teachers in three years - Xinhua
On May 22, 2019 (reporter Chen Yushan) The reporter learned from the Jiangxi Provincial Education Department that from 2016, Jiangxi Province planned to train qualified music, art and physical education teachers for each primary school in rural areas of the province in three years, totaling 10,000.
It is understood that the training object is the rural primary school teachers in Jiangxi Province who are 45 years old or below and have the basic knowledge of music, art, and physical education, and can serve as teachers for other disciplines of music, art, and physical education.
Through training, they will master the basic knowledge and teaching skills of the discipline of aural and musical aesthetics, update their teaching ideas and concepts, master modern teaching methods, improve their discipline teaching ability, activity design ability, campus cultural ability and self-development ability, and build a team of aural and musical aesthetics teachers with multiple specialties to alleviate the lack of aural and musical aesthetics teachers in rural areas.
In order to ensure the quality and effectiveness of training, Jiangxi also plans to train 100 primary schools in the province (cities, districts) to train 1 person in music, art and physical education, a total of 300 trainees, to comprehensively improve their teaching demonstration and leadership ability, teaching and research activity design and organization ability, training ability, and network training workshop construction ability, and play the role of teaching, demonstration, guidance and supervision.
Because waiting another 20 minutes is already an hour #NUMBER# minutes
I don't want to eat food that I made one hour ago
I've found the buyer of the wrong order
But my wheel went missing
This article is for you to choose the best face cream.
How good is the face cleanser cream?
1. Hanfu skin care products and makeup sets, moisturizing and moisturizing, whitening and removing spots, brightening skin color, light-sensitive whitening gift box, five-piece set gift box (cleansing milk, cleansing water, milk, essence, eye cream)
Recommended reasons: It has the effect of tightening skin, repairing collagen, shaping firm skin, saying goodbye to sagging skin, improving eye tail wrinkles and fine wrinkles around the eyes, and the moisturizing effect is very excellent. It can quickly penetrate the skin.
The shelf life (years) is 5, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, whitening, net content (mL/g) set, the product packaging has a gift box, suitable for mixed skin types, the effect is to whiten, the effect is to moisturize, the effect is to moisturize, the product packaging has an outer box, the effect is to tighten, the product packaging has a seal, the product origin is Jiangsu Suzhou, whether it is a special purpose cosmetic or not, the effect is other, there are now more than 14,000+ people who have evaluated it, and it has received a 99% positive rating, and it is evaluated as extremely good, the packaging is good, and it is high-end and atmospheric.
2. Korean skincare and makeup set with hyaluronic acid and mild and clean water, moisturizing and moisturizing, large water light moisturizing luxury gift box, six-piece set (facial cleanser, toner, emulsion, essence, cream)
Recommended reason: It has the effect of repairing, moisturizing, whitening and toning the skin. It can improve the problem of rough skin and large pores, and is suitable for mixed skin. It is clean and not dry after washing.
The shelf life (years) is 5, whether it is a special purpose cosmetic, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, suitable for mixed skin types, moisturizing, suitable for skin ages 25-34, net content (mL/g) 120ml+120ml+100ml+6g*3, moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the product packaging has a seal, the product is produced in Jiangsu Suzhou, and there are currently 7700+ people who have evaluated it, and it has received a 99% positive rating. It is evaluated as being refreshing and comfortable, with good moisturizing effects, and a high-end atmosphere.
3. OSM makeup set by Ou Shi Man, a set of skin care products for women (cleanser + toner + eye cream + emulsion + face cream)
Reasons for recommendation: It deep cleans the skin, helps to remove the dust and oil on the skin, tightens the pores, and can effectively nourish the skin and moisturize the skin. It can effectively improve the yellowing and color spots on the skin, and can improve the skin's dark yellow and color spots. Regular use can help improve the skin's self-repair ability and help the skin recover its firmness.
The shelf life (year) is 4 years, and the product is produced in Huzhou, Zhejiang Province. Whether it is a special purpose cosmetic or not, the effect is to soothe and relax, the effect is to whiten the skin, the net content (mL/g) is packaged, the effect is to moisturize, suitable for any skin type, the effect is to moisturize, the product packaging has an outer box, the effect is to refine the pores, the effect is to deep clean, and there are now more than 220,000+ people who have evaluated it, and it has received a 98% positive rating. It is comfortable to use, of high quality, and packaged well.
4. Hanhoo Red Garnet Fresh Six-Piece Set (Skin Care Makeup Set for Moisturizing and Nourishing, Student Girl Washing Milk Moisturizing Cream Eye Cream Gift Box)
Reasons for recommendation: Deeply clean the pores, soften the aging keratin, tighten the skin, smooth the facial fine lines, soften and plump the facial skin, moisturize while improving skin quality, and prevent the occurrence of fine wrinkles. It is suitable for all skin types and is gentle and non-greasy.
Hello, how long will it take for the food to be delivered
They have finished their work.
Your rider's phone is #PHONENUMBER#, their name is #NAME#.
Please give a reasonable explanation
Yes, but your rider is a problem, please handle it well
If you can check if it is still on the road, it would be better to pick it up.
OK, if not, then return the money for the meal
In fact, there are many things to pay attention to when dressing and matching for chubby girls.
The skirt worn by chubby girls should not be too short or too long, and the length should be about knee-length, which can cover the fat on the thighs.
If the skirt is too short, it will reveal the fat on the legs.
If it is too long, it will make people feel short and fat.
If you wear out the three parts of the upper, middle and lower, it will make you look taller. The upper body, skirt and long stockings are different colors, which will produce a sense of elongation.
In fact, many dark-colored clothes are the must-haves of chubby girls (the author has a deep understanding of this), and dark colors are also a good way to cover your body fat, and the elegant black short skirt is also the first choice for chubby girls.
Wearing dark colors, especially black, short skirts, will make you look thinner.
If your legs are chubby, don't wear socks or shoes that draw attention to your legs.
The more popular it is, the less colorful it should be.
To avoid people feeling fat when they notice your legs and feet.
For the slightly chubby girl, we must talk about the tricks of dressing and matching.
Chubby girls should not wear tight-fitting short skirts, and the tops should not be too short or stuffed into the skirts, which will make people feel uncomfortable. If the legs are thick, they should wear black long stockings or mesh stockings (the kind with fine grids), and choose soft printed bell-shaped skirts, which can cover the shortcomings of chubby girls.
Of course, chubby girls are also picky about wearing short skirts.
Overweight girls should choose a shirt of the same color as the short skirt, so that the effect of increasing the height of the body will be achieved.
Short skirts paired with high heels can make your legs look longer, which is the most popular combination in summer!
If you are a top-heavy but leg-thin person, you should choose a glamorous dress with a long skirt.
It not only covers the big belly, but also shows your advantages.
The A-line short skirt is very slimming, and it is more suitable for chubby girls. The top should choose a body-hugging one to form a sense of layering.
A simple white T-shirt and short skirt is also a good choice for plump people.
Skinny girls are also able to pull off the look.
If you can master the rules of dressing and matching, then the chubby little girls will also be the focus of public attention.
After the change in dressing and matching, we should also exercise more in life, and try to get rid of the label of the chubby girl as soon as possible 😄
The 18th World Beverage Innovation Awards is jointly organized by FoodBev Media and Brau Beviale International Beer, Wine and Beverage Industry Exhibition in Nuremberg, Germany.
279 works from 25 countries and 22 different categories were attracted.
The list of finalists was announced on October 15, and the list of winners will be announced online on November 11 (British Summer Time).
We saw that LP28, a sugar-free yogurt from Mengniu, was shortlisted for the Best Dairy Drink Award, while the “GOGO Wuhan” marketing campaign from Yili was shortlisted for the Best Marketing Activity Award, and the packaging of Coca-Cola and the People’s Daily’s new media cooperation was shortlisted for the Best Packaging Design/Label Award.
Laura Nettle, senior marketing manager at FoodBev Media, said: "We're delighted to be celebrating the 18th anniversary of the World Beverage Innovation Awards with Brau Beviale.
From new flavors, new concepts and new functions to brands, packaging and manufacturing, we have seen the trends in the beverage industry as the industry continues to innovate in a more sustainable way.
The World Beverage Innovation Awards recognized the most ambitious new products and developments in the global beverage industry this year.
Here is the full list of finalists in each category.
Ardagh Group's technology can re-melt 100 percent of recycled glass into new bottles.
The water in the box is packaged in a bag, and the packaging box is 100% recyclable, reducing the packaging by 66% and reducing carbon emissions by 97%.
LatCub is 100% biodegradable, uses less paper, and does not use environmentally harmful glues or tapes.
Ardagh Group's technology can turn 100 per cent of recycled glass into new bottles.
The final winners will be announced on the FoodBev Media YouTube channel on November 11 (UK summer time), and we will continue to report for you!
Why so long
Starved to death
From 7:30 a.m. to now
Don't answer if you can't
I can go out and buy food, I don't need to stay here #PRS_ORG#
Xinhua News Agency + | The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League has ignited the enthusiasm for the 2022 Winter Olympics - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, Beijing Dream ING team player Pang Yaotian (zhong) scored a goal in the match.
On that day, the 2021-2022 season Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League continued to compete at major ice rinks in Beijing.
This season's league is divided into regular season and postseason, and the participating athletes are aged between U6 and U18. The groups are set up as the competitive group and the selection group. A total of nearly 3600 players from 256 teams from all over the city participated.
The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League has developed for more than ten years, and has become a platform for young ice hockey lovers in Beijing to exchange technology and make friends, and has delivered excellent players to the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Team and the Youth Team.
The league has played a positive role in promoting the development of ice hockey for young people in Beijing, and has fanned the enthusiasm for ice hockey in the Winter Olympics and laid a foundation for the development of ice hockey in Beijing in the post-Winter Olympics period.
Girl as target for sister's donation: "It's just a flesh wound" - Xinhua News Agency
A girl stands in front of a large wooden board at Wulin Square in Hangzhou, with the words "human flesh target, ten yuan per arrow" written on it.
Yesterday morning, a photo of a "Hangzhou girl as a 'target' for her sister's donation" went viral on social media.
The photo shows that a girl stands in front of a wooden board that is slightly higher than a person in Hangzhou Wulin Square, and the words "human flesh target, 10 yuan per arrow" are written on the wooden board, indicating that after paying, passers-by can use the bow and arrow to shoot.
The incident has caused a stir among netizens.
Last night, the propaganda officer of the down-town branch of the Hangzhou Public Security Bureau confirmed to the reporter of Xinjing that the police confirmed that the girl made such a radical move because she was collecting donations for her sister, but this kind of behavior should not be encouraged, and the girl left the local police station yesterday after being warned.
Girl on street 'arrow target' fundraiser told off
In the picture circulated on the Internet, a long-haired girl stood in front of a large wooden board, and the words "human meat target, ten yuan per shot" were written on the wooden board, and her bank account, WeChat and Alipay account were written on another wooden board in front of her.
The image has sparked controversy online.
Some netizens thought that this was a "self-deprecating begging behavior", and many netizens expressed sympathy for it.
"We were patrolling the square at around 10 a.m. on the 23rd when we discovered the situation. At that time, there were already a lot of onlookers. "
When local media interviewed the police officers at the scene, they said that there were two girls who were selling goods, both of whom were around 20 years old and dressed in a youthful and beautiful manner.
Among them, the girl who was made into a "human target" has been crying, asking passers-by to play this game; the other girl stood by and shouted, saying that her friend's sister had leukemia and urgently needed an operation, please help.
"We have contacted the local police in Guizhou and learned that the girl was raising funds for her sister's leukemia treatment. "
Last night, the propaganda officer of the Hangzhou City Public Security Bureau's Sub-Bureau told the reporter of Xinjing Daily that the girl's name was Ji Jiali, and she was collecting donations for her sister Ji Jiali.
But since the treatment still costs more than RMB 300,000, he couldn't think of a good way to raise funds, so he did this.
He said that throughout the entire process, one of the girls served as the target, while the other was responsible for shooting, but did not participate, and no one fired arrows throughout the entire process, only that someone watched and took photos and posted them on Weibo.
Police later determined that the bow used was not controlled.
The official said, "It is not advocated to take this way of soliciting donations."
After being warned by the police station, she left the police station.
Heat dissipation effect: good; light weight: convenient; appearance material: satisfactory;
The new machine is very good.
Stable performance, no problem with four outlets for heat dissipation, worth recommending
This is a good game of the dark knight dragon, the workmanship and materials are sufficient, and the brand is assured!
The price of the Lenovo Dark Knight Knight Dragon is not expensive.
Personally, I think the shadow knight dragon of Honghu is really good, and the game effect: the game effect is refreshing, and it can play most of the games. My chicken all high** frame rate is very stable, and it is very smooth. LOL is also not a problem, and CSgo is also easy to handle. Most of the three a games can be played.
Cooling effect: The cooling effect is good, and the fan is very powerful. It is quiet when working, and the gaming effect is good when the fan is fully opened.
Appearance material: The appearance is very cool, and the display effect is very good: the screen is very clear, and 1080 is enough to play games
Buying a notebook feels good, mainly used for design. The cost performance is very high. It is lighter than expected and prettier than expected. The red on the buttocks is a very good wine color. It is not as vulgar as expected. Overall, it is much more valuable than expected. It is worth buying. Girls are also suitable.
Two years ago, I started to contact the dark knights of Hefei, and it took two years to come. The cost performance is relatively high, and the quality is good!
I also recommended my friends to buy this product!
We have already purchased the three machines in this series!
The appearance is beautiful and the configuration is also good
He bought it for his nephew for the 418 bank activities, but he needed it urgently, so he bought it in advance. As a result, he missed the big activities of the bank. It was a bit regrettable.
However, the price-performance ratio is quite high, and the logistics are also quite fast. I will come back to review it after a period of time.
A brand new original, with a very high price-performance ratio, with a very good design style, and has already installed Windows 11 and Office 2019.
The effect: bought the child to do 3D rendering, the software has been installed, the child said that it can be used normally, and the performance of this computer can do 3D design work.
He said it was a good buy for his son.
The computer is good, especially the customer service attitude is very good, if you don't understand, it is recommended to buy.
It's also good, and the graphics of playing games are really good
What is the most popular thing in 2021?
Undoubtedly, the Tokyo Olympics.
Do you think only Olympians can win?
Some time ago, an article titled “Quick Look! Project Managers Can Win Gold in Olympic Projects” was very popular. The article mentioned that project managers in many projects can absolutely win the first place, and no one can compete with them: moving bricks, going on business trips, and staying up all night are the daily work of project managers. Firefighting, carrying the pot, and apologizing are not worth mentioning.
It seems to be a joke, but it also reflects the daily bitterness of project managers. Behind it is a lack of enthusiasm for the current project management work.
And personnel engaged in project management are gradually choosing to get out of the predicament of work through some actions.
From the increasing number of PMP (Project Management Professional) applicants, more and more project managers are learning to improve their project management skills.
According to the 20th Anniversary Report on the Development of Project Management in China (1999-2019), as of September 2019, the total number of PMP® applicants nationwide was nearly 600,000, and the number of PMP® certified was about 420,000, and the number of valid certificates was about 300,000, accounting for 31.2% of the total number of PMP® certificates in the world.
In the past 10 years, the number of PMP holders has been increasing year by year. This shows that more and more project managers have realized that it is no longer possible to do things by simply copying the past "old experience". The rapidly changing work environment makes us know that we must learn to stand on the shoulders of scientific giants to explore the road ahead.
However, can PMP certification ensure that project management work is smooth and without obstacles?
Many project management beginners said that through learning related courses such as PMP/IPMP, they can systematically master the knowledge points of the ten domains and five process groups of project management, but when they actually engaged in project management work, they were still in a fog.
Many project managers often feedback the following problems: project management cognition is not enough, relying on personal experience, there is no project management theory, not knowing how to practice; lack of systematic project management process system support, unable to land in work, project estimates are not accurate, control sensitivity is poor, the project is dragged on; unclear division of labor, the "old man" in the team does not know how to deal with cross-departmental assistance communication is not smooth, the project is difficult to progress ...
Therefore, for more than ten years, it has helped many excellent enterprises to cultivate a large number of product managers, project managers and other R&D key talents, and has won the honorary titles of "China Enterprise R&D Talent Training Demonstration Base" and so on.
The online training course of "Project Manager Training Camp" is a kind of online fragmented learning method, which combines the real cases, tools and methods of many R&D enterprises, and helps you master the essential knowledge and standard actions of project managers, and embark on the path of advanced project management.
This is also an opportunity for enterprises to promote the cultivation process of project managers with lower costs and less investment, and bring efficient operation results to enterprises.
The course is not only taught by Zhongtian Huaxia experts (the former Huawei R&D management team), but also combines international advanced project management theories and many real business scenarios from well-known enterprises. The course content is explained in a professional and easy-to-understand manner.
It will also provide scientific and practical management tools and methods, rich templates and forms, and help students convert what they have learned after class into specific work.
One dumpling order?
Why did the thief have six fingers?
Before the Double 12 shopping festival, Jingxin calls for rational consumption - Economic Observer - professional financial news website
This year, the “Double 11” carnival of the national network payment business transaction amount reached 1.77 trillion yuan, which was higher than that of the previous year.
The dazzling variety of red envelopes and live-streaming sales have once again made consumers shout out their benefits. This consumer boom on one hand makes people marvel at the strength of national consumption, and on the other hand, it cannot help but think about the impact of consumerism on society and the mainstream consumer group in contemporary society.
Before the “Double 12” arrives, Jingxin Consumption Financial Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as “Jingxin”) issued a rational consumption advocacy, reminding all users, especially young people, to establish good consumption awareness and consumption habits, and reject blind consumption and excessive consumption.
The results of the 2020 Consumer Financial Literacy Survey and Analysis Report released by the People's Bank of China showed that the national consumer financial literacy index was 66.81, an increase of 2.04 compared with 2019.
In general, Chinese residents have performed well in financial consumption, but there are large differences in financial behavior and skills, which need to be further improved in basic financial knowledge.
The financial literacy level of the elderly and the young is relatively low, and “one old and one young” will still be the focus of financial education. Nielsen’s “China Young Debts Report” and CCTV’s “2019-2020 China Youth Consumption Report” show that the young generation has huge consumption potential, and credit consumption has become an important way to upgrade consumption. 86.6% of young people are using credit products, and nearly half of them do not have debt accumulation. Although the young generation as a whole shows a trend of rational consumption, it is far away from the label of “overspending” by the outside world, but some young people do have overconsumption and imitation consumption behaviors, and they have created a lot of financial pressure and debt risk, and even caused social problems to increase gradually. Financial enterprises should actively assume social responsibilities and carry out positive guidance.
As a licensed consumer finance institution, Credit Suisse has always been committed to helping people build their own happy lives with high-quality and caring services, advocating that consumers establish good and correct consumption habits, and actively respond to regulatory calls to improve the rational consumption awareness of consumers, especially young people.
In the past few years, Credit Suisse has carried out comprehensive and diversified financial knowledge dissemination activities targeting young people, including college students, through various forms such as launching innovation practice competitions in cooperation with domestic top universities, to rationally guide young people's consumption demand, help them establish rational consumption concepts, plan their consumption demand reasonably, and thus help them accumulate wealth in their lives.
As the Double 12 arrives, Jingxin reminds all consumer friends to establish reasonable consumption awareness and correct money views, resist blind consumption and overconsumption, avoid the consumption debt trap, and avoid affecting personal credit and economic life in the future.
Consumers must plan ahead and repay their debts in a timely manner.
If it is overdue, the overdue record will be recorded in the individual credit report, which may have a negative impact on the purchase of a car and the purchase of a house in the future.
At the same time, when enjoying financial products and services, it is also necessary to choose regular institutions and channels, and pay attention to whether the relevant institutions have the qualifications to operate.
In the future, ZTE will continue to rely on its mature and reliable consumer finance system and continuously updated and upgraded financial products to provide consumers with more personalized and diversified services, and help consumers cultivate the concept of rational consumption and moderate borrowing, and become a trusted consumer finance partner for life.
I won't go
I am a delivery man.
No one has contacted me in an hour, it's a complete online scam
You thought I was calling for takeout for the first time?
After the survey, you said the same thing! I checked the address several times before placing the order
Okay, thank you! How many days is it?
Vietnam News Agency - Gulf Cooperation Council should respond to common challenges
The stops for King Salman include Amman, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Qatar, Bahrain and Kuwait.
It is noteworthy that this is the first visit to Qatar by the Crown Prince since the Saudi Arabia and its Arab allies imposed a blockade on Qatar in the middle of 2017, which led to the Gulf diplomatic crisis.
In this crisis, Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates, Bahrain and Egypt cut off diplomatic relations with Qatar and imposed a comprehensive ban, accusing Qatar of supporting terrorist organizations and having close ties with Iran.
The diplomatic tension has seriously affected the internal unity of the Gulf Cooperation Council and has had a negative impact on the economy of the region.
Four Arab countries have blocked land, sea and air routes to Qatar.
The crisis was only resolved at the Gulf Cooperation Council summit in January 2021, when all Gulf states signed a pact mediated by the United States and Kuwait to move towards "unity and stability."
Saudi Arabia has reopened its border with Qatar.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt are making efforts to restore relations with Qatar through their newly appointed ambassadors in Doha.
The Gulf Arab states' efforts to resolve their differences and restore relations with Qatar are driven by the need to unite in the face of common challenges in order to meet the interests of all countries and regional stability.
During the visit of the Saudi Crown Prince to Oman, the two sides agreed to open the first direct land route between the two Gulf countries.
The 725-kilometer-long channel connecting the two countries will provide convenient conditions for citizens of the two countries to travel and integrate the supply chain.
The Saudi Public Investment Fund (PIF) will invest $5 billion in Oman, and 13 memorandums of understanding worth $30 billion were signed between the two countries' companies.
Saudi Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman is on a visit to Gulf states as Iran and world powers negotiate a nuclear deal known as the Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action (JCPOA) - a deal that Gulf Arab states have condemned for failing to address their concerns over Iran's missile program.
All Gulf states have long regarded Iran as a "competitor" and viewed Iran's nuclear program as a "threat" to regional security.
Gulf states believe that not addressing the Iranian missile issue and not taking action to contain Iran's activities in the region is flawed.
Under the background that Saudi Arabia and Iran did not meet the wishes of the Gulf countries in the nuclear negotiations with major countries, Saudi Arabia and Iran held direct negotiations.
Its goal is to prevent the escalation of tensions in the region.
It is one of the factors that have slowed economic growth in Gulf Cooperation Council countries.
The upcoming summit of the Gulf Cooperation Council will be the first summit of Gulf Cooperation Council countries since the dispute between some member states and Qatar ended.
This is an opportunity to re-evaluate the contributions of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) to promoting unity in the Gulf, while proposing measures to fully cooperate with its member states to address common challenges and contribute to the stability and development of Gulf countries.
It has not been delivered until 9:30 pm, and the deposit must be refunded and the order cancelled.
Okay
It is said to be the loudest exhaust sound in the New Town area!
This car that our team has brought to you is a dream for many men!
It is the flagship supercar of Lamborghini, the successor to the Murcielago, the Aventador LP700-4!
The price is nearly two million, the annual road tax is tens of thousands, four-wheel drive, why is it called LP700?
With 700 horsepower, can you imagine how fast it is?
Well, I don't know, the data says that it only takes 2.9 seconds to accelerate from 0 to 100 km/h, which is about the time it takes myvi to reach 30 km/h.
The low-slung body, the ostentatious scissor doors, the huge air intakes all over the body and the glass-topped 6.5 V12 engine perfectly illustrate the style of Lamborghini.
There is no need to say too much about the car model, just Google it yourself. We have collected some explanations that Google may not have given.
Too much attention, where to go, everyone is looking, very uncomfortable! (In fact, it's a bit funny)
1km petrol cost RM1 (owner doesn't care)
Practice getting in and out of the car, otherwise it can be a bit embarrassing (because you won't be able to climb into the car cabin and then get stuck halfway).
The engine noise is too loud, and it is deafening when you get out of the car (but it's very cool).
The car is too big, and it is very narrow when it is parked in a normal parking space. It is afraid that it will be knocked by the door when the door of the next car is opened!
A little lonely as there was no one to overtake (I was just talking to myself, haha)
Please don't misunderstand, this supercar is not for sale, sorry!
If you want to take a video for your beloved car, welcome to contact us!
More car news you don't know about, in The Car Guide / 人民汽车志
A car accident worth millions of dollars!
Bugatti Chiron and Porsche 911 are known to car lovers, and Chiron is one of the most expensive supercars in the world, while the price of Porsche 911 is also in the million-level!
Just a few minutes ago, a foreign car crashed into the million-dollar Porsche 911 and the million-dollar supercar Chiron!
As it turns out, you were right!
Let the spirit of the university resonate with the spirit of the times - Xinhua News Agency
The spirit of a university refers to a series of educational concepts and values that have been accumulated over a long period of time in the development of a university, which is the soul of the university.
From ancient times to the present, the spirit of the university is very important for the development of politics, economy, culture, science and technology, society, and even the progress of a nation.
From the birth of the world's first modern university, universities have carried out a unique mission that is different from other social organizations. For Chinese universities, the rise began in the autumn of national crisis, and its spirit has been deeply influenced by traditional culture and changes in the times. It advocates the value concept of "virtue and charity for the world" and the patriotic responsibility of "promoting learning and strengthening the country".
At present, the trend of informationization and internationalization in higher education is becoming more and more obvious, and the global education competition, science and technology competition and talent competition are constantly intensifying, and higher education as an important "supply side" is facing unprecedented opportunities and challenges in its structural reform.
In particular, the proposal of the “Overall Plan for Promoting the Construction of World-Class Universities and Disciplines” has not only shown the confidence and determination of China in moving from a high-education power to a high-education power, but also set higher requirements for the development of universities.
How to achieve the world-class ranking in a short period of time and accelerate the construction of several world-class universities and a number of world-class disciplines on the basis of a certain gap?
In addition to the confidence in the goal, the confidence in the path and the confidence in the ability, colleges and universities should fully play the three advantages: the first is the late advantage, through continuous introduction of outstanding academic talents from overseas, learning from the advanced experience of world-class universities, to achieve a significant improvement in academic level and teaching quality; the second is the cultural advantage, inheriting the wisdom of Chinese civilization accumulated over 5,000 years, and promoting the development of excellent traditional culture, so as to consolidate the strength, shape the brand, and improve the image; the third is the institutional advantage, leveraging the institutional superiority of socialist countries, strengthening goal-driven, gathering consensus and working together to optimize resource allocation, so as to provide a sustainable and solid guarantee for the school to accelerate catching up with the advanced level of the world.
It is particularly important to realize that it is impossible to build a world-class university with one school. Each school must highlight its own advantages and characteristics while playing to its strengths.
The features of education should both have the common Chinese characteristics and reflect the unique target positioning, educational tradition and resource endowment of each institution of higher learning.
For Zhejiang University, we focus on three aspects in our education: one is to highlight the characteristics of cultivating innovative and entrepreneurial talents, to build an integrated person training environment that combines science and education and school-enterprise integration, and form a complete chain of entrepreneurship education ecology; two is to highlight the characteristics of cross-disciplinary aggregation, to promote the optimization and adjustment of the disciplinary system, and to create an institutional environment of cross-disciplinary integration, to actively cultivate cross-disciplinary new emerging disciplines and flagship cross-disciplinary achievements; three is to highlight the characteristics of educational and social services, to carry out in-depth international exchanges and cooperation, to accelerate the formation of a pan-Zhejiang University cooperation system between production, education and research.
In this process, it is particularly important to always adhere to the spirit of the university and make the spirit of the university resonate with the spirit of the times.
For Zhejiang University, the “Seeking Truth and Innovation” school motto, the “Diligence, Virtue, Clarity of Mind, and Diligence” common values, and the “Embrace the River and the Sea, Enlighten the True Heart, Open the Way for the People, and Build a Country for the World” common values constitute the latest expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University.
This is an important guarantee for schools to adhere to the correct direction of education and continuously accumulate cultural height and gather spiritual strength. It is rich in connotation and far-reaching in significance.
Among them, "Hainan River River" emphasizes the spirit of openness and inclusiveness, which is reflected in the spirit of "using the world's talents for me", and is manifested in the pursuit of high-quality ideas for education and research of world-renowned institutions of higher learning. "Qi Zhen Houde" emphasizes the spirit of seeking truth and goodness, which refers to the university's pursuit of truth and goodness, and means that the university should not only pursue truth, but also accept the shaping and tempering of morality and personality. "Open up before the people" embodies the spirit of reform and innovation, which includes both the pursuit of knowledge and the innovation of research, and is manifested in the reform and development, and the innovation of the old and the new. "Tree my country and my country" emphasizes the spirit of patriotism, which means that the university should always be with the destiny of the nation.
This series of spiritual concepts and values is the soul of Zhejiang University's 120-year history.
"The wise listen to silence, and the wise see what is not seen."
Chinese universities should further stand on the global stage of socialist cause, deeply grasp the times and historical mission of higher education, and accelerate the construction of a world-class university.
At the same time, adhering to humanistic care and independence, let the university spirit and the spirit of the times, and the national spirit resonate with each other, so as to provide inexhaustible motivation for the realization of national strength and national rejuvenation, and the realization of the common ideal of mankind.
Ordered a set and got two things wrong
Order
Want to pay the service fee to the rider
How can I pay now?
Iran President: If sanctions are lifted, nuclear talks may reach an agreement - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tehran, December 11 (Reporter Gao Wencheng Wang Shoubao) Iranian President Rouhani said on December 11 in Tehran that if the United States lifts the sanctions on Iran, the negotiations on the comprehensive agreement on the Iranian nuclear issue can be reached "a good agreement."
According to the Iranian president's website, Raisi said during a meeting with Iranian ambassadors to neighboring countries that Iran has proven its willingness to negotiate by submitting proposals to other parties involved in the nuclear agreement.
If the United States is determined, " the road to reaching an agreement will be smooth. "
The parties to the Iran nuclear agreement began to hold talks in Vienna, the capital of Austria, in April this year to discuss the issue of restoring compliance with the agreement.
The new round of talks began on November 29 in Vienna, and was temporarily suspended on December 3, and resumed on December 9.
No delivery yet
Please contact the rider
Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Bay Area Science Forum - Xinhua
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11, 2021, President Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Bay Area Science Forum.
Xi Jinping pointed out that the world is undergoing a historic change unseen in a century, and global science and technology innovation has entered an intensive and active period. The new round of science and technology revolution and industrial transformation has had a profound impact on the global economic structure.
The Greater Bay Area should focus on the strategic positioning of building an international science and technology innovation center, and strive to build a global science and technology innovation highland to promote the development of new industries.
China is willing to work with scientists and international science and technology organizations around the world to strengthen international science and technology exchanges and cooperation, strengthen research on major scientific issues, promote common scientific and technological breakthroughs, deepen scientific and technological cooperation on key scientific projects, and jointly promote the development of world science.
The 2021 Science Forum in the Pearl River Delta opened in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province on the day, with the theme of “Exploring the Future and Sharing Science”. It was co-sponsored by the Guangdong Provincial People’s Government.
Yes, the order is in the acceptance state.
But the restaurant said it had to cut up the meat and discard the bones because the courier didn't deliver the bones.
Do you understand my question?
It is not a delay in orders.
Or you can call me directly
Are you following?
The longest period of time for college students to study and start a business in Guangxi is up to 5 years - Xinhua News Agency
On May 19, the Nanning branch of Xinhua News Agency (reporter Zhang Ying) learned from the Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region Education Department that in the future, all colleges and universities in Guangxi will implement a flexible curriculum, relax the upper limit of college students’ study leave, and extend the period for on-campus students to suspend studies to start a business by 2 to 5 years on the basis of the existing academic calendar. The period for on-campus students to suspend studies to start a business can be regarded as a period of practice education.
In order to promote the improvement of college students' innovation and entrepreneurship ability, the education, human resources and social security departments of Guangxi work together to build a platform for entrepreneurship, build more college students' off-campus practice teaching bases, university science and technology parks, college student entrepreneurship parks and incubation bases, and provide external guarantee for college students' entrepreneurship.
According to the requirements, by 2020, the innovation and entrepreneurship practice area of each college should reach more than 3000 square meters for undergraduate schools and more than 2000 square meters for vocational schools.
The government encourages colleges and universities to set up innovation and entrepreneurship credits, and supports students who perform well in innovation and entrepreneurship practice to transfer majors.
Every two years, college teachers must spend at least two months to work in industry enterprises to improve their awareness and ability of innovation and entrepreneurship education.
The Education Department of the Autonomous Region requires all universities in Guangxi to implement the innovation and entrepreneurship training plan for college students in depth, and strive to make every college student participate in one innovation and entrepreneurship training plan during their school years.
Colleges and universities should actively organize students to participate in various levels of innovation and entrepreneurship competitions, and provide financial support.
NEWS GOV-MO: Australia awards honorary doctorate to seven distinguished individuals
The University of Macau held the “2021 Conferment Ceremony of Honorary Degrees and Higher Degrees” on the 11th day of this month, and awarded the Honorary Doctorate of the University of Macau to Liu Zunyi, Chen Kaixin, Nakamura Shuuji, Li Lanjuan, Li Xiaoling, Zhu Liliang and Jiang Chaohui for their outstanding achievements and significant contributions to the development of society and education.
At the conferment ceremony, the Governor-General and Chancellor of the Australian National University, Professor You Yuanyuan, on behalf of the Chancellor of the Australian National University, Professor Lin Jingcheng, and the President of the Australian National University, Professor Song Yonghua, conferred the degree of Doctor of Philosophy.
Liu Zunyi was awarded the honorary Doctor of Education degree, Chen Kaixin was awarded the honorary Doctor of Philosophy in Science, Nakamura Shuuji was awarded the honorary Doctor of Philosophy in Science, Li Lanjuan was awarded the honorary Doctor of Philosophy in Science, Li Xiaoliang was awarded the honorary Doctor of Philosophy in Business Administration, Zhu Lili was awarded the honorary Doctor of Philosophy in Science, and Jiang Chaohui was awarded the honorary Doctor of Philosophy in Science.
When he delivered his speech, Ouyang Yu expressed warm congratulations to the seven outstanding individuals who were awarded the honorary doctorates, and expressed deep respect to them for their outstanding achievements in different fields, and made outstanding contributions to the development of the country and the progress of the world. At the same time, Ouyang Yu expressed the most sincere blessings to the graduates and parents, and also expressed sincere respect to the dedicated and excellent teaching staff of the university.
Professor Sun Yifeng, a professor of the Australian Academy of Humanities, read Liu Zunyi’s eulogy when he delivered a lecture, and said that Professor Liu Zunyi was an internationally renowned economist who was famous for his outstanding academic achievements and forward-looking educational ideas.
In addition to his achievements in economic development, economic growth and East Asian economic fields, he was also a visionary educational leader.
In short, he has made outstanding contributions in many fields.
Sun Yifang read the eulogy of Professor Nakamura Shuuji, saying that Professor Nakamura Shuuji was the pioneer of sustainable energy technology.
He was one of the three winners of the 2014 Nobel Prize in Physics for inventing blue light-emitting diodes (LEDs).
Professor Nakamura's invention not only completely changed the lighting industry, but also led to the widespread use of white light-emitting diodes in daily life and industrial production, and made a great contribution to human welfare.
Sun Yifang read Li Lanjuan’s eulogy, saying that Li Lanjuan, as a pioneer in the Chinese artificial liver industry, created a unique and effective Li artificial liver system, which made a major breakthrough in the treatment of severe hepatitis and liver failure, and significantly reduced the mortality rate of liver failure.
In this battle against the new coronavirus, she and her team proposed the "four-pronged attack and two-balance" plan and brought three major technologies of artificial liver, micro-ecosystem and stem cells, which significantly improved the rate of critical treatment.
Sun Yifang read Li Xirong’s eulogy when he delivered his speech, and said that Professor Li Xirong laid the foundation for innovative research on operations management, shaped the thinking of supply chain theory and practice, and completely changed the business models of all countries in the world.
Li Xiaoliang is known for popularizing the concept of the long tail effect in operations management, and has explored measures to deal with this phenomenon.
Now, in the face of the pandemic and the tense economic situation, the long-term effect has become more and more prominent, and the supply chain has been severely damaged.
Li Xiaoliang's far-sighted research, such as the delivery of coal in the snow, has helped the industry to cope with difficulties and brought huge social value.
Sun Yifang read out Zhu Lili's eulogy, saying that in her scientific research work, she found a breakthrough and innovative staining technology to prepare samples, which has a high reputation in the domestic and international scientific circles.
She has won important titles such as the International Eurasian Academy of Sciences and other prestigious titles for her outstanding achievements in science and technology. With her brilliant achievements, she has won the deserved high position in the world's science and technology holy land.
Professor Chen Xinxuan, the acting dean of the Chinese Medicine Research Institute of the University of Macau, read the eulogy of Professor Chen Kaixin, saying that Professor Chen has engaged in drug research for more than 40 years, and his outstanding scientific achievements and important contributions to the country, Macao, the University of Macau and the National Key Laboratory have earned him a high international status and reputation.
His active promotion of the development of traditional Chinese medicine in Macao and the Greater Bay Area fully reflects his sense of mission to contribute to the national pharmaceutical development strategy.
The president of the University of Technology of Australia, Mr. Cheng Zhongxin, said that Ms. Jiang Chaohui has participated in the development of major inventions and patents, and has accumulated more than 15 inventions and patents related to storage virtualization, navigation, file system and power management, which are all practical and widely used, and have greatly improved the convenience of human life.
As an inventor with great achievements, Ms. Jiang often makes high-tech and theoretical knowledge easy to understand and popularize to the public.
Finally, Chen Kai, as the representative of the honorary doctor, read the speech of thanks.
He was very pleased to see that the pharmaceutical industry in Macao and the Greater Bay Area has established a good model: from the first national key laboratory for Chinese medicine quality research established by Australia to the rapid development of Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area, Australia has made great contributions in integrating outstanding talents in the field of Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area.
In addition, he believes that the management team of the Australian University has foresight, and not only provides students with research soil in academia, but also delivers many responsible talents to society.
He was very honored to have the opportunity to communicate and cooperate with the University of Melbourne, and sincerely congratulated the achievements of the University of Melbourne in recent years.
Did he have the right address?
I haven't seen it yet
The rider went wrong and I didn't get it
But I #PRS_ORG# received
The app has not been able to contact the rider
My family thought I didn't
But it's been an hour already
As NFTs took off, the crypto community also introduced a new concept.
In 2021, a blockchain game called “Axie Infinity” had a huge impact in Southeast Asia, and some residents who lost their jobs due to the pandemic began to earn stable income through this game.
Axie Infinity is a pet-raising game based on blockchain technology, which combines a variety of play methods, including NFTs, and is currently the highest-volume NFT project, with more than $3 billion in transactions to date.
According to the data of TokenTerminal, the daily income of Axie Infinity exceeded $82 million, and it was approaching “Honor of Kings”.
On August 6, Axie Infinity announced that its daily active users exceeded 100,000.
The popularity of Axie Infinity will pass on a new "palytoearn" model to more people, through the help of blockchain and smart contracts, players are no longer a single role, in addition to being able to get pleasure and economic benefits from the game, they can also participate in the governance of the game ecology.
This subjectivity is not granted by the game developer, but is guaranteed by blockchain technology.
When I saw the news about my friend's stock, my biggest feeling was that the company's choice, that is, the choice of the investment target industry, should first choose the industry with a large growth space, with a market size of at least RMB100 billion; secondly, it should choose the industry with good growth potential, and consider the industry with the best growth potential in the next 3-5 years; finally, it should choose the industry with policy support.
The width of the track refers to the market size, the length of the track refers to the development stage of the industry, and whether the track is flat or rugged refers to the competitive pattern of the industry.
Go for the gold!
The first thing in the new year is to summarize the adjustment of 2021 and adjust the 2022 tactical layout.
Tactics is about "doing the right things," which means doing things right.
The strategy is to "do the right thing," which means to do the right thing.
The strategy is to find a direction, and the tactics are to land, and there is space for strategic thinking above most tactical thinking.
For example, how to increase the number of customers (tactical thinking) can be considered whether to deepen the current field or expand horizontally (strategic thinking); how to improve customer retention rate (tactical thinking) can be considered how to improve the retention rate of core customers and high-value customers (strategic thinking); how to improve the participation rate of activities (tactical thinking) can be considered how to set the correct activity KPIs and achieve the correct activity goals, such as improving the participation rate of target customers, activating high-value silent customers, and precision reactivation; how to improve DAU (tactical thinking) can be considered whether the current growth is healthy and sustainable.
It has been 12 years since Bitcoin was born. In 2021, Bitcoin celebrated several milestones.
On September 7, the small Central American country of El Salvador made Bitcoin a legal tender, making it the first country or region to make Bitcoin a legal tender.
On October 12, the US Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) approved ProShares to launch a Bitcoin ETF for the first time in eight years, and listed it on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE), marking the first compliant Bitcoin futures ETF to land in the US capital market, and expanding the scope of Bitcoin investment.
From the perspective of blockchain technology development, Bitcoin is not the main character.
On November 14, 2021, Bitcoin underwent a soft fork upgrade called “Taproot”, which improved the anonymity of transactions on the Bitcoin network and reduced the data burden of transactions by changing the data structure of the block itself.
No McDonald's sauce
If that McChicken was actually cooked, it would be so hard to eat
Is your $32 discount code good enough to buy enough
Is it possible to cancel in less than 15 minutes?
I'm entering the code, why is it confirming the order?
Okay
I didn't get the discount?
Hello
The order was not delivered
The rider has been taken to hospital
I hope you will be punctual, not because I want your coupons!
Did you encounter any problems with the initial registration of the primary price?
Overdue registrants did not provide proof of continuing education; Overdue registrants should provide proof of continuing education for at least 30 hours in the past year; Re-registrants should provide proof of continuing education for at least 120 hours in the past 4 years; Re-registrants should provide proof of continuing education for at least 30 hours per year.
Cost engineers continue education fee standard
The cost of engineers who participate in online continuing education must pay tuition fees to each management agency when they register. Generally speaking, the tuition fee for compulsory courses of 30 hours is 300 yuan/person/year (including the unified teaching materials of continuing education).
The cost of the 30-hour elective course is 300 yuan per person per year.
The cost of compulsory courses and elective courses totaling 30 credits is 600 yuan/person/year (including unified teaching materials for continuing education).
(1) Participate in the continuing education and learning of the registered cost engineer network organized by the China Association of Cost Engineers or the provincial and departmental management institutions, and calculate the learning hours according to the time recorded in the online learning materials.
(2) Participate in the concentrated face-to-face training and various types of training classes, seminars, etc. organized by the China Price Association or the management agencies of various provinces and departments, and each half-day can be recognized as 4 hours of study.
(3) Continue to provide training for price engineers, cost engineers, and cost accountants at all levels of provinces and departments, and recognize 10 hours of training per half day.
(4) Participate in the research and study of the China Council for the Promotion of Standards, provincial-level research projects, and the preparation of industry standards, and each item is designated 30 credits per year.
(6) Participate in the national qualification examination for construction cost engineers, write the teaching materials, write the questions and answer papers, and recognize 30 hours each year.
(7) Engineering cost-related professional papers and books published with the author's own signature and published in a formal journal.
Publishing a book of 10,000 words is equivalent to 12 hours of study.
The publication of papers in national journals is evaluated at 8 credits per thousand words, in provincial journals at 5 credits per thousand words, and in municipal journals at 3 credits per thousand words.
(9) Enterprises that are approved or authorized by the Price Consulting Enterprise Organization, the Provincial Price Consulting Association, and the Provincial Management Organization can organize public training for the society (excluding management and skills training for enterprises in general). A total of 4 hours of training can be recognized per day, and a maximum of 30 hours of training can be recognized per year.
The cost engineer network continues to learn
After the registration agency receives the fee, the student's identity is immediately opened, and the cost engineer can enter the online education classroom with the user name and password.
Students learn through online lectures, question-and-answer sessions, and online discussions.
If you forget your password, you will not be able to log in when you log in, and you cannot log in when you are learning. Please contact the registered institution and the registered institution can help you change your password (but cannot change your username), and use the modified password to log in again.
Scan the QR code to download the Baidu Tieba client
Watch the high-definition live broadcast and video!
Please arrange delivery
My order hasn't arrived
The delivery man did not deliver the goods.
Please notify the delivery person immediately, we are still waiting
The restaurant had given the food to the rider within 30 minutes
The visual wedding photography base (Hebei store) has not yet opened a branch
The wedding dress fashion is ahead of the times, and the makeup artist is also the best. The shooting technology and angle are professional, and the shooting effect is very good.
The seller is very reliable and the service attitude is also very good.
The makeup is very delicate, and the team service is also very good. This trip is very happy, and the professional team is very good. The seller's service attitude is very good, and he will introduce it to his friends. I am very satisfied.
Thank you to the photographer and makeup artist for giving me a unique wedding photo.
Thank you to all the staff who took part in the wedding photo shoot today, and I look forward to seeing the final product.
Photographing a wedding is a real workout, especially for the photographer, who is running and jumping around.
The makeup artist was very kind to me and designed a suitable makeup for my face. The photography brother was humorous and funny when taking the photos.
Thanks to my photographer and makeup artist, I can still look this good at 53.
The woman from Quanzhou is pretty, has a good figure, and is a good wife and mother. Later on, she will be frugal and live a good life.
The groom was able to earn a lifetime of happiness and beauty.
The wedding photos are really good, just like what people say online, and we look very handsome and beautiful. We are very satisfied.
The seller's service attitude is also very enthusiastic.
This trip not only admired the beautiful scenery, but also took beautiful wedding photos, and met the photographer friend.
The wedding photos are so beautiful, and the photographer and makeup artist are really super professional.
I am very grateful to Sister Mu for her patience and careful guidance. I like the photos taken very much.
When I saw the wedding photos, I didn't recognize myself for a moment.
As long as the photographer is good, you can have wedding photos that are as good as those of a celebrity.
Photographing wedding photos is important because both the photographer and the make-up artist have to be online. Fortunately, I met both of them.
After seeing my wedding photos, I realized that I was also a "fraud."
Chinese-American groups complain of Ivy League discrimination - Xinhua
Xinhua News Agency Washington, May 23 (Reporter Xu Jianmei) More than 130 Asian-American groups submitted a complaint to the U.S. Department of Education and the Department of Justice on May 23 to protest the discrimination of Asian students in the admission process of three prestigious schools - Yale University, Brown University and Dartmouth College.
The Asian Pacific American Education Alliance, which filed the lawsuit, held a news conference in Washington, D.C. that day.
Zhao Yuankun, chairman of the group, said at the press conference that the number of Asian applicants who meet the admission requirements of American universities has doubled in the past 10 years, but the proportion of Asians in these three American universities is basically maintained at the same level.
Many studies have shown that these schools discriminate against Asian applicants in the "holistic" admissions process by "systematically and systematically disadvantaging Asian applicants."
Zhao Yuankang said that the research of Sanders and others in 2014 showed that in these three universities, the acceptance rate of Asians was the lowest among all ethnic groups relative to the number of applicants.
Data from the U.S. Department of Education also shows that among all Ivy League schools, Brown University and Dartmouth College have the lowest acceptance rates for Asian students, and Yale University and Brown University have implemented a de facto racial quota for Asian applicants for more than 20 years.
Zhao Yuankou told Xinhua News Agency reporters that they hoped that after filing a complaint, the Department of Education and the Department of Justice would conduct an investigation and take measures to prevent these colleges from continuing to discriminate against Asians in admissions.
They also hope that the colleges and universities that are complained about can actively pay attention to this issue and change their admission policies for Asians.
The three schools have not yet responded to the complaint.
The Asian American Education Alliance was founded in 2015, and had previously complained about Harvard University's discriminatory admissions policy, but the US Department of Education refused to accept the complaint on the grounds of procedures.
In addition to the American Chinese group, the complaint also includes American Indian, Korean, Japanese, and Pakistani education groups.
Utensils needed
Just cancelled the order
Why is it still being implemented
Can you check if it has been cancelled?
But I had already placed an order at 5:09 a.m.
It's a call-in line, and they don't know what they're talking about
Is it possible to call them directly?
In September 2020, Mr. Lu learned from a real estate agent that a factory building located in Zhutang Town, Yiwu, Zhejiang Province. After multiple visits to the site, Mr. Lu decided to purchase the factory building.
In December of the same year, after Mr. Lu negotiated with the owner of the factory and the family of the owner of the house, he transferred 200,000 yuan as a deposit by bank transfer on the same day.
Lin signed as the receiver on the “Agreement on the Deposit for the Purchase of the Factory”, which stated that “if the buyer does not want to buy the factory, the deposit will be returned to the seller. If the seller does not want to sell the factory, the deposit will be doubled and returned to the seller within one week. Both parties agreed to sign the contract for the purchase and sale of the factory within one week.”
However, after the two sides failed to reach a consensus on the main contract terms such as the scope of the factory building and the payment method, the house purchase and sale contract was delayed for a long time.
After several days, Lin returned the 200,000 yuan deposit to Mr. Lu.
The house had been so hard to find, the deposit paid, the mortgage sorted, all that was left was to sign the contract and the vendors pulled out, leaving Mr Lu in a state of frustration and anger.
For this, Mr. Lu filed a lawsuit against Lin at the Yuyao City People's Court.
The court held that the parties ultimately failed to sign a formal contract, and that the defendant should not be held liable solely for the breach of contract. Accordingly, the defendant should not be liable for double damages for breach of contract.
The plaintiff appealed after the first trial.
Recently, the second instance court upheld the original judgment.
【Lawyers remind】 During the transaction process, it is necessary to pay attention to the obligation of prudence.
When signing the contract, the buyer should fulfill the necessary cautionary obligations, such as verifying the information of the property owner, whether the property has been occupied, and specifying the specific time and place of delivery in the contract to avoid disputes during the performance of the contract.
(Deutsche Welle Chinese) On Friday, after the "Democracy Summit" ended, China's Foreign Ministry spokesperson said in a statement on Saturday (December 11) that the United States held the "Leaders Summit on Democracy", which is "to draw a red line on democracy, instrumentalize and weaponize democracy, in the name of democracy, incite division and confrontation, and transfer domestic contradictions."
The Chinese government believes that "for a long time, the United States has imposed its political system and value concepts on people, carried out the "democratic reform", abused unilateral sanctions, and instigated the "color revolution" to cause disastrous consequences.
"Democracy" has long become the "large-scale lethal weapon" for the United States to interfere in other countries.
The summit is an action in line with Biden's campaign promises.
The two-day meeting will be held in video format, and leaders from 111 countries around the world have been invited, including leaders from Taiwan, but China and Russia were not invited.
Before the summit, China and Russia criticized the United States for having problems with its own democracy and said that the United States was not qualified to host such a summit.
There are also doubts internationally and in the United States, for example, about the invitation list, which included some leaders with authoritarian tendencies, such as the leaders of the Philippines, Poland and Brazil, and some people suspect that the purpose of the summit was not to promote democracy but to organize the summit for geopolitical purposes.
The new German Chancellor Scholz also attended the video democracy summit
The Chinese Foreign Ministry's statement on Saturday said that "today's American democracy is in a pathological state, and the problems of money politics, identity politics, party confrontation, political polarization, social division, racial conflict, and wealth polarization have become more and more severe." American democracy is based on the "rich man's game."
President Biden said in his speech, "As the leader of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the guardrails of democracy, push for reform, achieve transparent accountability, and resist the forces of authoritarianism and corruption that seek to undermine our democracy. "
He stressed that democracy is not a given, "We have to keep reinventing it in every generation, and I think that's the defining challenge of our time.
Biden also said that global democracy and human rights "are facing continued and alarming challenges, and democracy needs heroes to defend it."
The United States has promised to launch a one-year action after the Democratic Summit, which includes a $4.244 billion initiative to strengthen democracy around the world and support independent news media.
The United States hopes that countries will make specific public commitments before the physical democracy summit to be held in late 2022 to improve their democratic systems.
Biden said, "Let's all countries implement our commitments and report our progress next year."
Well, I just hope he got the address wrong
Jiangchuan Restaurant (Five-course restaurant)
Mint environment: ordinary [service bell] service: the dishes are served quickly "Gufamala cake" my must-order dish, the cake is too delicious, too soft, too good to eat😋 lovers of sweets must try the "Dongjiang...
The taste is good, the meat is good, and the service is enthusiastic.
It has been a long time since I came to Changsha, and the fruit is still so delicious and real. The first time I tried the pork dumplings, it was the southern taste of soft flour!
The congee was just right in terms of dryness, and the portion was very generous. The signature tinfoil chicken wings were as good as ever, and the soup was not bad either. The pickled radish was also handled well...
The food was good, the service was great and the meat was good.
The old shop in Jiashan is also a popular existence many years ago, and the Dongshan Xiao Lou, the wooden floor.
It was always a long wait to get a bowl of congee at the door, and the pots of congee were all cracked...
It has been a few years since I last went to eat at Dayang. The rise of various small shops has dispersed the flow of customers.
It was rare to find a table when we arrived, and the quality of the food was as good as ever.
The taste is good, and the meat is good, and the main dish is good.
Jichang Waimai.
[Rice] Meal: This time, the food was a little disappointing.
Three cups of chicken: the side dishes are a bit too much, and the chicken is a bit lacking.
The main flavor of this dish is a bit off, the bottom is not salty enough, which highlights the sweetness, and you can imagine the sweet + various seasonings...
What is the red card whiskey?
Everyone has different hobbies, some people like to collect, some people like to eat, of course, some people like to drink, Red Label whisky is currently one of the most popular Scottish whiskies in various countries, and Red Label whisky has won the Gold Award at the International Wine and Spirit Competition.
Every bottle of red wine has its own unique taste, but if you don't know how to appreciate it, you are wasting its flavor.
So how do you drink a red wine whiskey?
Briefly introduce it for you.
Red Card Whisky:
The Johnnie Walker Red Label whisky is made from 35 varieties of Scottish whisky, with a rich aroma and traditional Scottish whisky characteristics, with a sweet and smoky aroma in the rich aroma.
The entrance is fresh and slightly grassy with a strong smoky malt character.
It can be drunk straight up or mixed with your favorite drink.
Red wine entered the country, and in order to adapt to the taste of the Chinese people, red wine + cola or Sprite or new energy drinks have become a fashion that never goes out of style.
These sweet drinks can not only neutralize the sour taste, but also visually bring pleasure to people. When added to the drink, it can play the role of neutralizing the alcohol taste and changing the taste.
The most traditional way to drink whiskey is with a slice of lemon and a spoonful of sugar (sugar can also be used).
The original red wine has a little sour taste, and adding sugar can neutralize the sour taste. Lemon will give the wine a fresh aroma, of course, the sweet and sour degree can be adjusted according to personal taste.
The above three are the best ways to drink red wine. You can try them as a reference, and I hope that my introduction can help you.
Education thought: How the college entrance examination makes “tigers” and “tigers” - Xinhua News Agency
Three Lanzhou Jiaotong University students wrote letters to the school leaders to reflect their confusion about the university entrance examination, and proposed to increase the difficulty of the examination, change the examination questions, and make the examination truly reflect the actual level of students.
Indeed, for a long time, the college entrance examination has been a "hot topic."
In the university campus, students come from all over the country, with different levels of ability, and different learning levels. The learning situation is very different.
It is inevitable to have different feelings when assessing a group with such diverse features.
Of course, if the exam questions are single-type and the repetition rate is high, and the questions are too simple, it is inevitable to have a completely different feeling.
Students who are not diligent may be able to pass the exam with a concentrated attack before the exam, but if they want to try other methods, they may achieve twice the effect with half the effort.
In this way, there is a "nerd" who can pass the exam even if he does not put in effort during the day, and even get a high score; and there is a "genius" who does not fall behind in class, and the homework and notes are all good, and the exam is not much higher than that of the "geniuses".
It seems that the Lanzhou Jiaotong University students reflected the problems in the college entrance examination, which is not only Lanzhou Jiaotong University.
In this sense, it is praiseworthy for the three students who wrote letters directly.
In fact, everyone who has gone to university knows that there are many cases of students trying to get exam questions from teachers in various ways, trying to expand the exam scope, and getting “special tutoring” before the exam. Even in the exam, there are cases of cheating and asking teachers for help after the exam.
In my opinion, as a teaching quality evaluation-oriented measure, it is more about the comprehensive grasp of teachers on teaching and learning, and the scientific formulation of issues on the basis of this.
When entering the undergraduate stage, the major begins to specialize, and many major courses are based on basic knowledge.
It is undeniable that whether or not to comprehensively master the basic knowledge points of a subject is what the college entrance examination will test.
Undergraduate knowledge is basically the basic theory and basic common sense of the discipline, and the change space is not large, which is basically fixed.
As the teacher said, "I learned the basic knowledge of mathematics in college 20 years ago, and I am still learning it now, and it is the focus. "
But the knowledge points are basically unchanged, and it does not mean that the examination questions are single and repetitive.
In many universities, the exam is generally composed of a question group, and the senior teachers of the subject are responsible for the compilation of the exam paper, and the exam paper is also reviewed by all the teachers in charge of the subject, so as to overcome the problem of repeated questions to a certain extent.
But to design a set of test questions that are consistent with the actual situation of teaching and learning, the difficulty of the questions should be in a normal distribution according to the overall learning situation of the students, and the teaching situation should be comprehensively analyzed to comprehensively analyze the degree of students' learning, so that the exam questions can be dynamically grasped in terms of difficulty and type, which can highlight the examination of basic knowledge and comprehensively consider the examination of ability, and at the same time innovate the design of the questions.
Exams are the command rod of university education, and what kind of exam students will have a corresponding preparation plan. In the long run, it will affect the effectiveness of university education.
Lanzhou Jiaotong University highly values the advice letters from students, and has put in place a plan for rectification in the whole school.
Require each teaching unit to organize teachers to carry out self-examination on the comparison of teaching and course completion examination, formulate the examination paper and related regulations, and strengthen the supervision and inspection of the examination paper selection and review link, refine the grading criteria, and strengthen the comprehensive assessment of all teaching links.
From the perspective of mechanism, the problems of single-type test questions and repeated questions are issues that need to be faced by college entrance examination affairs. Of course, corresponding systems need to be established, but the key is daily work. Teachers need to have a comprehensive grasp of the teaching situation, not only to understand the teaching content, but also to understand the learning situation of students. Only in this way can teaching and learning be better connected, and the interaction between teaching and learning will be better. The examination will also be more in line with the actual situation, so that “the wise” and “the stupid” can each get what they deserve.
If I can't change the store location, can I have it delivered?
I don't need to give you another dime?
The orders have already been delivered
It didn't work out
GPS? Not yet.
The wedding photography (Nan Street store) of Mrs. Jin has not yet opened a branch
Before the photo shoot, we did not arrange the time properly, so we changed the time twice. Lan Lan, the consultant, patiently arranged the time for us.
Later, he chose a good weather weekend to shoot.
Kim's staff, whether consultants, makeup artists or photographers, are all top-notch.
That was my first time doing a proper makeup, wow, I can't believe that one day I will look like this, haha.
Xiaojie and another sister (sorry I can't remember her name) applied makeup very patiently, and the makeup was also very natural.
The outdoor scenes were filmed in Jiangwan City. Fortunately, the weather was good that day, and I didn't feel very cold while taking pictures. The make-up artist would occasionally pay attention to our clothes, headgear, and so on. If there was something wrong, they would immediately help us to arrange it.
The photographer is also very funny, and feels very happy after taking photos for a day.
When selecting photos, because I had seen many cases online, I didn't want to let the customer delete too many photos, but when we selected photos, really, there was no intention to add photos at all, and the 24 photos in the package were all added. (I heard that my cousin, who got married just a few days after me, had over 7,000 photos added to her package, bringing the total to over 8,000 photos. I was shocked at the time, and I was also afraid that I would select too many photos)
Today, the photos were repaired, and Lan Lan sent them to me. I saw two that were not good, and they immediately helped me to repair them.
I compared the photos taken by my sister before, and I felt that our photos were really satisfactory, simple and fresh, which was the style I wanted.
I sincerely recommend everyone to go to see the wedding photos of Mrs. Chan Han.
Set price: 3999 yuan
Mrs. Kim expressed her gratitude for your sincere wishes for her happiness and a bright future.
How much is this set?
That $32 can be used for what?
That's good, no need to refund
Your rider says he can't find it
Can't find
But I can't understand what he's saying in English.
The editor brings you which Omega mechanical watch is good?
How good is the Omega mechanical watch?
1. Swiss OmegaOMEGA flight series couple's watch, automatic mechanical men's watch, quartz women's watch
Recommendation reason: The inheritance of Swiss style, the time art is in the wrist, Omega is elegant and simple, but it is very attractive, and it can be worn in commuting and formal occasions.
The couple style expresses the sweet love between the two, and is always together, and the delicate pointer makes people feel infatuated.
No quotes
2. Swiss OMEGA (OMEGA) watch series Flightmaster steel bracelet automatic men's watch and women's watch 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001
Reasons for recommendation: Swiss-made, must be high-end, Omega watches, thin and elegant gold watches, couples' watches, which can both show one's noble identity and show the sweetness of love.
The pointer scale design makes the time scale clearer, and the table uses the popular blue table, and the overall design is simple and clear.
The brand Omega (OMEGA) uses a steel strap, blue dial, mechanical (automatic) movement, water resistance of 30 meters, pointer display, national insurance coverage, flat interface, stainless steel case, 39.5mm for men and 27.4mm for women, 20mm interface size, butterfly clasp type, artificial sapphire glass, three people have evaluated it, and it has received a 100% rating.
3. Swiss OMEGA OMEGA DEFY 244.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001 men's automatic quartz 424.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001
Reasons for recommendation: Swiss manufacturing, quality benchmark, the movement of this Omega watch is very accurate, the couple's design, simple and elegant appearance, the flow of time from the pointer edge, it is always moving at a steady pace, suitable for business people to wear, and release the charm of the wrist.
4. Swiss OMEGA watches, Diver's series, automatic mechanical watches, men's watches, fashion quartz watches, couple's watches, a pair of watches
Omega couple watches, a pair of watches, fixed price
Recommendation: The original imported from Switzerland, naturally makes it of excellent quality. Omega is elegant and simple, not flashy but very charming, suitable for both commuting and formal occasions.
Fashionable, full of beauty, full of feminine temperament, the jump of the pointer made me fall in love with you at first sight.
The watch is equipped with a stainless steel band, the movement is mechanical (automatic), the clasp type is folding, the waterproof function is 30 meters, the dial size is 39.5 for men and 27.4 for women, the display type is pointer, the warranty is nationwide, the interface type is flat interface, the table bottom material is stainless steel, the table color is white, the brand is Omega, the table interface size is 18mm, the table mirror material is artificial sapphire crystal glass, and there are more than 20 people who have evaluated it, and it has a 100% positive rating.
Do you want me to return the curry soup to you?
I only received half
There were six boxes that didn't have anything in them
The company is working overtime, and there is no lunch. I want to order take-out, but I don't know if it will be cancelled
Your name is Zheng Mei, and you've been in Japan for your second week.
You're walking down the street and suddenly someone is following you, and you're running faster and faster until you're running away.
He was behind you, calling out, "Miss! Please wait!" (all Japanese dialogue) You stopped at the convenience store.
"Miss... I am a director, I think you are very beautiful, would you like to participate in a reality show?"
You're suspicious, afraid it's a scam.
He hands you a business card and you find out he's the director of a major Japanese entertainment company.
"If you have time, we can go to the company to talk about the remuneration. The remuneration will definitely be less."
You came to the company in a hurry, and he said that he saw you on the street at a glance, and he really hoped that you could come.
You think you can make money without losing anything, so you sign the contract.
It is a large-scale love reality show, divided into two parts.
The earlier meetings will allow the stars and the public to get to know each other in real life, and to build a sense of trust.
Later, they will enter the game together to complete the challenge.
Next week is the official recording, and you don't know who your partner will be and what interesting things will happen.
So, is the system able to see the new orders?
So what happens to that rider?
I can't accept that the order has not been delivered after 20 minutes
3,200 newborns in Shaba without birth certificates due to fake paper shortage
(11th day of the month, Sabah) The National Registration Department of Sabah said that due to the use of special anti-counterfeiting paper, it has been unable to issue birth certificates to newborn babies since the beginning of October, and the cumulative number of affected people has reached 3,200.
However, director Khairul Aminus assured that all babies who have applied for birth certificates have their data recorded in the system and will be issued after the counterfeit paper is delivered next week.
He explained at a press conference that the 10-month-old report by a media outlet on the printing problem of the Sabah newspaper had been reported.
He said the issue has been around for two months, and Sarawak is also facing the same problem.
"One reason is that Chinese manufacturers producing customized anti-counterfeiting paper have been affected by the epidemic, resulting in delays in delivery to China. "
He explained that the security paper used by the Saipan newspaper is different from that used in other states, so it cannot be borrowed from other states.
Keralamunis revealed that the latest batch of anti-counterfeiting paper arrived in Kuala Lumpur on the 6th of this month, and was handed over to the printing company on the 8th for partial printing work.
"The bureau will send someone to Kuala Lumpur on Thursday to pick up the passports and print out the final stage immediately, which should take about two working days (Dec. 20) to deliver to the applicants. "
"We will notify applicants to go to the local branch to pick up the application forms. "
He added that Sabah has issued 24,801 birth certificates since this year.
From 7 p.m. to now
Is that it?
I mean food
I'm across the street from #PRS_ORG
Well, thank you, because the restaurant says it's ready.
People's Daily commentator: The 14th Five-Year Plan got off to a good start - - on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11, 2020 - People’s Daily Comment on December 12, 2020: “The 14th Five-Year Plan” has achieved a good start — — a commentary on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference
"Achieved a good start to the 14th Five-Year Plan " and highly evaluated the achievements of China's economic and social development in the past year at the Central Economic Work Conference held from December 8 to 10.
General Secretary Xi Jinping delivered an important speech at the meeting, deeply summarized the economic work in 2021, analyzed the current economic situation in-depth, made major deployments for the economic work in 2022, and provided a direction for our economic work in 2022 and provided fundamental principles.
We solemnly celebrate the 100th anniversary of the founding of the Communist Party of China, officially announce the establishment of a moderately prosperous society in all respects and the realization of the first centenary goal, and open a new journey of building a moderately prosperous society in an all-round way and entering the second centenary goal.
We held the 19th CPC National Congress, summed up the major achievements and historical experience of the Party’s century-long struggle, and passed the third historical resolution of the CPC Central Committee on the major achievements and historical experience of the Party’s century-long struggle, which is a political declaration for the Chinese Communist Party in the new era to remember the original aspiration and adhere to and develop socialism with Chinese characteristics. It is a guide for action to realize the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
Over the past year, the world has witnessed a once-in-a-century major change and the global spread of the COVID-19 pandemic, and the external environment has become more complex and severe. The prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic and the tasks of economic and social development are extremely heavy and arduous.
With Comrade Xi Jinping at the core of the Party Central Committee, the Party Central Committee adheres to the overall coordination of domestic and international two big issues, adheres to the overall tone of steady progress, and calmly responds to the century-long changes and the century-long epidemic, and coordinates the prevention and control of the epidemic and the development of the economy and society, and accelerates the construction of a new development pattern, strengthens macro-policy cross-cycle adjustment, focuses on promoting economic sustainable and healthy development, and focuses on deepening reform and opening up and innovation, and makes new major achievements in the cause of reform and development.
The implementation of the 14th Five-Year Plan has started well, and an important aspect is that a new step has been taken to build a new development pattern and achieve new results in high-quality development.
China's economic development and epidemic prevention and control have maintained a leading position in the world, and the characteristics of strong resilience, great potential, and strong power have continued to show. The national strategic scientific and technological strength has accelerated, and major innovative achievements have emerged one after another. The science and technology innovation capability has continued to improve, and the breakthroughs in key and core technologies have been achieved. The resilience of the industrial chain has been improved, and the foreign trade volume has increased, and the structure has continued to optimize. The new driving force for growth has been greatly strengthened. The reform and opening-up has been deepened, and efforts have been made to break through the blocking points of supply and demand matching and the flow of factors. The high-level opening-up has created a new advantage in cooperation and competition. The people's livelihood has been effectively guaranteed. The employment scale has continued to expand, and the income of residents has grown in line with the growth of the economy. The annual grain output has remained above 130 billion tons for seven consecutive years, and the "eighteen consecutive years of good harvest" has been achieved. The construction of ecological civilization has been continuously promoted. The work of peaking carbon emissions and carbon neutrality has been carried out
These achievements are the result of the strong leadership of the Central Committee of the Party with Comrade Xi Jinping at its core, the result of Xi Jinping’s new era of socialism with Chinese characteristics, and the result of the concerted and arduous efforts of the whole party and the people of all ethnic groups.
The practice once again proved that the Party has established the core and central position of Comrade Xi Jinping in the Party Central Committee and the guiding position of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for the New Era, which is of great significance to the development of the Party and the country in the new era and to the advancement of the process of the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
Guided by the core and core leadership of the Party Central Committee and the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, and united as one by the whole party and the people of all ethnic groups in the country, we will definitely be able to overcome all kinds of difficulties and obstacles, and create new achievements and write a new chapter in the new journey of building a modern socialist country.
The 20th National Congress of the Party will be held next year, which is a major event in the political life of the party and the country.
embodying the great spirit of the founding of the Party, adhering to the overall tone of work, fully and accurately implementing the new development concept, speeding up the construction of a new development pattern, comprehensively deepening reform and opening up, adhering to innovation-driven development, promoting high-quality development, adhering to the main line of supply-side structural reform, and coordinating the prevention and control of the epidemic and economic and social development, and coordinating development and security, we will definitely be able to maintain a stable and healthy economic environment, a stable and prosperous social environment, and a political environment that is clean and pure. We will continue to do a good job in “six stabilities” and “six guarantees”, and continue to improve the people’s livelihood. We will strive to keep the macro-economy in a reasonable range, keep the social big picture stable, and continue to do a good job in “six stabilities” and “six guarantees”. We will definitely be able to maintain a stable and healthy economic environment, a stable and prosperous social environment, and a political environment that is clean and pure. We will work hard to achieve excellent results at the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China.
Let us unite more closely around the Party Central Committee with General Secretary Xi Jinping at its core, strengthen the “four consciousnesses” and the “four confidence”, achieve the “two guarantees”, and continuously improve our political judgment, political insight and political execution, so as to implement the decisions and policies of the Party Central Committee in practice, and constantly push forward the cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era.
So I re-ordered using my points, thank you.
Where does the address come from?
I can't see the address
Download the Suning E-commerce APP
Follow the SuNing Pusher’s WeChat public account
Saving money and making money by sharing
Download the SuNing Financial APP
Follow the service number of Suning E-commerce
Super convenient and just like opening it on a computer, it solved my problem of insufficient hard disk space on my computer.
The new solid-state hard drive just arrived today, but the mobile solid-state hard drive computer cannot read it, the mobile solid-state hard drive computer cannot recognize it, but the computer can read the U disk.
The machine is very light and easy to operate. It looks and is beautiful.
It has been used for a whole day, and the heat dissipation is very good. It feels like it is not hot at all. The running speed is very fast, and it can kill 99% of users in one second after booting.
The battery is also very powerful, and it should not be a problem to standby for 9 hours and use for 4 hours. In short, this price can buy such a quality machine. I feel very happy, and other functions will be supplemented later.
It looks very good.
In terms of performance, we will evaluate after a period of time.
The machine is fast, bigger than expected, and the rendering effect is very good. I like it. I will evaluate it after using it for a period of time.
Not bad, the serial number of the machine was found in Hong Kong, and the quality should be OK.
**It's not big, it's heavy, and it's not big to hold one hand. It's just a little bigger than 15.6 inches. It runs very stable, and I don't feel any lag. The sound of the fan is loved. It has a sense of presence, and it will not spin like a laptop.
The things are good, and they are cheaper than the official flagship store, and they also sent a backpack. I think it is very good.
The store service was also good, reminding me to update my BIOS and providing me with ** in a timely manner.
Worthy!
Heat dissipation effect: Heat dissipation is very good, and there is no heat. Lightness of weight: It is convenient to carry. Appearance material: Thinkpad traditional design, satisfactory.
The seller is a trustworthy seller, and carefully checks the appearance of the whole machine, all interfaces, no refurbished or used traces, and is indeed a new US version machine, with the same configuration as the page.
Forgot to pack the backpack, immediately sent me a backpack, although it is not the original factory backpack, but the follow-up service is enough to prove that it is a conscientious seller.
If a friend needs to buy a notebook, go back and buy it again.
The appearance material: the appearance is atmospheric, and the effect is clear. The degree of lightness is appropriate, and it feels good to be heavy.
Heat dissipation effect: I tried it at first, and will evaluate it later.
The keyboard is very good to type, and it also comes with a mouse and a converter. This configuration is very cost-effective compared to domestic brands. In general, it is cheap and beautiful, and the performance of the machine can be evaluated after using it for a period of time.
This screen is so relaxing!
It is very convenient to use, and I will evaluate it for a while after using it for a period of time!
Education information: Beijing compresses the proportion of 2016 first-grade entrance special talents - Xinhua News Agency
On the 21st and 22nd, the special examination work for the enrollment of junior high school students in Beijing was carried out by the unified organization of all district education departments.
This year, all districts in Beijing have compressed the proportion of special-admitted students, and the competition for special-admitted students has become more fierce.
For example, in Dongcheng District, the proportion of elementary school students enrolling in junior high school in this year is generally not more than 5% of the total enrollment plan of the district. The planned enrollment number is 380 people, and the enrollment rate is not more than 10% of the school's enrollment plan.
All students with sports, art, and science and technology advantages and who register online are eligible to participate in the special entrance examination.
In order to facilitate students to participate in the examination nearby, the Dongcheng District continued the examination arrangement of last year and set up 1-2 examination sites in each school district, with a total of 13 examination sites.
The exam points are divided according to the exam districts, and the time is divided into one-hour units to examine the students who enter the exam points in different exam districts at different time periods on the same day.
On May 23, the online examination center of the district education department released the list of students who passed the examination. Students can check the examination results online.
Can it be delivered in 10 to 15 minutes?
No food received
The key is that I haven't eaten anything tonight.
If you don't deliver, say it early
The president of the Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina: I firmly believe that China has the ability to successfully hold the Winter Olympics in special circumstances - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Sarajevo, December 11 (Xinhua) - Bosnian Olympic Committee Chairman Kvesic recently said that Bosnia and Herzegovina is very much looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics, and believes that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period.
China's ambassador to Bosnia and Herzegovina, Ji Ping, met with the president of the Montenegrin Olympic Committee, Kvesic, yesterday.
At the meeting, Kwieciszewski positively evaluated the relations between the two countries and said that he had visited China in Beijing Summer Olympics in 2008 and was deeply impressed by the excellent organization work of the Chinese side. He believed that China had the capability to successfully hold the Winter Olympics in the special period and hoped to have more exchanges and cooperation with China in the field of sports.
Ji Ping said that China and Japan have a special "Olympic bond".
The 1984 Sarajevo Winter Olympics was successfully held here, and two months later, the 2022 Beijing Winter Olympics will open, presenting the world with a simple, safe and wonderful feast.
We look forward to deepening exchanges and cooperation in the preparation of winter sports events, athlete training and other aspects between the two countries, and the Chinese Embassy in Bosnia and Herzegovina will continue to play a bridge-building role, and promote the deepening of people-to-people exchanges between the two countries, and let the people of the two countries “move forward together” and wish the athletes of Bosnia and Herzegovina to achieve good results in the Beijing Winter Olympics.
Before the meeting, the BHOC held the “Best Athlete of the Year” award ceremony, and Jia Ping, as a special guest, presented the award to the BHOC’s Best Young Athlete.
The promotional video of the Beijing Winter Olympics was played in a loop at the scene.
Disappointing
Will there be a refund?
It's not good enough! The shipping fee is 20 yuan
There's no way! I'll ask that restaurant
Thanks for following, of course some of the riders did very well
Chocolate Obsession [FR] by Dominique Ennou, Xiaoxia Miao, Shanghai Science and Technology Press【Original book, full discount】
The original books support seven-day no-reason return
Grandma's New Year's Eve said to learn to sing the 24th song, the air is clear and the distant mountains can be seen. Grandpa is a stupid child. My grandmother lives in the ancient town of Guli, and the dumplings and the soup dumplings are a piece of chocolate for 2022.
[Nola Books] The original "Crying Chocolate", the original "Little Thief's Fairy Tale Annotation Version" by Zhang Qisheng, the original grade 1-3, the original classic story book set, children's literature, primary school students' extra-curricular book works
【Good English Books】2022 New Year's Eve, my grandmother, who is in her 80s, gave me a box of chocolate with 24 sections. My grandfather is a stupid child. My grandmother lives in the ancient town of Guli and makes dumplings and soup.
Nola Books: The Official Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy Collection: Charles and Ray Eames: Life, Work, and Legacy
All 13 volumes, the amazing Fox Father, the Charlie Chocolate Factory, the Roald Dahl Collection, the Children's Story Book, 9-12 years old, the second and fifth grade of elementary school, the non-phonetic version of the Matilda
The terrifying science series has a complete set of 72 volumes, 12 volumes of classic mathematics series, classic science new knowledge, natural exploration, electric shock, chocolate secrets, and must-read mathematics for primary and secondary school students.
Some books are sold at a higher price than the original price, and it is recommended to be cautious when bidding
Chocolate in the office: the seven secrets of work and happiness (German) by Weisso, translated by Chen Bao. Yunnan Science and Technology Press [original book, reduced price].
【Fast invoice, order online, quality after-sales, support 7 days no reason to return and exchange】
[Nola books] The original six volumes, Zuo Qing said that a hundred classes and thousands of people, the second grade extra book, a piece of chocolate, grandpa is a stupid child, said to learn to sing and dance the twenty-four solar terms, the Qingming see the distant mountains and dumplings, and the picture book my grandmother
Nola Books: The official graphic novel adaptation of the first book in Philip Pullman's His Dark Materials series, featuring all eight volumes of the graphic novels, as well as a prologue and epilogue that provide context for the story. The book is aimed at children aged 3-9.
Nola Book: Original, you don't know coffee + wine + bread + chocolate + tea, baking, cooking, tasting, making, appreciating, food lovers, food culture, interesting and fashionable lifestyle encyclopedia
The White Bread Children's Book Award is suitable for primary school students from grades 3 to 5 to read, story books, summer reading books, and extra-curricular reading books.
【Nola Books】Original [All 3 Volumes] French Blue Band Sweet Treat Dictionary, Chocolate Sweet Treat Class, World Sweet Treat Master's Creative Works, 100 Basic and Beginner Tutorials on How to Make Cakes
[Nola Books] The original three books, the complete collection of Roald Dahl's works, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory + Matilda + the story of the childhood of the good boy, 6-12 years old reading children's literature, the original children's literature
Hello, I've been waiting for this order for a long time
Continuously delayed
Thank you
Please help me cancel, and place a new order for each order.
He needs to order, then I'll have credit?
Did they miss this one?
How much can we send?
It's impossible.
The code includes four $20 off discounts
#NAME# said to help me re-order
I re-ordered and got back so much money
But I placed an order at 1:30 p.m.
48 hours negative nucleic acid test, the State Council issued a notice to strengthen the prevention and control of the epidemic in coastal cities - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, 2020 (reporter Dong Ruifeng, Gu Tiancheng), the State Council issued a notice on strengthening the prevention and control of the novel coronavirus epidemic in coastal cities, requiring that individuals who have left the mainland within the past 48 hours and are not connected to Hong Kong and Macao (excluding those connected to Hong Kong and Macao) must hold a negative nucleic acid test result within 48 hours, and individuals who have arrived at a mainland coastal city must conduct nucleic acid testing at least once after arriving.
According to the notice, the time range for the above requirements is from the date of determining the scope of coastal cities in each province, district and city and announcing it, to March 15, 2022.
In addition, the notice also proposed that conditional coastal cities may study the establishment of a buffer zone for epidemic prevention and control within their jurisdiction.
The head of the National Health Commission's Disease Prevention and Control Bureau introduced that for some border cities, cross-border trade is the main economic pillar of the local economy, and the two sides' border residents are frequent.
The implementation of differentiated management policies will change a single line of defense against the spread of the epidemic into two lines, which is expected to move the checkpoint forward, compress the risk of the spread of the epidemic, and achieve the maximum effect of epidemic prevention and control with the minimum social impact and minimum social cost.
Recently, there have been a number of local outbreaks in China, all of which were imported from overseas.
The notice pointed out that there were some problems such as the lack of timeliness of epidemic monitoring and early warning, the lack of implementation of closed-loop management of high-risk personnel, the form of regular nucleic acid testing, the lack of elimination of cold chain items at all links, the lack of standardization of management of concentrated isolation places, and the lack of scientific and precise emergency response to the epidemic.
The notice requires efforts in nine aspects, including improving the mechanism for epidemic prevention and control in coastal cities, perfecting the epidemic monitoring and early warning system, and implementing border control measures, and accelerating the filling of gaps and weaknesses in the prevention and control of coastal cities, doing a scientific and accurate job in prevention and control, and tightening the outer defense line of prevention and control.
The notice stressed that the cities on both sides of the strait should study and deploy the prevention and control of the epidemic and people's livelihood work in a synchronized manner, publish and open the people's livelihood hotline, regularly check the potential hidden dangers in the supply and price of basic necessities of life, and timely solve and proactively respond to the outstanding problems raised by the public.
According to the notice, the coastal cities referred to in the notice include the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the counties (cities, districts, municipalities) where the open land, water and air ports are located
Color: As shown in the picture (avoiding color difference is inevitable, the closest color of the actual product will explain, outdoor light will cause the clothing color to become brighter, please consult in advance before purchase)
This item is vintage, and the first buyer of vintage should search for "vintage" or "vintage" on Baidu.
Lonely.
Second-hand items are inevitably minor defects, so if you decide to buy second-hand products, you should be mentally prepared for this. If you are a perfectionist, you should pay attention to the obvious defects, and I will explain them to you. This is a characteristic of second-hand products. I think good things don't care about a little bit of impact!
The store does not accept returns or exchanges on its vintage products.
The so-called vintage, vintage, design will all have a sense of retro, that is, nostalgia. Why do people like vintage is also because of its sense of time and its texture!
Therefore, girls who can't drive should not say that their clothes are old-fashioned. They can only say that you are not suitable!
There is no risk-free purchase, and online shopping has risks. Shopping needs to be cautious.
If the items are unsuitable for the buyer for any reason, or the buyer does not like them, they can be transferred to the store owner. Once sold, they cannot be returned or exchanged. Please cooperate with us. Thank you very much!
On June 11, 2021, part of the circle was sold.
Goods will be sold on a first-come, first-served basis, and antiques will not be returned or exchanged.
Buying guide
The goods sold by the store are not returnable or exchangeable
Please take a few minutes to read the purchase instructions
The items in the store may have a slight color difference due to the display screen and light problems. Please check carefully before buying. The color difference is not a reason for return or exchange.
The store does not accept the reason of different styles and styles that are not in line with the imagination, and does not accept the return and exchange.
The sizes are all measured by actual flat laying, and there must be errors, but we believe that the errors are very small, and if you receive the wrong size, you can't exchange it, so you have to consider it carefully before you buy.
If you have any problems, please contact me as soon as possible. I will try my best to solve them. If there are malicious comments, I will file a complaint to the end.
We will carefully check everything before it is sent out, and there will be no quality issues.
Please confirm receipt and leave a review within 48 hours of receiving your items, please be understanding of our hard work.
Oil pipeline video exposes US military's 20-year bloodbath in Iraq - Xinhua News Agency
(Video source: YouTube)
On December 11, a micro-documentary called "Killing Machine" on the oil platform attracted widespread attention.
The film tells the story of the United States launching the war in Afghanistan under the pretext of "anti-terrorism", forcibly outputting American democracy through the war, 20 years of bloody and cruel, bloodthirsty, indiscriminate killing, committing various crimes against humanity.
They abused drones to attack hospitals, schools and other civilian places, distorted humanity, and established a killing squad.
In the past 20 years, the US military has killed tens of thousands of innocent civilians in Afghanistan.
The US military set up a "black jail" to torture and humiliate "criminals".
The spate of anti-human crimes has sparked more hatred among Afghans.
As the video shows, the American "anti-terror" war is "getting more and more terrorized."
War has not brought peace, democracy, prosperity, or hope to the Afghan people; it has only brought a country ravaged by war and countless acts of killing and destruction.
Watch the video and let's uncover the truth behind the US's "anti-terrorism" and the false face of American democracy!
I happened to see an article like this, talking about why the customer wanted to use the logistics company in the bonded zone to pack the cans, although the cans are deep processing and not within the scope of operations of bonded logistics companies. Perhaps the following text can explain why the customer wanted to do this.
I went to a lot of milk powder factories and came into contact with a lot of milk powder production lines.
In fact, the raw materials of powdered milk in bags and tins are exactly the same, and there is no difference at all.
So, everyone will ask: Why is the shelf life of the bag one year, while the shelf life of the hearing aid is two years or longer?
Or ask: Why is the price difference between hearing aids and behind-the-ear devices so great?
In fact, many consumers or mothers think that this is because the raw materials are different, so the quality is much better.
In fact, the raw materials are the same, but everyone thinks that the good ones are expensive.
Some consumers also said that after eating, they said that the taste or taste was different!
Now I will tell you the reason why I am expensive. Where is the cost?
Why are the prices so different when the raw materials are the same?
Because most manufacturers consider that if the packaging price is too high, consumers will find it difficult to accept, which means that the manufacturers' profits are low, or even no profits, so how can the manufacturers survive?
So they have a big increase in pricing to protect their profit margins.
Therefore, most manufacturers are promoting in-ear headphones rather than in-box.
And every year, every manufacturer has to pay tens of millions or even hundreds of millions of advertising fees. Where does this money come from?
Of course, everyone knows this.
As society develops, the promotion cost of the market, such as the promotion personnel of the mall, the display cost of the mall, the gift cost of the product, and the advertising cost, etc., are also increasing.
Therefore, manufacturers are constantly adding new products, and the prices are also constantly rising. This is a new product that comes with the increase in market costs.
The main purpose is to obtain higher profits, and the cost of their raw materials will not be more than 3 or 4 yuan.
There are also some brands that, in order to promote their own products, do not hesitate to hook up with doctors in hospitals and help them promote the products. The profits range from 30 yuan to 80 yuan per prescription.
And China's relevant laws are absolutely not allowed to do this way of operation. In fact, this way of operation is to harm consumers.
It is suggested that people buy powdered milk in bags under the premise of having cans at home, which can save money and increase the preservation and sealing of powdered milk, and has no effect on children.
In addition, do not think that the shelf life of hearing aids is longer than that of packaging. If the shelf life of hearing aids and packaging is the same after opening, it only means that the packaging is not easy to save and easy to be affected by moisture.
The food was late, it was cold, and when it was cold it was hard and inedible.
And the soup was also spilled out.
It was immediately cancelled, and he #PRS_ORG# sent back the things he received.
I didn't get it!
#NAME# said no one went to get it.
We called them up
If you don't refund me, I'll call the police.
Repeatedly using #PRS_ORG#, today's experience was the worst
It cannot be accepted in any way.
Okay, that's fine.
But it also reminds restaurants and riders
Prevent it from happening again in the future.
I want to know the exact delivery time.
That time kept getting delayed
I don't know when
Can I get my money back if I cancel the order?
How to pay the service fee to the rider?
One cyclist was confirmed dead more than an hour ago
I don't want to wait any longer
Don't scare people at the starting line - Xinhua News Agency
When you go to the book fair, you can often feel the heat of successful academic books.
Today's success books often preach the "best principles" - that is, to assume or imply that you can "do it" first, and then tell you what you need to do "what to do."
In other words, it has skipped over the most important and fundamental part of “how to do it”.
That's why all these books have a common theme - either go all out or don't do anything; either 100 or 0; either climb Mount Everest or just stay put.
This "best practice" will be recognized as "absolutely correct" by everyone who sees it, but 99% of people will be scared to death before they even reach the starting line.
Because this theory advocates a path of "you have to make a 180-degree turn and become a new person," which is precisely the fatal weakness of many people.
For those who are stuck in their ways, who refuse to change, you should shout "You need to change" right into their ears. It's an act of self-deception and a mockery of the cow.
Most people will be afraid of the word "change" in front of them, and will hesitate to take the first step. Or they will make a decision to "change" based on a momentary impulse, and bravely take the first step, but it is often short-lived, and it is difficult to persist for a long time.
Ma Sanli's famous "From Tomorrow" is a classic that best expresses this "universal human nature".
The biggest problem with the "best principle" is that the threshold is too high, and it often exceeds the limits of ordinary people, making most people "look up in admiration."
Perhaps, "the second principle" is a way to make more ordinary people walk on the path of relative success.
The core of the "next best principle" is to "lower the threshold" - it encourages a "little victory leads to a big victory" theory, that is, if you can't do 100, just do 1, because 1 is always greater than 0; if you can't climb Mount Everest, just climb the small sand dune in front of your door, because that is always stronger than standing still.
In the end, doing something is always better than doing nothing.
With the lowered threshold, there are more opportunities for ordinary people to persist, and the success rate will also increase as long as you persist.
However, the successful path that follows the "second-best principle" is slightly longer.
In short, "the best principle" sounds like a flag for everyone to succeed, but in the end, it can only motivate a few; while "the second best principle" can effectively motivate more people and benefit as many as possible.
Do I need to place another order now?
No one answered the phone.
It kept getting delayed.
Not yet delivered
When will it be delivered?
How can I contact you?
Please cancel the order
I can't wait any longer, thank you
He was two meals short of delivery, but one order had already been completed.
I just wanted to ask, how do you get in touch with the riders?
The first rider told me there would be another rider coming
The amount of naked carp resources in Qinghai Lake increased by 0.71 million tons this year - Xinhua News Agency
The reporter learned from the Qinghai Provincial Agriculture and Rural Affairs Department on December 11 (reporter Luo Xiaofei and Zhang Hongxiang) that the latest monitoring results showed that the amount of bare carp resources in Qinghai Lake this year increased by 0.71 million tons, reaching 10.85 million tons, which was 40 times more than the protection period in 2002.
The common carp in Qinghai Lake is called “Huangyu” and is a precious fish species unique to Qinghai Lake. It plays an important role in ensuring the safety and biodiversity of the “water-fish-bird” ecological chain in the Qinghai Lake basin.
In the 1960s and 1970s, due to factors such as the large-scale killing of fish and the degradation of the breeding water environment, the number of naked carp in Qinghai Lake decreased sharply, and the resource endowment of naked carp in Qinghai Lake in 2002 was only 2,592 tons.
In 2004, Qinghai Lake naked carp was listed as a critically endangered species in the Red List of Chinese Species.
Since 2003, Qinghai Province has implemented the ban on fishing in lakes, prohibiting any unit, collective or individual from fishing for naked carp in Qinghai Lake and its main rivers and tributaries, and prohibiting the sale of naked carp and its products.
At the same time, through artificial breeding and release, and cleaning the main inflow rivers and channels of Qinghai Lake, and designing scientific and reasonable “fish passage”, the resources of naked carp in Qinghai Lake have been increasing year by year.
Yang Lin, deputy director of the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs, introduced that up to now, the Qinghai Lake naked carp has been artificially bred and released more than 180 million, and the contribution rate to the recovery of Qinghai Lake naked carp resources is more than 23%.
The source area of the three rivers in Qinghai is an important ecological barrier and water source conservation area in China and even Asia. Qinghai Lake is a natural barrier and ecological function area that controls the spread of desertification from the west to the east.
In order to protect the ecological environment of the Sanjiangyuan region and Qinghai Lake water area, protect aquatic wild animals, and maintain the biodiversity of the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, since this year, Qinghai has successively issued notices of prohibition on fishing in key water areas of the Yangtze River, Yellow River and Qinghai Lake, and built a “one river, one river, one lake” comprehensive prohibition management system.
I spent more than $180 on food using my #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
But the order didn't get the $20 discount.
The full version of the software is free to try on a computer or mobile phone, and the paperless version is available.
2022 Leaf South's "Advanced English Translation Theory and Practice" (2nd Edition) Notes and Exam Questions and Answers/Master's Degree Examination Syllabus Guidance Material Review Material for Admission Examination
2022 Leaf "Modern Television News Studies" Notes and Homework Exercises (Including Typical Questions) / Master's Degree Entrance Examination Syllabus / Teaching Materials / Review Materials / Entrance Examination Test Papers
The original mobile photography introduction, take a beautiful photo is very simple, the capture skills tutorial, photography composition techniques, mobile photography tutorial book, app software photography post-processing
High-quality books, original guarantee, high-quality service, timely delivery, and worry-free after-sales.
Red Hat Linux System Management (CD)
Animal Novel King Shen Shixi's Collection of Books: Tiger Girl Golden Leaves [If you need to buy a group, please contact customer service]
The information of the books is collected and uploaded by the software. If there is any error, please refer to the actual object. If you have any questions, please do not shoot!
If you have any questions, please contact the online customer service!
The restaurant only gave me one bag, and I had to put it in the bag, it was cold
So, is the take-out in a bag?
We only saw one bag
Wondering if it was lost or if someone took it, thanks
It's been an hour and it hasn't been delivered
I just read a fake news article that was too long.
To the unknowing male, here's a little science.
Most girls experience their first period at some point between the ages of 13 and 15, and stop menstruating around the age of 50.
After that, the body will be more regular, and will come once a month, as long as the body is healthy.
But it is not regular enough to be able to predict it with precision, with a tolerance of about one week, it needs to be prepared in advance, sometimes bad luck will turn things around (suddenly a few days in advance).
The length of time, the amount of blood loss and the severity of the pain vary from person to person. Some recover in three days, while others take a week. Some bleed little, while others bleed heavily. Some have no reaction, while others are so ill that they need to be taken to hospital in an ambulance. Pain can change over time and just because someone is pain-free now, it does not mean they will be pain-free for life.
Periods cannot be controlled, and there is blood for 24 hours from beginning to end. The only thing that can be done is to use sanitary napkins or sanitary tampons to prevent blood from flowing onto clothes, chairs, etc.
The main reason for menstrual pain is the secretion of prostaglandins, and it is effective to relieve the pain of the month when the menstrual period has not started. After the onset of menstrual pain, it is of no use to eat broccoli.
Before the menstrual period, due to the excessive release of progesterone and the accumulation of blood in the uterus, it is easy to have diarrhea.
If it is around the period, it will come out of the toilet suddenly, and it will come out in a month within two days.
The sanitary pad should be changed once every two to three hours, otherwise it will breed bacteria, and the worst case is to change six times a day, 7 days a month, that is 42 pieces, and if you prepare in advance, there may be 50 pieces, and it is not used every month.
(Here, the sanitary napkins do not need to be changed often, maybe once every five to six hours, or up to eight hours.)
Hormonal changes during the menstrual cycle may cause irritability, and mood swings may also be affected by hormonal changes during ovulation. This is very bad for the body, and it makes it easy for the body to trip itself up.
But the official crime rate data can show that women's ability to control emotions is still very high, and will not use emotional problems as an excuse.
The fluid is not just blood, it contains shed endometrial tissue.
The inner lining of the uterus is the thinnest after the end of menstruation, and gradually thickens, which can be understood as the uterus being like a house. Each month, a house is built (the inner lining thickens) to prepare for guests, but no guests come, so the house is torn down (the inner lining thins) and a new one is built the next month, and so on.
Menstruation is inconvenient, and it has been going on for decades. Every month for several days and 24 hours, there will be abdominal pain and back pain. Who wants it?
But people can be born because his mother went through her menstrual cycle. Menstrual cycle is to prepare a house for you to live in for 10 months when you come to this world. We should thank our mothers for their regular and healthy menstrual cycle.
A lot of women's things have been suppressed in the past, and society has brainwashed women that it's dirty, shameful, and everyone thinks that's the way it is, but times have changed.
If anyone thinks that menstruation is disgusting, thinks that women's bodies are disgusting because they are preparing for life, should not say it in public. Girls, stand up, don't think like this, never experienced it, this life will never experience it, and don't understand it. Men, don't be ungrateful and ignorant. How can such an attitude face their mothers? How can they want their children?
Finally, the sisters tried the sanitary towels, and they were really useful.
Today is the Winter Solstice Festival, and it is disappointing to send the wrong gift
We also need to order food for the children to eat.
Hope to check the products in the busy store
Is it an electric leakage that the foot bath bubbled the feet and made them itchy?
Choosing the right foot bath basin can play a good role in foot care and health care. Today, the editor of Guomei will make a solution for this problem, hoping to help friends.
With the enhancement of people's health awareness, foot baths have become more and more favored by consumers, and a large number of products with different levels have emerged in the market, ranging from hundreds of yuan to thousands of yuan. This has given consumers a lot of choices.
In the relevant data surface, compared with traditional home appliances, the sales of health care home appliances such as foot bath are booming, but the foot bath does not have a special industry standard, so there is a certain safety hazard.
"It's so dangerous to soak your feet in the electrified water!"
Mr. Li told reporters that recently, he bought a foot bath as a birthday gift for his father, but his father felt numbness in his feet when he was soaking his feet.
Mr. Li first thought it was the vibration function of the foot bath, but he did not expect that after turning off the vibration function, his father still felt numbness in his feet.
Mr. Li tried the electric pen, and the electric pen actually lit up. Mr. Li was surprised to find that the water in the bathtub was electrified.
He later contacted the business and the attitude was good, though he was still not happy.
Because he found that the hot tub, which has been popular for a long time, does not have a clear and detailed industry standard in terms of the highest temperature setting, who it is suitable for, what materials are safe, and so on.
However, in general, the bathtub is not prone to electricity problems, but it is not ruled out that some products are not strictly inspected at the factory.
Therefore, when purchasing, choose a separate foot bath.
Water and electricity separation has no safety hazards.
You can also take a pen and paper.
The 13th provincial tea exhibition opened - head of the line - Hubei Daily News - huanqiu.com
Hunan Daily, December 10 (Full media reporter Zhang Shangwu, Hu Panpan, reporter, Liu Xiaoling, photographer, Li Jian) Today, the 13th Hunan Tea Industry Expo and the New Huzhou Red Tea Promotion Conference were held at the Hunan International Convention and Exhibition Center. The exhibition of the tea industry, the innovation of tea technology, the promotion of tea culture, and the acceleration of the goal of a trillion-dollar tea industry.
Huo Shuling, deputy director of the board of directors of the China National Cooperative Supply and Marketing Cooperative, and Ye Hong, deputy director of the board of directors of the Provincial People's Congress, attended the opening ceremony.
Professor Liu Zhonghua, an academician of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, made a solemn introduction at the opening ceremony: the source of Lake Red is new, and the rise of red tea will inject new power into the “Five Colors of Xiang Tea”.
In recent years, the provincial party committee and provincial government have vigorously supported the development of tea industry and promoted the construction of a trillion-dollar tea industry in Hunan. The development pattern of “three Hunan, four waters and five colors” has been formed.
The tea industry in the province has increased innovation, and the main tea products such as green tea, black tea, and red tea have been launched in turn, and the main production areas have promoted the fusion of tea tourism, which has benefited a large number of tea farmers.
The feng shui wheel turns, and red tea is reinvigorated.
Experts in the tea industry in the province said that after picking green tea, red tea and black tea, tea farmers can earn income all year round, and the output value of tea gardens is on the rise.
At the opening ceremony, provincial leaders awarded the fourth batch of enterprises using the “Hunan Red Tea” trademark with the license, and New Hualing was proud of “the source of Hunan Red Tea”.
At the new Huzhou Red Tea Museum, Fujian tea merchants immediately placed an order for a high-mountain tea called “Ice Spring”.
Secretary-General Wang Jun of the Provincial Tea Association said that the current epidemic and other factors have had some impact on the tea market, but from the Tea Expo site, there are many highlights.
The new-made red tea is red, and it is injected with the connotation of tea culture. It is popular and the transaction is hot. The Xiang tea industry welcomes a new spring.
If these foods are not hot, can they be cancelled?
I didn't want it, because there was nowhere to park, and he couldn't deliver it.
Metaphysics is the study of questions that cannot be directly answered through perception, but can be answered through rational reasoning and logic.
Metaphysics is the basic law of philosophy, aiming to explain the basic nature of existence and the world.
The Chinese translation of "metaphysics" comes from the sentence "the Dao of the above is called the Dao, and the Dao of the below is called the instrument" in the Yi Jing, and was translated into Japanese by Inoue Teijiro (Meiji era) from the word "metaphysics."
The philosophical branch includes ontology, natural theology and its extensions.
Ontology is the study of "what names represent real entities, and what names represent concepts."
Theistic naturalism is the denial of the existence of God.
Its theoretical basis is that all phenomena can be explained by the concept of natural reason, proposed by philosophers who support science and evolution.
And the naturalistic method is a research method that does not posit the existence of God.
The philosophy of mind is a branch of philosophy that studies the nature of consciousness and its relation to the body (especially the brain).
Dualism and monism are the two main philosophical ideas that discuss the relationship between the soul and the body.
The philosophy of knowledge is a branch of philosophy that explores the nature, origin, and scope of knowledge.
Ethics is the systematic study and research of human moral life; here, morality is defined as a set of rules recognized by a group of people or a culture.
It is mainly divided into meta-ethics (abstractly studying the theory of ethics or criticizing its essence), normative ethics (evaluating various different moral views and giving moral guidelines for correct or incorrect behavior).
It studies what moral behavior standards people should follow, applies ethics (the academic study of applying ethical theories to real-life situations, including biomedical ethics, political ethics, etc.), and describes ethics (collecting information about how people live and summarizing from observed styles).
It is not based on a preconceived theory, but on the actual moral agents' choices and the real choices observed, which has resulted in all the moral factors of this decision, and it discusses the ethical views held by social groups.
The history of ethics includes Greek Roman ethics, medieval Christian ethics.
The first part: the ethical ideas of humanism, represented by Valla and Montaigne.
The second part: The ethical ideas of the Reformation, represented by Calvin.
Part three: political ethics, represented by Machiavelli and others, modern ethics (17-18th century, British empiricist ethics, represented by Hutcheson, 17-18th century, continental rationalist ethics, represented by Spinoza, 18th century, French Enlightenment ethics, represented by Voltaire, 18-19th century, German academy ethics, represented by Kant and Hegel, 18-19th century, British utilitarianism ethics, represented by Bentham and West, 19th century, British evolutionary ethics, represented by Spencer and Huxley, 19th century, German new Kantian ethics, represented by Li Ker, and 19th century, German new Kantian ethics, represented by Li Ker, and 19th century, German new Kantian ethics, represented by Li Ker, and 19th century, German new Kantian ethics, represented by Li Ker, and 19th century, German new Kantian ethics, represented by Li Ker, and 19th century, German new Kantian ethics, represented by Li Ker, and 19th century, German new Kantian ethics, represented by Li Ker, and 19th century, German new
Logic is a discipline that studies "principles and standards of valid reasoning and proof."
Logic usually consists of three parts: inductive reasoning, deductive reasoning, and abductive reasoning, which can be divided into formal logic and non-formal logic.
Aesthetics is a discipline that studies the nature and meaning of beauty.
#NUMBER# yuan has been received, which is missing food
Yang Xing (chè), whose original name is Jiang Bao, was born in the sheep year and sheep month. He grew up on the grassland and was suitable for it. He is called "Sheep Uncle".
He is known in the industry as a "suspense genius" and claims to be "good at telling lies in a serious manner."
"In the Dark," also known as "China's Strange Stories," is a "suspense and mystery" work by Yang Xingao, who uses his new work "In the Dark" to take you deep into the bones of Chinese folk customs, those legends that have been passed down to this day, behind which are what kind of tragic and moving love and hatred?
"Travellers on a different path" Nan Xiaolou and Yue Wuhua have once again begun their journey of discovery, and their identities are about to be revealed.
"Mystery genius" Yang Xingdao has white hair and has accumulated millions of copies of bestsellers!
The original “China’s Strange Stories” is the new work after “The Code of the World”, the same author, the same protagonist, and the continuation of the unfinished story of “Thailand’s Strange Stories” and “India’s Strange Stories”!
That's the same thing, you have to pay for a McDonald's chicken sandwich
You call the restaurant to have it delivered.
I just don't want to go downstairs to buy things, so I'll spend so much money to call in takeout
Ding Zilin: To a friend.
I would like to sincerely thank all my friends for their humanitarian assistance over the past 30 years, especially since I issued a humanitarian appeal on behalf of myself in early 1994, which has not been interrupted until now.
Nowadays, most of the deceased's parents have passed away, and the orphans have grown up and found jobs.
Your efforts have helped us through the most difficult moments of our lives.
The current COVID-19 pandemic is sweeping the world, and most of the donors have already retired.
Therefore, I humbly request that you stop donating to us, the Tiananmen Mother's Group, a humanitarian relief effort that should have ended long ago.
I will always remember your love and believe that your efforts will be remembered in history.
Due to various reasons, I can only express my will in this way, please forgive me!
Please accept my sincere blessings.
Tao said: "I would like to take this opportunity to introduce the 32-year history of humanitarian aid by the International Federation of Scholarly Societies (IFCSS) and the Minnesota China Democracy Fund (MCDF).
In the course of humanitarian relief, the American Association of University Professors and the Minnesota Chinese Democracy Foundation are parallel organizations, and the project implementers often cross over.
(Apple Daily photo: The website of Tiananmen Mothers is managed by a ceramic factory.) pic.twitter.com/UxID9ZGjzm
The relief funds often cannot be delivered smoothly to the hands of the victims of the June 4 incident.
In 1994, Ding teacher suggested that a special group be established to coordinate and supervise the collection and distribution of relief funds.
In 1998, the MCDF established the "Orphan Education Fund for the June 4th Victims" and carried it out for 11 years. In 2009, after all the June 4th orphans graduated from university, the MCDF established the "Special Relief Fund for the June 4th Orphans" and has been carrying it out to this day.
The funding for these projects is mainly from campus and society donations in 1989, personal donations, and the support of the Brothers University Democracy Foundation.
Since 2018, it has also received support from the Labor Research Foundation.
It was not until last year, 31 years later, that the June Fourth victims finally received a portion of the donations raised in Hong Kong in the name of the June Fourth.
During this period, China Human Rights also independently carried out its humanitarian relief projects.
We understand that Mr. Ding stopped the donation for the 64th anniversary of the founding of the People's Republic of China, which was for the sake of the donors. We are indeed some retired people, and our income is not as abundant as before. We would like to express our gratitude to Mr. Ding's letter of thanks to "comrades".
We will respect the decision of the affected people and terminate the project within two years, and restore it immediately when needed.
We also express our gratitude and respect to those who have been delivering humanitarian aid for years, taking risks and being generous.
Brand: mesobiosystem
Origin: Mainland China
Color classification: Liquid crystal chip 1, liquid crystal chip 2, liquid crystal chip 3, liquid crystal chip 4, liquid crystal chip 5, liquid crystal chip 6, liquid crystal chip 7, liquid crystal chip 8, double-layer liquid crystal
Thank you for choosing our products. Please spend 5 minutes to carefully read the following content before using our chips:
Please check if the goods are complete after opening the box.
If there are any missing items, please contact customer service as soon as possible.
The cover plate of the microfluidic chip is made of PC material, and please do not introduce solvents that react chemically with PC.
Do not use a manual syringe to directly inject the chip, otherwise it is easy to leak.
The microfluidic chips are tested through pure water at 500mbar (100um channel depth) or 300mbar (50um channel depth) before delivery.
The chips on the glass substrate are tested at 800mbar (100um trench) before shipment, and please pay attention not to collide with sharp objects during the use of the glass substrate chip, otherwise it will damage the substrate.
During use, please consider the viscosity of the solution and do not exceed this range, otherwise it will cause leakage.
For the common microfluidic microchip, we suggest the setting of the flow rate below 150ul/min under the condition of using pure water injection pump, and the setting of the oil phase flow rate below 50ul/min.
Please consider the actual viscosity of the sample and increase the value of your flow rate parameter from slow to fast.
After the experiment, please clean the internal channels as soon as possible to avoid blockage.
Microfluidic chips are consumables and cannot be reused for a long time.
If the chip is damaged due to long-term use or improper operation, it will not be replaced or returned.
If you need a microfluidic chip that can withstand greater pressure or flow rate, please contact customer service for customization.
The normal delivery cycle of chips is within one week, and the goods can be shipped within 24 hours after the goods are sold. Please consult with customer service before placing an order.
If you have any questions about how to connect our chip with the sample system, you can refer to the following link https://zhuanlan.zhihu.com/p/60474873 or search for the "Introgen" public account for more help.
You can also visit our website (http://www.mesobiosys.com) to download our brochure and learn more about our products.
For more information about our products, please contact our online customer service.
I'm across the road from #PRS_ORG
Hello
What is the reason for the delay in delivery?
How long will it take to get there?
Originally scheduled for 16:10-16:30
So I waited until 7:30 to see if it could be delivered.
Where is Saint Street?
Which street in Hong Kong leads to Saint Street?
What is the current situation of the order?
I entered it in December
So, this month you can enjoy 4 x $20 discounts when using your #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
I haven't received an order, can you check if the rider is still on the road?
Hi, can you help to contact the rider and ask if he is still on the road?
I have not received an order, and there was no food when I checked, and no one contacted me to cancel the order.
There is take-out food all the time, and the management office will call to ask if they can come in, but the management office has never contacted me
Design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere) (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation: The design is everywhere (Little translation:
Cambridge Bilingual Level 2 Reading Book Library Fatal Memory (2nd level, Cambridge KET level, more than 800 words)
The original version of Cambridge was imported, and the international award-winning works were popular for 20 years, and the world's teenagers were synchronized to read, and the primary and secondary school libraries of the whole country were compiled, and the teachers of the key high schools in the whole country compiled the QR code to listen to the English and American drama sound effects.
[New] A black book about colors, which was selected into the new reading basic directory of 3 to 6-year-old children's picture books, and Bologna was selected into the new reading basic directory of preschool children's reading.
The new official version can develop invoices and group purchases with discounts.
Descriptive Catalogue of the Writings of Sir Walter
【Children's Primary and Secondary School Reading Series】Design Everywhere (Included in the "Reading Guide for Primary and Secondary School Students") Ze Xuanran Book
A black book about colors, a 3 to 6-year-old children's picture book, won the award of the Bologna Children's Book Fair, and was selected into the new reading basic directory. It is a pre-school and early childhood reading material.
【Can be voided】Original, Century Witness, Great Translator Danica Seleskovic, Biography, Literary Biography, Tonghe Translation, Language Translator, Teacher and Student Reference Books
The original real-time witness of the century, the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of the great translator Danica S
【Original book】【Children's reading series for elementary and middle schools】Design everywhere (included in the "Reading guide for elementary and middle school students") 【Can be invoiced】
There is #PRS_ORG# to prove that no one took it, #PRS_ORG# framed me for it
I reiterate that I am sending a bill.
When they did it, no one took it to deliver, and then they blamed me for it
I demand that you cancel it immediately or I'll call the police
The time-lapse photography has not yet opened a store
Member evaluation
[Effect] Photo effect: The overall effect is good. I like this set of pictures very much.
[Service] Service details: Because pregnancy is a little uncomfortable when applying makeup, the makeup artist and staff are very considerate. I rested for a while and they also gave me hot water to drink.
The price of the set: 1000 yuan
Thank you for the rabbit's review. At first, I said that it was not suitable to refuse the ancient style. I did not expect that the finished product was so beautiful.
Thank you for your recognition, and your satisfaction will make us full of energy to move forward, and we will continue to work hard!
This photography studio is really great, and I strongly recommend all of you to come!
From reception, makeup, clothing, lighting, photography to post-production, everything is impeccable.
The makeup artist is very meticulous and will match your style to create a suitable makeup for you. The makeup products used are also from top brands.
Mr. Tian Liang, of course, photography is quite professional.
The whole studio has an artistic atmosphere, and there are two little cats playing around.
We were working in Beijing, and needed to queue up half a year in advance to watch a good movie in Beijing. A colleague had filmed in Beijing, and after watching the film, he thought it was just so-so.
I specifically sought out this studio, a place with soul and attitude.
Our facial expressions are not very good, and this is also the shortcoming of most people. Photographer Liangge will capture the natural and wonderful moments.
Makeup artists, photographers, post-production design, a tight-knit team.
The film was well received by both us and those around us.
She has already recommended the film to her friends, and her friends have also enjoyed it.
We hope that such studios will not be buried, and more people will find ta, and shoot their own style, instead of the same style.
Thank you very much for the five-star review of Eagle and Jingling. Both of them are very creative and have a lot of ideas. We are a creative studio. As long as the customers like us, we will do our best to complete 100% of the work. Thank you for meeting and knowing each other.
The sweet and thoughtful assistant, the lively and cheerful photography teacher, everyone in the team is super nice and beautiful. It is a very memorable experience, and the effect of the shooting is much better than I imagined. Everyone worked hard, and thank you very much 😘😘
Thank you for your comment. It is also a coincidence to meet you. From Urumqi to Qingdao, your trust in us is thousands of kilometers. I am very happy to meet you. If there is a chance, I will come to Qingdao next time.
How do I give money?
The second delivery has already been made.
No rider received
Now the restaurant staff are calling me.
A programming noob who wants to share his personal experience.
If you are planning to enter this industry, you can choose to find a place for training, but if you don't have this idea, it is better to self-study, after all, training costs a lot of money and takes six months to learn.
But if you are planning to enter this industry, training is a very good choice, especially for those who are weak in self-discipline. Training is a very good choice.
If you have a strong self-discipline, you can choose to self-study, but it will be more tiring.
Of course, choosing a good training institution is very important.
First, we need to look at the strength of the institution's teachers. If the teacher's strength is not strong enough, then the training institution has no meaning. Of course, some newly opened training institutions do not have very strong teacher strength.
Secondly, before choosing, it is best to inquire about this training institution. It is best to inquire about the students who have graduated from this institution. After all, only the students of the institution know what the institution is like, and the courses taught are good or bad.
Hello, I don't know how to answer your question because I haven't introduced myself in detail, and the relationship between learning this thing and one's personal situation is very great.
For example, professional, age, the language you want to learn, and even where you want to learn, are all related to the industry you want to work in.
If you are a student and have not graduated or graduated in computer science, I personally recommend self-study. This is the most efficient and cost-effective way. Nowadays, many offline and online training institutions are actually quite good, but the learning cost is high and the investment time is relatively long. It usually takes 3-6 months to concentrate on training.
However, if I were to say these things, self-study would be very convenient. Nowadays, many learning resources on the Internet are free, or there are many training resources on B站. If you don't know where to find resources, you can also contact me for free resources or detailed consultation.
In addition, there are some relatively classic books that can be combined with videos for comprehensive learning.
If you are not a computer professional, but can pay for the cost of learning time and money, I suggest that you go to the training institution to learn. This way of learning is not very tiring, and the teacher's explanation is very detailed. There are people who specialize in answering questions, and there is also help in learning planning or supervision.
And now many training institutions will sign employment agreements, with internal referral quotas, and after learning, they will recommend that you go to the company, so that the interview process for finding a job can be saved.
This is my opinion. Because I don't know your situation, I only roughly introduced it. If you have any other questions, you can contact me at any time for communication.
I said it was before 1 p.m. and I saw it on the app
What is
I haven't finished yet, what are you doing?
I accept various (installation, cleaning, maintenance), wall-mounted water heaters, water purifiers, washing machines, air conditioners, toilets, stoves, smoke machines, lighting fixtures, glass polishing, professional beautification, and household services.
Thank you to those who have liked my posts. Life is hard but we have to keep going.
Life will not forgive those who do not work hard. If you like it, pay attention to me. Thank those who silently support me.
Life is like this, others only see the results, but we are alone in the process, facing life, we are not only strong, but also continue, there is no choice, the road can be turned back, but you can't go back...
Cleanliness is a job and a responsibility, and life is beautiful because of service, and service is wonderful because of care.
Although we do the dirtiest job, we will use the most serious attitude to clean every corner of the customer's house, and see the customer's satisfied smile and raised thumb. At that moment, all the tiredness is worth it, and there is always a return!
My daily work
- Your request, my service.
Heartfelt service, heart-felt cleaning, to keep the good things.
The details you care about, Feng Gui household management helped me to achieve "clean" me, serve the love of the family.
Bao Wen is clean and tidy, and serves well. It is clean to the point of being at home.
Indoor and outdoor cleaning, my daily work
Although the crystal lamp is beautiful, it will become dull and dark if it is not cleaned for a long time. Only after cleaning can it be released in full glory. Life is the same.
Only when you put your heart into it can you succeed. Only when you pay attention to details can you create exquisiteness. We take our work seriously.
I will give you the opportunity to be satisfied, quality speaks for itself, because professionalism is worth being trusted, your recognition is my encouragement!
It's not good for any of the industries out there right now!
But I always believe that as long as you are serious, persistent, and hard-working, you will be better than others, at least better than complaining."
A day begins with the dawn, all good things start from the morning, I hope you carry happiness, luck, health, and good fortune to start a new day, and maintain a good mood throughout the day. Good morning.
As a child, happiness was something to be had; as a grown-up, happiness is a goal to be achieved; and as an adult, happiness is a state of mind to be understood.
Do the most real and kindest self, act according to one's heart, and there will be no regrets in this life; there is only one road in life, and one must walk one's own road; there are two treasures in life: a healthy body and a happy heart, and one should live a long and happy life!
Every stage of life will face different challenges.
Often, what holds you back is not your ability, but the courage to face it.
Since we can't avoid it, we might as well face it head-on.
The more you fear, the more you will be defeated; if you face difficulties, the problem will eventually be resolved.
The curator of Zhongsha held the first Saudi Arabia Contemporary Art Biennial in Saudi Arabia - Xinhua News Agency
Riyadh, Dec. 12 (Xinhua) -- The first Saudi Arabia's contemporary art biennial - the Diriyah Contemporary Art Biennial - was officially opened to the public on the 11th at the JAX Art District located in the northwest of Riyadh, the capital of Saudi Arabia. A total of 64 artists from Saudi Arabia and other countries participated in the biennial.
The dual-year exhibition was jointly planned by the Diriyah Biennale Foundation and the UCCA Center for Contemporary Art in China, and the director of the UCCA Center for Contemporary Art in China, Tian Feiyue, served as the artistic director.
According to the exhibition team, the theme of this two-year exhibition is "Crossing the River by Touching the Stone", which is a metaphor for the reform strategy taken during the period of social and economic transformation, and also reflects the current situation of Saudi social and cultural development.
The biennial exhibition covers an area of nearly 12,000 square meters, and the exhibition hall is divided into six units: "Crossing the Stone Bridge," "The Inheritance as an Experiment," "Marginal Thinking," "Towards the Public," "The Beautiful New World," and "The Spirit of Art."
Among them, the number of works by 27 Saudi artists accounted for more than 40% of the total number of works in the exhibition, including painting, installation art and performance art, etc. The works of 12 Chinese artists were also paid attention to. Some artists used recycled materials in a novel way to create works, such as Xu Bing in the series of “Behind the Story” (2014), which reconstructed a classic landscape painting with discarded materials.
Diriyah Season Fund CEO Barclay said that he hoped that this year's season could establish international dialogue, and give global audiences a chance to understand the cultural and creative industries and the creative community of Saudi Arabia's rapid development, and strengthen interaction.
Tian Feiyue said: "The goal of the biennial is dual, both to allow Saudi contemporary art to participate in the global dialogue and to allow Saudi audiences to integrate into the world of contemporary art."
It is understood that a series of lectures will also be held during the opening week of the two-year cycle, and artists, curators and leaders in the creative industry will discuss topics such as cross-cultural exchange and the development of contemporary art.
I ordered a hatchet.
The restaurant told me that riders can't deliver bones
Want to know the reason
Bones can be delivered separately from the restaurant
However, the system is not convenient, and we have to use another room.
I was at the #ADDRESS# in New York City.
I'm a long way from there
100+ Practical Business English Conversation Scenes + Business English Vocabulary Encyclopedia (with multiple language learning gifts)
Speak fluently with zero foundation in just 10 minutes a day!
The common business scenarios are fully covered, and the common business English expressions are fully included, and the business English communication skills are fully explained!
In addition, you will get a free download of the oral simulation practice + the audio of the foreign teacher + the free download of the universal business small knowledge, which will help you to improve your business English speaking skills easily.
Practical Business English Conversation Scenes 100, Wang Hui Li, Zhang Lili, Wang Yuchui, China Aerospace Science and Technology Publishing House, the original book, can issue regular electronic invoices, if you have any questions, you can contact online customer service at any time!
English bedtime five minutes Those classic works that have been passed down for a hundred years, such as Yang Chunli, Cheng Yueshui and Song Bing, are translated by 9787512415812, Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics Press.
The original book, electronic invoice, after-sales guarantee, any questions can consult online customer service.
The Woman Who Wore Hand-Made Shoes by Adriana Trigiani, Dong Yanshan, Chen Huijie Transl. 9787513306645 New Star Press【Direct】
The original book, directly supplied by the publisher, is issued with a regular electronic invoice, and you can contact the online customer service at any time if you have any problems!
Beautiful Confidence 100% (German)
The store is full of discounts, the amount is deducted, and the discounts are many. Welcome to buy!
【文轩正版】实用商务英语口语情景100
The original books of Xinhua Wenxuan are delivered to four warehouses in four cities (Jiangsu, Chengdu, Hubei, and Tianjin), and 75% of the cities are delivered on the second day!
Talking about autism with 55 questions closely related to autism (add) Brittaney King Brittaney King [book]
Beautiful English, those beautiful suffocating letters (letter collection) (800-page expansion of knowledge, 1000 authoritative American words, 2000 classic quotes, 3【Original book】【Original book】
Yunnan: Coordinated to standardize the management of rural public service positions - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Kunming, December 12 (Reporter Lin Bifeng) In order to continue to do a good job in the employment and livelihood assistance of the population in poverty alleviation, consolidate and expand the achievements of poverty alleviation, Yunnan Province recently issued relevant policies to promote the management of rural public interest positions in rural areas, and help to promote the comprehensive promotion of rural revitalization.
The relevant person in charge of the Yunnan Provincial Department of Human Resources and Social Security introduced that at present, Yunnan has developed 448,300 rural public service positions, which are used to provide employment for rural disadvantaged groups such as poverty-stricken labor, and play an important role in helping the poor achieve employment increase, consolidating the achievements of poverty alleviation, and effectively improving the ability of rural public services.
The new regulations were jointly issued by seven departments including Yunnan Social Security, Rural Revitalization, Finance, etc. The new regulations mainly standardize the scope of recruitment of rural public service personnel, fund management, job development, job management and other aspects.
In terms of the setting of job development, the new regulations are clear, and the setting is carried out according to the principles of "setting positions according to demand, setting people according to positions, dynamic management, and total control" "who develops, who uses, who is responsible" and "one person one position, voluntary publicity, and unified management".
The recruitment process must follow the steps of announcement, application, review, public announcement, employment, pre-employment training and placement.
In addition, the new regulations also clearly defined the specific responsibilities of the main development departments of rural public service positions, the subsidy standards and subsidy methods of rural public service positions, and required the development departments of rural public service positions to purchase commercial insurance for accidental injury for the placement personnel of rural public service positions. The relevant departments shall periodically supervise the subsidies for rural public service positions.
The address was wrong
Hello
Can I cancel the order?
I re-ordered
Has it been cancelled?
Second, although the right-wingers have a period of glory in history, it is short-lived, so it is short because it gives a little sunshine, and it sweats when it drinks a little water; when it has a little ambition, it will be admired by the people of Shu, and when it is hit, it will become the servant of Mao Zedong.
But in the process of social progress, the right-wing has played a positive role.
The positive significance of the right wing should not be denied in terms of defining the standard of truth, developing the economy, improving science and technology, and promoting the institutionalization of governance and human rights protection.
Three, although I do not fully agree with some of Li Weidong's statements, I am very interested in his statements and very respectful of Li Weidong as a person; because he is serious, he is serious about China, and he takes China's social problems seriously.
But I oppose his anti-communist theory, I think that the revolution is inevitable, and the revolution will inevitably lead to social turmoil, and the people's livelihood will be damaged, and the political groups will be mixed with sand and mud, and foreigners will take advantage of the opportunity.
IV. To change or improve China, we must have patience and a responsible attitude towards the country and the people. Those who attempt to take advantage of political opportunities are not rightists, but scoundrels.
Let's talk about left.
On the left, in fact, are a bunch of orphans of time and politics.
If the right has positive significance for society, the Communist Party will listen to some of the right's words and analysis their thoughts when needed. However, the left has no such thing, because what the left wants is precisely the dross that the Communist Party has thrown away!
Five, I have recently seen some of my friends fighting back against the rebels, and they are really getting into it, and I think it's a bit of a waste of time.
Don't try to reason with a traitor or a leftist, they are both stubborn and can't be reasoned with.
Don't try to prove that we are right, and don't try to make the traitors and leftists recognize us, why should we?
I told my friends that when the traitors insult you for five cents, when the leftists insult you for your right dog, that's exactly when our middle road is right!
Many people have ideals when they are young, but forget their ideals when they grow old, or pursue their ideals, but become eccentric.
And the ideal gradually fades away, and even the dragon-slaying boy becomes a dragon.
I think left and right generally refer to constraint and freedom, and China should be left-leaning as a result of its genetic predisposition as a civilization.
Domestic right-wing liberals emphasize efficiency and development, while left-wingers strengthen supervision and pay more attention to fairness and safety.
Now, the society as a whole hopes to pay more attention to fairness, while the Sino-US competition is sure to continue for a long time.
Although I can't understand it, I just click and it's done
Nothing to say, Flower is just so righteous
In the past two years, the United States has blocked and encircles Huawei chips, which has not only put Huawei into an unprecedented predicament, but also caused “US” enterprises to suffer huge losses.
The United States has suppressed China's chip industry, requiring its own enterprises and allies to simultaneously block China's chip industry, which directly caused the orders and profits of global chip suppliers to be affected, resulting in the reduction of research and development investment and the decline of production capacity of chip production enterprises, thus causing the shortage of the global chip supply chain.
Today, "chip shortage" has spread to all major industries around the world, such as automobile production, mobile phone price increases, and almost all industries that use chips have been affected.
In order to master the “chip” self-reliance, more and more technology giants in more and more countries have begun to move towards the road of “de-Americanization”.
In order to firmly control the global semiconductor control rights and restrain the development of the Chinese semiconductor industry, the US has acted frequently recently. It is the host of the “Chip Summit” and is invited to establish a semiconductor alliance by 64 countries and regions, and to support the US domestic technology giants such as Intel. For example, in order to regain the leading position in the chip industry, Intel invested 20 billion US dollars to build two wafer processing plants in the US state of Arizona and opened up the chip foundry business to the world.
When most people thought that Intel's move would have a certain impact on Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Co., Ltd. (TSMC), and it was likely to snatch away TSMC's "bowl of rice."
The reason why it is so certain is that Intel, as a veteran technology giant in the United States, has been deeply engaged in the semiconductor field for decades, and has a large number of talent teams and technological reserves. It is bound to rise rapidly in the short term and defeat TSMC.
However, for Intel's decision, TSMC founder Morris Chang did not take it lightly.
At the “2021 Master Knowledge Forum” held in April this year, Zhang Zhongmou made a shocking statement, saying that Intel’s move to build a chip foundry is quite ironic.
Zhang Zhongmou's dislike of Intel's entry into the wafer field is because Zhang Zhongmou still has a grudge against TSMC and Intel for more than 30 years.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Intel was the pearl of the manufacturing industry in the United States, occupying the top position in the world, and was the leader of the world's semiconductor industry.
By the 1980s, the world's high-end chips had been monopolized by a few strong players.
At that time, the semiconductor industry was characterized by the IDM model, and the chip was designed, manufactured, and tested by one factory. Intel was the representative of that era.
However, this model has put a lot of small businesses under pressure, and many semiconductor entrepreneurs can only sigh in the face of the huge construction costs of the production line.
After entering the 1980s, the chip industry began to see the phenomenon of cooperation in division of labor. In 1984, Zhang Zhongmou heard that there was a company that specialized in chip design. He thought that since there was a company that specialized in design, then it would be possible to establish a factory that specialized in wafer manufacturing.
Not long after, Zhang Zhongmou's idea became a reality, and Taiwan Semiconductor was born.
Taiwan Semiconductor focuses on the single link of “chip manufacturing” and does not design, but only provides the service of subcontracting chip manufacturing.
When Taiwan Semiconductor was just established, it was just a small ant in front of the giant Intel.
In order to get capital support, Zhang Zhongmou once sought investment from Intel, but when Intel heard that Taiwan Semiconductor only did the manufacturing process of the chip industry, it was obviously very arrogant and did not look down on Taiwan Semiconductor, so it resolutely refused to invest in Taiwan Semiconductor.
Zhang Zhongmou also believed that Intel at that time did not look down on the service of wafer fabrication.
I did not expect that the giant in the service of chip manufacturing would have to start to do chip subcontracting.
So, Zhang Zhongmou thought that Intel's entry into wafer fabrication was ironic.
TSMC's market value is now higher than Intel's.
In the face of TSMC's strong offensive, Intel is also unwilling to seal the deal.
Today, TSMC is racing towards 3nm chips, while Intel is still stuck at 14nm from 7 years ago.
It is not easy to catch up.
No more
Placed the order 2 hours ago at 19:06 😅
Let's take a look at some of the "strange searches" today.
What is normal public opinion?
Randomly select three hot searches: February 2nd Dragon Rising, the rise in the price of Good Luck Friends, and the event of Hou La La, and the public opinion spreads to form a peak, and then [the index drops] (smooth curve) and finally dissipates. If there is a secondary public opinion, there will be a small peak again.
They look exactly like the "evolution model of network public opinion" that the State Council Information Office once displayed on its website.
What is abnormal sentiment?
Six hot searches in the same event are randomly selected, and the results are as follows:【Peak-like】,【Sawtooth-like】,【Cliff-like】.
【The shape of a peak】means that it is artificially heated and quickly rises to the top of the hot search, attracting the attention of the public; 【The shape of a sawtooth】means that it is cyclically heated, ensuring that the topic remains on the hot search list; 【The shape of a cliff】means that it is collectively evacuated, and the hot search has played its "function", and it will receive a new task and rush to a new battlefield.
As shown in Figure 9, the peak of one event is exactly the trough of another event, and the time difference is just a few seconds. This must be a unified amphibious assault, opening a new round of attacks.
The professionalism of black PR is quite obvious: dozens of hot searches are listed at the same time, and which ones attract attention, which ones are responsible for popularization, which ones are provocative, which ones divert attention, which ones affect cognition, which ones mislead judgment, which ones incite emotions, and which ones are tied to decision-making. The black-owned accounts are divided into batches and nodes, and they are refined in detail. Almost all elements of the spread of public opinion are considered.
The dissemination of information is a science, and without the subjective factors of position and emotion, black public relations will also be everywhere.
Anyone who has walked through must leave traces, and we will dig them up together.
Data source: heat search time machine.
First cases of Omikron virus infection found in Mauritius - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 12 (Xinhua) - The first cases of infection with the mutant virus of the new coronavirus were reported in Mauritius, Cyprus and Malawi in recent days.
Mauritius reported its first two cases of the Omicron variant on the 10th.
According to Health Minister Kelilesh Jagutpal, one of the cases was a tourist from South Africa who arrived in Mauritius on November 27; the other case was a local resident of Mauritius who tested positive for the virus on November 30 after coming into contact with a person who had recently returned from South Africa.
After isolation treatment in the hospital, the two patients tested negative for nucleic acid detection, and have returned to their respective places of residence.
The Cyprus Ministry of Health announced on the 10th that it had confirmed the country's first three cases of infection with the Omicron variant.
The three are students who returned from a trip abroad in the beginning of this month and were not admitted to the hospital due to their mild symptoms.
In order to prevent the spread of the mutant virus, the government of Sierra Leone has continued to increase its prevention and control efforts.
From December 6 to January 10, all passengers aged 12 and above who enter the country by air must pay for a nucleic acid test at the airport.
The Ministry of Health also announced on the 10th that it would begin to vaccinate children aged 5 to 11 in the country.
Malawi's health minister, Khumbize Chiponda, said on Monday that the country had found its first three cases of the Omicron variant.
The country's health department conducted genome sequencing on 12 positive samples collected from November 9 to December 2, and found these three cases of infection.
Takeaway never delivered
The rider's phone numbers were all fake
I have re-ordered
Will the refund be made for the previous order?
If not, please cancel the order and refund.
Thinking about calling room service early, but now it's 7pm and I haven't eaten yet
I don't understand what you're saying...
Is your Chinese a translation or do you prefer to use English?
That was sent to
Should I call him?
Dear customers,
Thank you for choosing to dine at our restaurant. Your happiness and satisfaction have always been our mission. We strive to provide you and your family with more delicious and convenient dishes and better services. Your satisfaction and praise are our driving force!
Thank you for the five-star rating from your dear, I love you so much!
Thank you for choosing to dine at our restaurant. We apologize for any inconvenience this may have caused you.
At the same time, we are very grateful for your true experience evaluation. We will find the shortcomings in time and take effective measures to improve. We will strictly control the quality and quantity of the dishes. I am the "Little Cloud" of the Cloud Restaurant. My phone number is 18912251735. We look forward to meeting you again.
Dear customers, thank you for choosing to dine at our restaurant. We apologize for the unpleasant dining experience caused by the menu problem. We have communicated with the kitchen to strictly control the menu, and thank you for your understanding and support. I am Yun, the manager of the restaurant. I look forward to seeing you again!
Come to the banquet and leave with a good mood!
Dear customers, thank you for your evaluation and support for our "Little Cloud". When our carefully prepared dishes are appreciated by you, it is the happiest moment for us!
Looking forward to meeting you again
Dear little master, first of all, I would like to thank you for your recognition and evaluation. We will try our best to be better and better!
Secondly, I would like to thank you for your support and likes in your busy schedule, and wish you a happy meal and a good mood every day!
I don't think this is helpful at all!
It was money in the stomach
The order is for talons
Okay, phone is #PHONENUMBER#.
Do I need to stay in the conversation?
I #NAME# called your staff to explain
Your rider told me the address was too far
The 360 Home by American 360
Address: 156, South Ring Road, No. 12, Happy Garden
At first, it was introduced by a friend because of trust, so I chose to have a look at it. At first, my budget was 70,000 to do a basic renovation.
As soon as you enter the store, there are a series of tricks.
I went to the store just to show them my floor plan. They did not go to the site to measure the house. They gave me a quote of 70,000 yuan for my 135 square meter house. They did not even show me their materials. I did not know what brand of materials they were using.
Their second scam is that you have to hand over the deposit as soon as you walk into the shop (and once you've handed it over, you'll never get it back, unless you've got enough experience and know-how to argue with them).
When I was hesitating whether to pay the deposit, they would invite their so-called manager to tell me that if I paid the deposit today, I could get a discount of how much.
This is a big pit, and I was cheated alive. I deposited 10,000 yuan at the spur of the moment.
His quote had many problems, including $7,000 for water and electricity upgrades, and none of the doors and cabinets in the bathroom, which are the biggest cost head.
They also charge more than other home care companies for the services they provide.
I lost trust in this company and signed the contract without knowing anything.
When I went to ask for a refund, they were very professional and had a dedicated team to deal with you.
No matter what, it is the customer's problem, and they are completely at fault.
There are all sorts of excuses, and there are a lot of details, and I don't want to talk about them one by one. In short, don't choose them, because my friend who hired them to do the decoration also did a bad job, and you will have to pay for all sorts of expenses later.
Damn, they are the original fake dragon head decoration, now they are changed into a beautiful one, as if they have closed down and changed to another one.
So, don't choose such a dodgy decorating company.
In the future, when you choose, you can look up these things on the Internet. Because decoration is not a small amount of money.
If you want to ask a question to the merchant, please log in or register first
Prohibit the release of various forms of business reviews, please see the merchant inclusion statement for details
The decoration design channel of Meituan provides you with the latest business address, telephone number, business hours and other merchant information of the top 360 integrated home furnishing stores in Kunming, and finds the decoration company to decorate the decoration company. Go to Meituan
Please cancel the order within 30 minutes if it's not so scary!
Is there no other way? Like, changing the address?
Okay, then you won't cancel this dialogue. If you don't return my money within 5 to 10 days, I will definitely pursue it.
I asked if it was possible to cancel in 15 minutes
The chicken should be cooked, but I received raw meat, so I couldn't eat it.
The starry sky has about 丨The peak of the Gemini meteor shower on the 14th - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tianjin, December 12 (Reporter Zhou Runjian) As the last large-scale meteor shower of this year, one of the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere, the Gemini meteor shower will reach its peak on December 14. Friends who like meteor showers can observe after midnight on December 14.
Beijing amateur astronomer An Hui captured the Gemini meteor shower in Qinghai on December 13, 2018.
Most of the parent bodies of the meteor showers are periodic comets, but the parent body of the Geminid meteor shower is 3200 Phaethon, an Apollo-type asteroid.
The Geminid meteor shower is also the second known meteor shower not to be born from a comet.
The vice president of the Tianjin Astronomical Society and a professional in popularizing astronomy, Li Shulipeng, said that like the New Year’s blockbuster, the Geminid meteor shower usually appears at the end of the year, and the “showing schedule” can last from December 4 to 17.
This meteor shower is known for its high rate of flow and stability, and is one of the three major meteor showers in the Northern Hemisphere along with the Perseids and the Geminids.
One distinctive feature of the Gemini meteor shower is that the meteor bodies move slowly, are colorful, and there are many fireballs. It is suitable for both visual observation and astronomical photography for beginners.
On December 13, 2020, Yang Jing, an amateur astronomer in Tianjin, took pictures of the Gemini meteor shower in Jizhou, Tianjin.
The meteor shower will peak around 15:00 on December 14, with a ZHR (the number of meteors that can be seen per hour under ideal observing conditions, when the radiant point is directly above the observer's head) of 150.
The Gemini meteor shower index chart.
"Last year, the Gemini meteor shower left a deep impression on people, but this year's Gemini meteor shower will be affected by moonlight, and the brilliance will be slightly reduced.
On the 14th, it is the 11th day of the 11th month of the lunar calendar, and the moon phase is the full moon. The bright moonlight will interfere with the observation. Fortunately, the moon will fall in the second half of the night. At this time, the radiation point of the Gemini meteor shower will be relatively high.
Friends who like meteor showers can observe them in the few hours after the moon sets in the late night, but they should pay attention to keep warm and keep warm. "
How can we observe more meteors?
"It is not recommended to observe in the city, and you can choose a place with a high altitude, a small light pollution, and a wide view to the northeast, and then patiently wait for the moon to fall, and then observe visually.
It is worth noting that the flow rate of the Gemini meteor shower is very large in all directions, and it is not necessary to stare at the radiation point of the Gemini meteor shower all the time when observing.
If you are a friend of photography, it is best to choose a wide-angle lens with a large aperture, and use high ISO and the largest aperture when shooting.
Based on the consideration of stability and continuity, a tripod, a backup battery and a shutter line are also indispensable."
Li pointed out.
What is the difference between laser TV and traditional TV in market positioning?
In my understanding, the traditional TV referred to by the author should be liquid crystal TV, and the difference in market positioning between laser TV and liquid crystal TV mainly has the following two points:
First, laser TV will focus on the large screen market.
Compared with the market positioning of liquid crystal TV, laser TV is obviously more focused on the large screen market, or the laser TV itself is a product born for large screens.
Currently, the mainstream LCD TV size is between 55 inches and 65 inches, and the size of the laser TV is generally more than 75 inches, and the largest is more than 100 inches, which fully meets the demand of users for large-screen color TVs.
In recent years, the proportion of laser TVs in global shipments and sales has been increasing, and the proportion in the overall TV sales of 80 inches and above has exceeded 60%.
According to the prediction of Zhongyi Kang, the sales volume of laser TV in 2020 will grow by more than 140%, and continue to maintain a high growth rate.
The reason for the good performance in the large screen market is mainly due to the excellent performance of laser TVs in eye protection.
Based on the principle of laser television reflection, the light emitted by the laser source does not directly enter the eyeball, and the imaging process is closer to the natural conditions of the object, and the stimulation to the eyes is also smaller.
The researchers from the Xi’an Laboratory of the Standardization Research Institute of China’s Electronic Technology and the ophthalmology experts from Beijing Chao-Yang Hospital compared the strict contrast experiments of watching the laser TV and the liquid crystal TV under the same population conditions, and obtained 144 sets of test data.
The data confirms that the laser TV does indeed have very strong eye protection characteristics, and even has certain improvements in certain aspects.
In the current trend of visual health becoming more and more important, the laser TV has not only attracted more and more users with its eye protection advantages, but also opened another breakthrough in the mobile phone market.
Second, laser TVs are more focused on the high-end market.
In contrast to the continuous decline in the price of liquid crystal television, the current market price of laser television is mostly above 10,000 yuan, and the price gradually rises with the upgrade of size and light source.
Why is laser TV so expensive?
It's a no-brainer.
With the continuous development of light sources and technology, laser TV has many advantages that liquid crystal TV and projectors cannot achieve.
With the ultra-short-throw projection technology, the projection distance of the laser TV is shorter than that of the traditional projection device, and it can achieve the experience of a 100-inch large screen in a short distance. The required space is small, and the host is small and occupies little space.
In terms of brightness, the large brand laser TV can reach more than 2000 lumens.
In addition, the heat output is lower, the equipment loss is small, and the service life of the TV is also longer.
In addition, many high-end laser TV models are equipped with many cutting-edge technologies such as true 4K ultra-high definition picture quality, artificial intelligence system, and biomimetic screen, which can bring users a more shocking visual and auditory experience.
It is not a fake demand, but the product of demand segmentation. In terms of picture quality and input-output ratio, the laser TV is not a dish for audio-visual players. If you want to balance the big screen and the viewing environment, you can try it. Everything has its pros and cons. You can judge for yourself after weighing the pros and cons. Don’t just listen to one side.
In simple terms, the ultra-wide-angle close-up projection machine - laser TV, in order to get close to the screen, has to use expensive ultra-wide-angle lenses and reflectors, which does not meet the optical best design.
To block some of the ambient light, a micro-structured Fresnel screen is used, which is expensive, and the price of the 80-inch screen is basically the same as that of a 65-inch LCD.
In addition, I really dislike that the projector manufacturers use the mirror reflection on the eyes as a selling point. Please, the light on the screen that the eyes can see is direct light. When you reflect it on the ceiling, the eyes cannot see it. Why does the liquid crystal TV also have direct light? When you open the TV ceiling, it is also lit.
And, if the projection screen wasn't a mirror, it wouldn't have worked.
The hot spots (spots) of the high gain curtains are ignored, and a large amount of light is reflected to the eyes at a certain angle, which is really uncomfortable.
The visual aesthetic photography gallery has not yet opened a branch
After adding the WeChat appointment date, the little sister arranged the time for me to choose, and the reply was quite timely.
Before going, I watched the works in the store, which were mostly outdoor wedding photos. They were very beautiful, and there were many styles of shooting.
After the day was over, I simply exchanged my thoughts with the little sister, and she was very patient in helping me try on two sets of clothes that I was indecisive about. In the end, the makeup artist began to make up before the photographer took the photos. The photographer would arrange some props, guide the action, and pay attention to every detail.
But maybe because I didn't communicate the specific shooting ideas with her, so the result was not the style I wanted, but it should be good.
After the shoot, the photographer will help to choose the photos, communicate the post-production style, and feel that it is very careful.
The repaired film will take about half a month to be ready, and wait for the effect~
The second time I won a photo feast - most of the clothes can be photographed.
Finally, she chose a black gauze skirt to experience different styles.
The entire shooting process took about 2 hours, including makeup and shooting. The photographer who was responsible for the shooting is the younger brother of 95, and he feels a little shy. I hope that in the future, I can give more suggestions on the customer's shooting action guidance. He is quite talkative, and the shooting process is quite enjoyable.
Visual Aesthetic Photography Museum Preferred Quality Shop Reply
And check out Queenie too!
I filled in my name and phone number first, then I chose the clothes. I could choose the wedding dress, and I was patient enough to change into three or four sets of clothes. After choosing, I was made up for a long time, and the service attitude was also good. Later, the photographer taught me how to pose, and it felt like I had a big face. The editing said it would take half a month, and it arrived in three or four days. It felt like there was no difference from the original film.
【Environment】Overall, the environment is good.
There are many optional clothes.
There are three makeup rooms, one of which is a photography studio.
【Service】is very enthusiastic and very careful.
The stylists were very patient.
The photographer will also teach you how to act.
If the photographer is not satisfied, he or she can also actively request a retake.
【Experience】The shape may be a bit over the top, and the original double eyelids were pasted with three eyelids.
The eyebrows have also been shaved, which is a bit awkward for those who don't normally wear makeup.
The photos were taken for ten days, but the P-effect was not very satisfactory. I felt that the double eyelid stickers were still very obvious.
Because I wasn't sure what style to choose, I tried two sets. The result was a hit and miss. So I chose the black suit. The sister said that this set was more retro and vintage.
After choosing the clothes, I started to make up. The makeup artist and hairstylist sisters are very patient in helping me to make up. The effect is very satisfactory.
After I did my makeup, I started taking pictures. The photographer was in charge of my poses the whole time. The process was very smooth and harmonious.
After the filming, he carefully selected four of his favorite ones and said that he was very satisfied with the ending of the film.
No response for 3 days... since your system cannot recognize my credit card, I cannot join the #PRS_ORG# plus monthly plan!
The strangest thing was that I used the same credit card every time I paid.
I now have to pay for delivery every time
Can I first be exempted, and then you collect my monthly fee after you finish the investigation, is that possible?
Is it worth buying insurance for a small umbrella?
Umbrella is an insurance broker platform on the Internet.
In terms of setting conditions: According to the "Regulations on the Supervision of Insurance Brokerage Institutions (Revised in 2015)", to become an insurance broker, one must meet three keywords: the shareholder and founder must not have any major violations of the law in the last three years, the minimum registered capital must be RMB 500 million, and it must be approved by the China Insurance Regulatory Commission.
These three are actually very strict. In summary, it requires strength, and must be approved by the national authoritative department of the China Banking and Insurance Regulatory Commission (which regulates all insurance companies and banks in China), and the shareholders must have good corporate governance. As a small umbrella insurance for insurance brokers, the policyholders do not need to worry about whether the small umbrella insurance is legitimate or not, because there are these three requirements.
At this point, it's good, it's trustworthy.
From the perspective of insurance products: Small umbrella insurance is an insurance supermarket, and many of the company's star critical illness insurance are sold on this platform, such as the latest and泰超级玛丽5号重疾险，赔方和承保方都是和泰寿险，小雨伞保险只是第三方中介，不用质疑它的可靠性。
From the payment mode perspective: Internet platform products are generally more cost-effective than traditional products, and the payment mode is flexible, supporting monthly payment, which relieves the burden of premium payment for insureds, and can maximize the leverage of insurance.
That's a very good thing.
It can be considered.
From the perspective of professionalism: this is particularly important, because insurance is a highly professional industry, and many Internet product customers can self-insure. This will lead to many misunderstandings, and in the health disclosure and occupational fields, non-insurance personnel often add their own subjective awareness when they insure, thinking that they are healthy or suitable, which may lead to many hidden risks of claims, and may be rejected.
I myself have done insurance phone sales for “Tencent WeBao” (just like a small umbrella, it is also an insurance broker platform on the Internet), and I am very responsible in telling people.
The insurance on the Internet is true and reliable, but the people are not, and the Internet channels do not have professional staff, and there are many sales misguidance.
For example: 1 yuan insurance covers 600,000, buy insurance and get a mobile phone, free to receive 60,000 premium for serious illness insurance, these marketing strategies are not wrong, but they are light on the heavy and will not tell the insured, the first month is 1 yuan, the second month is required to pay the normal charge, 20 to 200 yuan, many customers do not know what they are paying for two years.
They thought they could spend 1 yuan, and the insurance company would pay 600,000 (a piece of cake).
Free mobile phone is only given to special policy numbers such as 6666 and 8888, and if the winning message is sent, you will not exchange it and no one reminds you.
(This is another pitfall for the insured) Free of charge, you can get 60,000 yuan of medical insurance, which is short-term. If you only rely on this, there is no other commercial insurance, and if you really have a serious illness, 60,000 yuan is useless, it can't solve the problem, and the rest of your life will be naked.
The government is also cracking down on mis-selling of internet insurance.
So, in general, there is no problem with the platform, and there is no problem with the product. The problem is with the professionalism and professional ethics of the sales staff.
The topic should be comprehensively and carefully considered. In fact, the products of many offline insurance brokers are more comprehensive, and there are more opportunities and products for customers to choose from, and the cost performance of some products is better than that of Internet products.
I have helped 59 internet customers to insure offline products, and saved each person 2000-3000 yuan/year.
If you have any questions, please feel free to contact me.
I am a Minya insurance agent with 3 years of experience in enterprise management training, and I have served more than 1,000 enterprise users. I have cooperated with more than 100 insurance companies. Before the insurance, I will start from the customer's needs and customize insurance products for each customer. During the insurance process, I will try my best to obtain the best nuclear insurance result for the customer, and after the insurance, I will help the customer make insurance bills and manage them.
Grow with each customer for life.
I hope my answer can help the questioner!
According to the definition of insurance supervision department, internet insurance is insurance business that the insured can complete all the insurance procedures autonomously after clicking the insurance link.
In this process, the policyholder does not need to sign, and the insurance consultant does not need to sign. All steps can be completed by the policyholder autonomously.
While internet insurance policies may not have the "ceremonial" feel, or even a printed paper contract, this in no way affects the validity or legal enforceability of the electronic contract.
This model is somewhat reminiscent of the "telemarketing" style of sales, but there is a fatal flaw in buying insurance this way, and that is that follow-up service may not be able to keep up.
Insurance is usually a long-term contract that lasts for decades. When we buy insurance, should we think carefully about the "intermediary" we choose? Is it an "insurance intermediary" who can accompany us for a long time and provide us with services in the future?
How can I contact the delivery person?
It's already 3 p.m.
Is that compensation for me?
I said I wanted to knock on the door to deliver.
But the rider left it on the doorstep and then walked away
And they sent the wrong one.
Your rider has already taken my order #NUMBER#, but I'm still waiting
Rider received my order at 7.25pm but still refused to leave
Do I need to get any other take-out?
What to do
Where did your rider go?
And wait for what?
I'm here to pick up my order.
Well, if you don't cancel, I'll call the police.
But my food will have health and safety issues
Classic Sword and Knife Appreciation Guide Golden Edition [Original Book, No Worry About After-Sales Service]
【Original book, lightning delivery, quality worry-free, can issue invoices】
Classic Badge Appreciation Guide + Classic Sword and Knife Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Uniform Appreciation Guide Gold Edition 3 Volumes World Military Books Classic Military Badges Performance Introduction Military Uniform Swords and Knives
Nine Lectures on the Collection and Appraisal of Chinese Painting and Calligraphy [Original book, lightning delivery]
【Full-price discount, fast delivery, invoicing, genuine books】
Western knives and swords: appreciation and collection [original book, lightning delivery]
Piano Technique Practice Guide【Original Book, Lightning Delivery】
Industrial design hand-drawn treasure chest creative realization + employment guide + performance Luo Jian, Li Yue, Liang Jun, Qinghua University Press [Original book, lightning delivery]
China's antiques auction: English version of porcelain [official book] [lightning delivery]
Nine Songs Map【Original Book, Lightning Delivery】
The Romance of the Three Kingdoms (Romance of the Three Kingdoms) 【Original book, lightning delivery】
Chinese Painting History【Original book, lightning delivery】
木本花鸟谱【正版书籍 闪电发货】
Realism and the Chinese films of the 1980s
Chinese flag design 1【Original book, lightning delivery】
Grass Flower Poem Collection【Original book, lightning delivery】
Blade of the Immortal 02: Einherjar 【正版图书 无忧售后】
Song Jianfeng - Portrait Artist Miniatures【Original book, lightning delivery】
Good law and good governance - the legacy of institutional memory and public service
The 20th anniversary of the “historical and cultural lectures for party branch secretaries” is a collection of the most valuable treasures. Wang Chunyu, Zhang Daxie, Xiong Zhaozheng, Ge Jianxiong, Deng Xiaonan and other 14 scholars of history and culture gave a public lecture to the party branch secretaries.
All you need to do is to re-enter the discount code.
No problem, remember that you do not need to arrange for a resend, I have already bought it, I don't want to waste it
Thank you for your help
From the past to the present, I have always opposed any form of defamation and abuse, and I cannot accept this kind of personal attack.
In a civilized society, we can accept everything, but we must eliminate this kind of scoundrel.
If you don't look at the political parties and factions, the first thing to resist is this kind of uncivilized style.
From the moment you started sending me friend requests on Facebook, and then posting satirical posts, I have taken a no-response stance.
After that, you not only continued to tag me at the frequency of one day six meals, but also continued to discuss with your so-called friends on Facebook about some obscure and humiliating remarks about me, such as appearance, figure, good living conditions, and so on. I... have had enough.
How did I know later that I received more of my friends posting a picture of me on their Facebook friend's account with sexual harassment content?
I'm sorry, as a woman, I can no longer remain silent.
After I reported the news, you became more and more belligerent.
I don't care what your political background is, or what your social status is, in our society, it is necessary to respect both genders.
Yes, you can continue with this mocking, cryptic, humiliating, insulting, and abusive language, and you can continue to say that you are only caring and paying attention to me, you can continue to believe that this is not harassment, and you can continue to deny that this is not your doing, or continue to post all the abusive language.
Yes, I can't and I don't have the ability to stop you.
I don't know you, I don't want to know you, my appearance and figure don't need you to comment on them.
I don't think there would be any girl who would want to humiliate herself in such a way to gain fame.
A friend asked me if I was okay.
I said I wouldn't believe it.
I don't think any one woman would be able to say she's okay after that.
Only those who have no basic decency will choose to hurt any one woman in this way, whether in the workplace, in society, in politics or in business.
I believe that justice is natural.
I have picked out some of the comments for you to comment on.
Your own post should not be imitated by anyone
I can only say that you are the enemy of civilization
With a smile
Vietnam People's Daily - Vietnamese Prime Minister Nguyen Xuan Phuc attends the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum
Two major conferences were held during the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum, discussing topics around digital technology enterprises and national digital transformation, as well as digital technology enterprises and post-pandemic economic recovery and development.
Minister of Information and Communications Nguyen Manh Hung said that in 2021, despite the continued spread of the COVID-19 epidemic, the number and revenue of digital technology enterprises in Vietnam still maintained growth momentum, reaching nearly 10%.
In 2021, Vietnam cultivated a large number of typical digital products, concentrated on solving Vietnam's major problems, many digital products have gone abroad, and Vietnam's digital technology ranking has improved.
Minister Ruan Mengxiong called on digital technology enterprises to take on the responsibility of developing the national digital transformation platform and the task of developing these national digital platforms is to fulfill the mission of the country.
In the forum, leaders from various departments and state agencies are studying, developing, applying, and transferring digital technology enterprises, organizations, and individuals to share the mobilization and gathering of all social resources to develop Vietnamese technology enterprises, and to promote the country's digital transformation and economic recovery after the epidemic.
Premier Li Keqiang emphasized in his speech at the forum that digital transformation is the world's only way and an objective requirement for development.
Digital transformation has become a global issue, and digital transformation services are universal. Therefore, it is necessary to mobilize the participation of the whole people.
People and enterprises are the core, main body, target and driving force of digital transformation.
Therefore, all policies should be for the people and enterprises.
Premier Li Keqiang stressed that the digital transformation should reflect the spirit of the nation, and should be based on domestic strength, strategic, long-term and decisive factors, and external factors should be important and breakthroughs.
He also believes that digital transformation should drive the development of deep and sustainable development, participate in the prevention and control of the new coronavirus epidemic, economic recovery and development, and deal with the changes after the epidemic, overcome the phenomenon of natural resource depletion, and promote green transformation and the development of green energy.
The digital transformation requires participating in the establishment of databases related to the protection and promotion of national cultural values, historical traditions, national landscapes and folk customs, and promoting the digital transformation of banking, taxation, land management and development, logistics and other fields.
The ultimate goal of digital transformation is to make people happier and the country more prosperous and developed.
Premier Li Keqiang called on all levels of government, agencies and enterprises to increase their leadership and guidance in the development of digital technology, raise their awareness of digital transformation, continue to formulate and perfect the system of digital transformation, and strengthen national management and promote the development of digital technology enterprises in a spirit of respect, communication, listening, positive and active.
During the forum, Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attended the award ceremony for the 2021 “Vietnam Made” Excellent Digital Product Award and the opening ceremony of the “Vietnam Made” digital product exhibition.
I have reported it and have provided photos, but have not received a response
What cow, no cow
It's water chicken, raw meat
There's no way to eat it.
You make sure it's fresh, not old?
unacceptable
They had already placed an order early in the morning.
It was said to have been sent at around 7 p.m.
Why remake it?
It's ridiculous
“Zhihui Xiangxiang” 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Talent Summit Opening - Rolling News - Hunan Daily Net - Voice of China
Hunan Daily, December 10 (Full media reporter Zhou Zhiheng) On the 9th, the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Talent Summit “Zhihui Xiangxiang” opened in Zhuzhou.
Wang Cheng, a member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and the Secretary of the Provincial Organization Department, attended the launch ceremony and delivered a speech.
Wang Cheng pointed out that holding the Talent Summit is an important measure to implement the spirit of the Central Talent Work Conference and the 12th Provincial Party Congress, and shows that Hunan attaches great importance to talents, craves talents, and makes good use of talents.
Hunan has a good tradition of loving talents, respecting talents, and respecting talents. It provides a broad platform for the development of talents, and creates an environment for the realization of a better life. In recent years, it has implemented the talent-led development strategy in depth, and built up a talent work pattern of the whole chain, which has become the soil for the growth and achievement of talents, the hot soil for innovation and entrepreneurship, and the pleasant land for living and working.
At present, Hunan is comprehensively implementing the strategic positioning and mission tasks of “Three Highs and Four New”, and will further open the door to recruit and cultivate talents, and issue more preferential policies, concentrate more resources, and create better conditions for talent innovation and entrepreneurship. We hope that all excellent talents will gather in Hunan and contribute to the high-quality development of Hunan together.
The exhibition hall of Changsha, Zhuzhou and Xiangtan was set up at the scene, and the exhibition hall of Hunan self-trade experiment zone was set up. The Provincial Science and Technology Department, the Provincial Industry and Information Technology Department and the Provincial Labor and Social Security Department issued a list of key demands for technological innovation in the advanced manufacturing industry, a directory of talents needed for the intelligent manufacturing industry, and a directory of young talents needed for the intelligent manufacturing industry.
48 large enterprises, including China National Heavy Duty Truck Corporation, China National Machinery and Equipment Import and Export Corporation, and Yunda Technology, attracted talents on the spot, and nearly 1,000 relevant professional graduates and social talents participated in the talent project matching.
Hello
Just placed an order, which showed the rider waiting in the restaurant, but the restaurant said the order was ready and no rider was seen
Can you follow up on this, because I'm a bit rushed, thank you
It is possible to be late by half an hour without any reason
In fact, have you solved the problem?
This is what we have for you today.
1) [Brewery direct] Ningcheng Bailiang old cellar 42 degrees 500ml concentrated type sorghum original white wine, the taste is smooth and old wine, a box of four bottles.
Reasons for recommendation: Selected high-quality sorghum as raw material, traditional technology was used to brew, white wine from Inner Mongolia plateau, the taste is more classic, concentrated and sweet, with a touch of sweetness, rich layers, using traditional solid-state white wine technology to retain its original juice and flavor, and let the wine body carry a rich and thick taste.
The level 1, capacity 500, storage method is stored in a cool, dry, ventilated place, packed with other things, the alcohol content is 42, the fragrance is strong, the product weight (kg) is 2.9, and there are currently 4 people who have evaluated it, and it has received a 100% approval rate.
2. Ningcheng Bailiang old cellar big pot wine 52 degrees wine cellar grain white wine [10 kg]
Reasons for recommendation: After years of aging, it is more concentrated and more transparent, and it is a liquor that Inner Mongolian pastoral nomads love to drink. The strong aroma is inherited from the traditional brewing process, and it is intoxicated by the rustic and cordial nature of the Chinese people, which is suitable for various banquets or home use.
The capacity is 5000ml, the packaging is in a jar, the product weight (kg) is 8, the fragrance is strong, the storage method is ventilation, the province is Inner Mongolia, the grade is one, the alcohol precision is 52, and there are more than 50 people who have evaluated it, and it has a 95% approval rate.
3, 【brewery direct】Ningcheng Bailiang old cellar 42 degrees 500ml concentrated type sorghum original white wine, the taste is smooth and old wine, a box of six bottles.
Recommended reason: This white liquor is selected from high-quality sorghum ecological brewing, and the aroma is coordinated, fermented in the cellar, and aged in the wine. The taste is more fragrant.
The Baijiu from Inner Mongolia Plateau has a more classic taste, and the rich and fragrant taste flows over the guests' lips, making them happy to drink.
Reasons for recommendation: Selected high-quality sorghum, processed by unique techniques, allows you to drink freely when entertaining and having a family gathering.
The home of the high-speed train
Address: No. 555, Bei'nan Road, Beijing Check the map
Here, home appliances are quite complete, with many brands and well-known brands.
On the 12th, we went to the "Houston" water purifier store to see the water purifier. The store was doing an activity, and the prices were relatively low.
There are a total of 11 floors in the house, from the second floor to the ninth floor, and both the first and second floors are parking lots, and parking is free during the day!
It was not a good place to be around, there were hardly any hardware stores in the area, and the food at the restaurant was average at best.
This elevator is also very useless, just like the big disease, from negative two to negative one, back and forth, I can't help but press this floor, from the safety channel to the first floor, it is also very useless, directly to a furniture store, the furniture store is closed, and the safety channel is out!
The home is still in need of improvement, and there are many places that have not been developed.
Address: 555, No. 555, North Road of High-speed Railway, Shapingba District, transportation is convenient, and the parking lot is very large, and it is free during the day.
Environment: To be honest, the store is large, with 8 to 9 floors. If you want to buy furniture, household appliances, various small things... everything can be bought here. Many well-known merchants have set up shops in the store, such as Moshi, Oppein, Huatian, Boss, Feng Chuang, Hansdeng, York, Yunbang, Silin, Fupinjiu, Wanjiale, Natural, Zhonglian, Midea, Yadan... The brands are really too many. I can only remember so many. It is a good place to buy products. After shopping, you can rest on the sofa.
Recently, I wanted to buy a set of comfortable sofas. My friend said that there are many sofas to choose from here. I looked at Gujia Home and Meikem Home. I felt that it was okay, but the price was a bit expensive, so I was still hesitating.
The Urumqi Home Shopping Channel provides you with the latest merchant information such as the address, telephone number, business hours and so on. If you are looking for a decoration company, just go to the Urumqi Home Shopping Channel.
It has already been sent to my guest, #PRS_ORG#, but it hasn't been completed.
Got it, got it
If it can be delivered within 20 minutes, it will not be cancelled.
The Yangtze River mainstream achieves full coverage of the water-green comprehensive service area-Xinhua News
Xinhua News Agency Wuhan, December 11 (Reporter Wang Xian) On December 10, the Chongqing Fuling Waterfront Green Comprehensive Service Area was completed and put into operation as scheduled, which is the second waterfront green comprehensive service area in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River after the Fuling Waterfront Green Comprehensive Service Area in Sichuan Province was put into operation on December 8.
At this point, the water-based green comprehensive service area has covered the upper, middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River.
Qiu Jianhua, deputy director of the Yangtze River Navigation Management Bureau of the Ministry of Transport, introduced that previously, 10 green comprehensive service areas had been built and put into operation in the middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River in Hubei, Hunan, Jiangxi, Anhui and Jiangsu provinces, which won the recognition of boatmen and played an important role in promoting the high-quality development of Yangtze River navigation.
The full coverage of the green comprehensive service area on the water is another milestone event in the construction of the Yangtze River green shipping. The reception of pollutants by Yangtze River ships and the improvement of the shipping service capacity have been significantly improved.
According to reports, the water-based green comprehensive service area is an important facility that provides comprehensive production and living services for the majority of ships and crews, and helps the majority of crews solve the "urgent, difficult, and anxious" problems.
The two waterside green comprehensive service areas on the upper reaches of the Yangtze River were built and put into operation this time, integrating life services, production services and government services into one, with green and environmental protection as the theme, and with ship repair and ship emergency rescue services as its characteristic, so as to achieve “one berth, multiple services” for ships in the port, which will make the work of ship crew sailing on the Yangtze River more efficient and convenient.
Three U.S. aircraft carriers gather in the waters around China. The most powerful weapon in the U.S. Navy has a rare visit to the island. January 17, 2022. CCTV news: The latest news on Sino-U.S. relations: The latest satellite images show that the three U.S. aircraft carriers are gathering in the waters around China; The U.S. media also revealed that one of the most powerful weapons in the U.S. Navy, which rarely visits the island, has released an important signal to the allies and enemies of the United States in the Asia-Pacific region.
According to the news of the South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform of the Chinese think tank, on January 9, the satellite found the US "USS Carl Vinson" aircraft carrier near the Balabac Strait.
The Babkak Strait connects the South China Sea and the Sulu Sea, and is a strategic point on the first island chain in the Western Pacific.
The platform is expected to deploy the "Carl Vinson" in the South China Sea.
This is the first time the USS Carl Vinson has deployed F-35C fighters and CMV-22 "Osprey" tilt-rotor aircraft.
The US Navy carrier USS Carl Vinson, which is stationed in the Pacific Ocean, is in addition to the USS Abraham Lincoln (USS Abraham Lincoln), which departed from the United States on January 3.
The USS Lincoln is also the first to carry the F-35C Marine Corps fighter squadron, which belongs to the 314th Marine Fighter Attack Squadron of the United States Marine Corps.
In addition to the two aircraft carriers mentioned above, the U.S. Navy currently has the “Ronald Reagan” (USS Ronald Reagan) aircraft carrier, which is docked in Yokosuka, Japan, in the Asia-Pacific region.
The aircraft carrier battle group also includes the "Shanghais" missile cruiser and the "Stoddard" missile destroyer.
On January 17, the "South China Sea Strategic Situation Awareness Platform" released the latest satellite images, showing that the three U.S. aircraft carriers were gathering in the vicinity of China.
(Weibo @ South China Sea Strategic Situation Awareness) On January 17, 2022, the US military transport aircraft CMV-22B flew over the Diaoyu Islands.
(Weibo @Nanhai Strategic Situation Perception) According to CNN's report on January 17, the most powerful weapon in the US Navy's arsenal has visited the island for the first time in a long time.
The Ohio-class nuclear submarine USS Nevada, carrying 20 Trident missiles and dozens of nuclear warheads, entered the Guam Naval Base on Saturday (Jan. 15).
The US Navy's three aircraft carriers gathered in the waters around China, and the most powerful weapons were rare to visit the island of Guam. Analysts said that this was a signal to allies and enemies in the increasingly tense situation in the Indian-Pacific region.
It is the first visit to Guam by a U.S. ballistic missile submarine since 2016 and the second public visit to the island since the 1980s.
The three US aircraft carriers gathered in the waters around China, and the most powerful weapons were rare to visit the island of Guam. China has built a large number of military facilities in the Nansha Islands in recent years.
The photo is of Yongshui Island in Nansha Islands.
(South China Sea Research Forum) The U.S. Navy said in a statement that the visit of the Ohio-class nuclear submarine "Nevada" to the Philippines strengthened cooperation between the United States and its allies in the region, demonstrated the United States' capabilities, flexibility, combat readiness, and commitment to the security and stability of the Indo-Pacific region.
Ballistic missile submarines are usually called "Boomer submarines".
The whereabouts of the 14 US Navy "Sea Dragon" submarines are usually kept secret.
The secret surrounding the ballistic missile submarine has made the "Thunderboat" become the "most important survival weapon" in the "nuclear triad", which also includes the missile silos in the United States, as well as B-2 and B-52 bombers that can carry nuclear warheads.
Talking about the recent 26% drop of Meta and the market capitalization evaporation of $251 billion, Zuckerberg responded, "Facing unprecedented competition," why?
Meta (formerly Facebook) is essentially an advertising company, and its main source of income is advertising. Today, it is a profitable advertising company with its own traffic channels.
Facebook, Instagram, WhatsApp and other functions are all Meta's traffic channels.
Not only that, Meta is the largest “advertising alliance”, and many apps outside of Meta use Meta’s advertising platform to achieve monetization.
But times have changed.
First, because of the adjustment of Apple's privacy policy, Meta is difficult to obtain user data information, which affects the efficiency of advertising placement.
Apple's current privacy policy is very user-friendly, and it will clearly prompt users whether to allow the app to access their information, and most people's normal reaction is definitely not to allow it.
If Google were to strike again, the impact on Meta's revenue would be even greater.
Second, the Chinese factor in Meta's revenue growth has weakened (the proportion of this factor is uncertain, but it does exist).
Everyone knows that Meta has no business in China, but this understanding is inaccurate.
At least 10% of Meta's revenue each year comes from China, mostly from companies that do business in China.
Meta has about 200 staff in its Hong Kong office and several major agents in mainland China.
Chinese companies want to expand overseas markets, and Meta is an unavoidable advertising channel. Most of the money burned is given to Meta.
Interestingly, ByteDance's TT is now one of Meta's main competitors, but in the past two years, Meta has made a lot of money from ByteDance.
Domestic agencies are helping ByteDance to advertise on Meta, and the performance of Meta's Greater China region is also very good.
I haven't specifically looked into it recently, but I'm sure it won't be better than before.
The era of Chinese companies spending a lot of money overseas has passed.
Third, the new flow channels are not expanding smoothly.
Facebook is getting older, and new platforms, including TT, are not in Meta's hands.
The biggest problem is not just a decline in income, but a lack of growth expectations.
The capital market is not only looking at income, but also at expectations for the future.
Clearly, Meta's expectations are not high enough.
To tell a new story to the market, Zuckerberg talked about the "metaverse."
The metaverse is indeed one of the future directions, but the implementation cycle of the metaverse is relatively long, and this story should not be able to support Meta's market value in the next two to three years.
So the next two years should be a difficult time for Meta.
Don't be fooled by Facebook's pretty face. It has $100 billion to $200 billion in annual revenue, but it's in deep trouble compared to other Internet companies and high-tech companies.
Although his several social software are now popular and mainstream, such as Facebook, WhatsApp and so on, but facing the rapid development of tiktok, Facebook also has no confidence, and the change is just a blink of an eye.
And the concept of the metaverse, which is far-fetched and unattainable, has no hope of success in a short period of time, so Facebook is very dangerous, which is why Zuckerberg is changing the company's name and is constantly looking for new paths, but I think his path is wrong, it is a dead end.
Article 17. The State Regulates the Registration and Management of Registered Fire Engineers.
The personnel who have obtained the certificate of first and second level registered fire protection engineers can practice under the name of registered fire protection engineers at the corresponding level according to the registration agency.
Article 18 The Public Security Bureau Fire Department is a registration approval department for first-level registered fire engineers.
The public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions, and municipalities directly under the central government are the registration approval departments for the second-level registered fire engineer qualification, and are responsible for the preliminary review of the registration of the first-level registered fire engineer qualification.
Article 19: Persons who have obtained a first-class or second-class registered fire engineer qualification certificate and applied for registration shall be employed by an approved fire technology service agency or a fire safety key unit, and shall submit the registration application materials to the public security organ of the location of the employing unit (if the employing unit is an enterprise, through the enterprise to the place of registration of the enterprise), and the employing unit shall submit the registration application materials to the public security organ of the location of the employing unit (if the employing unit is an enterprise, through the enterprise to the place of registration of the enterprise).
Article 20. The public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities shall, after receiving the registration application materials of the applicant, inform the applicant of the entire content that needs to be corrected within one working day or within five working days. If the applicant is not informed within the specified time, the application shall be deemed to have been accepted from the date of receipt of the application materials.
For the registration applications accepted or rejected, a written certificate with the seal of the fire department of the local public security organ and the date should be issued.
Article 21. The public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the central government shall, within 20 working days from the date of receipt of the application for registration, complete the preliminary review of the application materials for the qualification registration of first-level registered fire protection engineers and the registration approval of second-level registered fire protection engineers in accordance with the prescribed conditions and procedures, and submit the application materials for the qualification registration of first-level registered fire protection engineers and the preliminary review opinions to the Fire Bureau of the Public Security Department for approval.
The Public Security Bureau should make a decision on whether to approve or not within 20 working days from the date of receiving the application materials and preliminary review opinions reported by the provincial public security bureau.
If a decision cannot be made within the stipulated time, the applicant should be notified of the extension of the time and the reason.
The reasons for not approving the decision should be stated in writing, and the applicant should be informed of his or her right to apply for administrative review or file an administrative lawsuit in accordance with the law.
Article 22: The registration approval department shall issue and deliver the corresponding registration certificate within 10 working days from the date of the approval decision.
Article 23 The registration certificate shall be valid for 3 years.
The registration certificate is a professional certificate for the registered fire protection engineer of the corresponding level, which is kept and used by the registered fire protection engineer himself.
Article 24: Applicants for initial registration should submit an application within one year from the date of obtaining a first-class or second-class registered fire engineer qualification certificate.
Applicants who apply for initial registration after the deadline must meet the continuing education requirements stipulated in this regulation.
The specific methods of registration management, including initial registration, continued registration, change of registration, cancellation of registration, and non-registration, shall be specified by the Ministry of Public Security.
Article 25 Continuing education is a prerequisite for the renewal, re-registration and late initial registration of registered fire protection engineers.
Each level of registered fire engineer should complete the corresponding continuing education in accordance with the regulations within each valid registration period.
Article 26 The registration approval department shall promptly announce the registration of fire protection engineers to the public, establish a register of fire protection engineers, and implement credit management for their professional activities.
Article 27. The registration management departments of all levels shall strictly implement the relevant provisions of the Administrative License Law of the People's Republic of China.
The exam information shared today will be the end of it. I hope it can help you.
Everyone must work hard to prepare for the fire engineer exam as soon as possible!
Real-time sharing of financial/accounting/construction latest exam information.
I cancelled... I waited for a long time.
You keep delaying
But the whole box of chicken soup is raw meat, so I can't eat it. Can I get a refund?
Pineapple, egg-fried rice, and steamed buns have not arrived, and #PRS_ORG# has withdrawn #NUMBER# yuan.
But whether the chicken soup can be refunded
Because you can't eat it.
Can I cancel if I want to?
The joint exercise “Peace Rescue-2021” between the Chinese and Vietnamese armies successfully concluded - Xinhua News Agency
On December 12, Xinhua News Agency, Hanoi (Zhou Na, Teng Huijin) reported that on the morning of December 12, all the participating forces of the Chinese delegation in the “Peace Rescue-2021” joint exercise of the Chinese and Vietnamese armies returned safely to the Chinese territory of Guangxi, marking the successful completion of the 7-day training mission.
In this joint exercise, the Chinese and Vietnamese armies focused on the humanitarian medical rescue, which is a major task, and completed the content of joint command, joint on-site rescue and mass casualty treatment according to the standard of actual combat. It effectively improved the joint medical security capability of the two armies.
The exercise results were highly praised by the Chinese and Vietnamese armies.
Nguyen Xuan Son, head of the Vietnam People's Army Logistics Department and deputy commander of the Vietnam People's Army, said at the closing ceremony of the exercise that through this exercise, Vietnamese military doctors learned about the organization and professional activities of the Chinese military doctors, and also saw the medical and supporting equipment of the Chinese side.
The results of the exercise proved the professional capabilities of the military medical forces of the two countries in medical assistance and epidemic prevention.
Chen Chunming, deputy director of the Health Bureau of the Logistics Support Department of the Central Military Commission, said that this exercise is another attempt to explore and innovate based on the successful holding of the joint medical activities in 2018. It has very important significance as a milestone.
During the exercise, the Chinese People's Liberation Army donated medical protective masks, medical protective clothing and rapid nucleic acid detection instruments to the Vietnam People's Army.
